Tennessee, session 114, SB1431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. That appropriations hereinafter set out are hereby made for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of state government for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2025, in the administration, operation and maintenance of the legislative, executive and judicial
branches of the various departments, institutions, offices and agencies of the state, and for
certain state aid and obligations and for capital outlay; for the service of the public debt, and for
emergency and contingency, all according to the following schedule:
I. LEGISLATIVE 2025-2026
1. Legislature
1.1 General Assembly Support Services ..................................... $ 13,787,100.00
1.2 House of Representatives ..................................................... 33,587,000.00
1.3 State Senate ......................................................................... 19,247,300.00
1.4 Legislative Administration Services ....................................... 10,224,200.00
1.5 Tennessee Code Commission .............................................. 68,900.00
Total Legislature .................................................................... $ 76,914,500.00
2. Fiscal Review Committee ............................................................... 2,933,400.00
Total Title I .......................................................................... $ 79,847,900.00
SB1431
003682
- 1 -

II. JUDICIAL
1. Appellate and Trial Courts .............................................................. $ 90,956,200.00
2. Supreme Court Buildings ................................................................ 3,451,500.00
3. Child Support Referees .................................................................. 1,227,800.00
4. Guardian Ad Litem.......................................................................... 11,047,500.00
5. Indigent Defendants' Counsel ......................................................... 53,394,700.00
6. Civil Legal Representation Fund ..................................................... 3,327,900.00
7. Court Interpreter Services............................................................... 2,496,700.00
8. Verbatim Transcripts ...................................................................... 5,391,600.00
9. Tennessee State Law Libraries ...................................................... 74,500.00
10. Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges ................................. 60,300.00
11. Judicial Conference ........................................................................ 373,700.00
12. Judicial Programs and Commissions .............................................. 830,400.00
13. State Court Clerks' Conference ...................................................... 260,100.00
14. Administrative Office of the Courts ................................................. 18,473,200.00
15. Appellate Court Clerks .................................................................... 1,667,500.00
16. Board of Law Examiners ................................................................ 1,170,200.00
17. Board of Professional Responsibility .............................................. 4,497,200.00
18. Tennessee Lawyers Assistance Program ....................................... 596,900.00
19. Continuing Legal Education ............................................................ 1,080,200.00
20. Client Protection Fund .................................................................... 205,500.00
Total Title II ......................................................................... $ 200,586,600.00
III. EXECUTIVE
1. Constitutional and Quasi-Judicial Offices
1. Attorney General and Reporter
1.1 Attorney General and Reporter ............................................. $ 52,724,300.00
1.2 Publication of Tennessee Reports ......................................... 405,600.00
1.3 Special Litigation ................................................................... 4,289,700.00
Total Attorney General and Reporter ..................................... $ 57,419,600.00
2. District Attorneys General Conference
2.1 District Attorneys General...................................................... $ 154,772,400.00
2.2 Executive Director ................................................................. 5,514,600.00
Total District Attorneys General Conference ......................... $ 160,287,000.00
3. Secretary of State
3.1 Secretary of State ................................................................. $ 20,415,400.00
3.2 State Election Commission .................................................... 1,636,100.00
3.3 Public Documents ................................................................. 516,700.00
3.4 State Library and Archives .................................................... 16,299,900.00
3.5 Regional Library System ...................................................... 10,621,600.00
3.6 Bureau of Ethics and Campaign Finance .............................. 1,397,600.00
Total Secretary of State…………………………………………$ 50,887,300.00
4. District Public Defenders Conference
- 2 - 003682

4.1 District Public Defenders ....................................................... $ 84,302,100.00
4.2 Executive Director ................................................................. 3,950,500.00
4.3 Shelby County Public Defender ............................................. 6,772,300.00
4.4 Davidson County Public Defender ......................................... 2,959,700.00
Total District Public Defenders Conference ........................... $ 97,984,600.00
5. Comptroller of the Treasury
5.1 Administration Support Services............................................ $ 2,043,500.00
5.2 Office of Management Services ............................................ 4,291,700.00
5.3 Division of State Audit ........................................................... 21,971,000.00
5.4 Division of Local Government Audit ....................................... 15,104,000.00
5.5 Communications and Public Affairs Office ............................. 1,014,300.00
5.6 Office of State Government Finance ..................................... 878,100.00
5.7 Division of Property Assessments ......................................... 13,094,600.00
5.8 Tax Relief .............................................................................. 41,265,100.00
5.9 State Board of Equalization ................................................... 1,715,600.00
5.10 Office of Research and Education Accountability .................. 1,845,900.00
5.11 Office of State Assessed Properties ...................................... 1,910,600.00
5.12 Division of Technology Solutions ........................................... 11,459,300.00
5.13 Division of Investigations ....................................................... 6,210,600.00
5.14 Division of Local Government Finance .................................. 1,969,900.00
5.15 Office of General Counsel ..................................................... 1,668,800.00
Total Comptroller of the Treasury .......................................... $ 126,443,000.00
6. Office of the Post-Conviction Defender ........................................... $ 4,219,200.00
7. Treasury Department
7.1 Treasury Department ............................................................ $ 79,860,700.00
7.2 Certified Public Administrators .............................................. 407,300.00
7.3 TN Stars College Savings 529 Program ................................ 920,800.00
7.4 Electronic Monitoring Indigency Fund .................................... 210,500.00
Total Treasury Department .................................................... $ 81,399,300.00
8. Claims and Compensation
8.1 Criminal Injuries Compensation ............................................. $ 12,072,500.00
8.2 Unclaimed Property ............................................................... 8,287,500.00
Total Claims and Compensation ........................................... $ 20,360,000.00
Total Title III-1 ......................................................... $ 599,000,000.00
The appropriation made under Title III-1, Item 8.1, may be increased or decreased as
realized receipts of the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund justify, subject to the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51. To the
extent that receipts of the fund are insufficient to meet the fund's expenditure requirements,
there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to support such expenditures.
2. Executive Offices
1. Executive Department
1.1 Governor's Office .................................................................. $ 7,192,600.00
- 3 - 003682

Total Executive Department .................................................. $ 7,192,600.00
2. Commissions
2.1 Commission on Children and Youth ...................................... $ 5,811,900.00
2.2 Human Rights Commission ................................................... 2,744,200.00
2.3 Health Facilities Commission ................................................ 34,960,300.00
2.4 Corrections Institute .............................................................. 7,814,000.00
2.5 Tennessee Public Utility Commission .................................... 8,631,200.00
2.6 Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations .......... 163,000.00
2.7 Council on Developmental Disabilities ................................... 577,100.00
2.8 Sports Wagering Advisory Council ........................................ 6,835,500.00
2.9 Arts Commission ................................................................... 13,560,900.00
2.10 State Museum ....................................................................... 14,583,000.00
2.11 Inmate Disciplinary Oversight Board ..................................... 2,033,200.00
2.12 Tennessee Housing Development Agency ............................ 60,000,000.00
Total Commissions ................................................................ $ 157,714,300.00
3. Department of Finance and Administration
3.1 Division of Administration ...................................................... $ 4,588,500.00
3.2 Strategic Technology Solutions (STS) Operations ................. 1,796,800.00
3.3 Division of Accounts .............................................................. 4,746,700.00
3.4 Division of Budget ................................................................. 6,077,200.00
3.5 Criminal Justice Programs..................................................... 37,766,200.00
3.6 Volunteer Tennessee ............................................................ 463,600.00
3.7 Vehicle Tag and Analogous Fees .......................................... 4,000,000.00
3.8 Office of Evidence and Impact ............................................... 3,935,700.00
Total Department of Finance and Administration ................... $ 63,374,700.00
4. Department of General Services
4.1 Real Estate Asset Management ............................................ $ 8,411,000.00
4.2 Printing and Media Services .................................................. 980,100.00
4.3 Governor's Early Literacy Foundation .................................... 14,454,000.00
4.4 State Facilities Pre-Planning ................................................. 1,086,200.00
4.5 Statewide Capital Maintenance ............................................. 40,191,100.00
4.6 Motor Vehicle Management ................................................... 2,188,500.00
4.7 Postal Services ..................................................................... 81,500.00
4.8 Distribution Center ................................................................ 10,000.00
4.9 Megasite Authority of West Tennessee ................................. 1,046,600.00
4.10 Megasite Water and Wastewater Authority ............................ 2,500,000.00
4.11 Multi-Agency Law Enforcement Training Academy ............... 2,967,700.00
Total Department of General Services .................................. $ 73,916,700.00
5. Department of Veterans Services
5.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 9,200,700.00
5.2 Tennessee State Veterans Cemeteries ................................. 4,329,100.00
Total Department of Veterans Services ................................. $ 13,529,800.00
Total Title III-2 ......................................................... $ 315,728,100.00
3. Department of Agriculture
- 4 - 003682

1. Administration and Grants .............................................................. $ 178,966,100.00
2. Consumer and Industry Services .................................................... 7,023,300.00
3. Business Development ................................................................... 3,277,200.00
4. Agricultural Resources Conservation Fund ..................................... 7,187,500.00
5. Forestry Operations ........................................................................ 32,773,300.00
6. Forestry Maintenance ..................................................................... 1,000,000.00
7. Certified Cotton Growers' Organization Fund ................................. 250,000.00
8. Agricultural Regulatory Fund .......................................................... 12,432,700.00
9. Animal Health ................................................................................ 5,304,200.00
10. Technical Services ......................................................................... 7,027,100.00
Total Title III-3 ......................................................... $ 255,241,400.00
4. Department of Tourist Development
1. Administration and Marketing ......................................................... $ 45,139,900.00
2. Welcome Centers ........................................................................... 3,090,000.00
Total Title III-4 ......................................................... $ 48,229,900.00
5. Department of Environment and Conservation
1. Administrative Services .................................................................. $ 20,844,600.00
2. Recreation Educational Services .................................................... 911,600.00
3. Archaeology ................................................................................... 1,661,400.00
4. Geology .......................................................................................... 848,700.00
5. Tennessee State Parks .................................................................. 86,742,900.00
6. State Parks Maintenance................................................................ 12,729,100.00
7. Natural Areas ................................................................................ 2,342,400.00
8. Historical Commission .................................................................... 4,257,800.00
9. Maintenance of Historic Sites ......................................................... 455,300.00
10. West Tennessee River Basin Authority ........................................... 2,343,600.00
11. West Tennessee River Basin Authority Maintenance ..................... 1,615,500.00
12. Environment Administration ............................................................ 1,275,700.00
13. Used Oil Collection Program .......................................................... 1,392,000.00
14. Tennessee Dry Cleaners Environmental Response Fund............... 1,955,900.00
15. Air Pollution Control ........................................................................ 4,288,000.00
16. Radiological Health......................................................................... 3,442,900.00
17. Division of Water Resources .......................................................... 53,370,600.00
18. Solid Waste Management ............................................................... 3,121,700.00
19. Abandoned Lands .......................................................................... 580,900.00
20. Hazardous Waste Remedial Action Fund ....................................... 6,762,500.00
21. Underground Storage Tanks .......................................................... 27,028,400.00
22. Solid Waste Assistance ................................................................. 7,758,700.00
23. Environmental Protection Fund....................................................... 65,394,100.00
24. Clean Water and Drinking Water State Revolving Fund ................. 20,789,200.00
25. Office of Sustainable Practices ....................................................... 1,985,600.00
26. Office of Energy Programs ............................................................. 1,603,300.00
27. State Facility Utility Management .................................................... 348,500.00
- 5 - 003682

28. State Lands Compensation Fund ................................................... 345,000.00
29. Conservation Compensation Fund ................................................. 12,000.00
30. Local Parks Acquisition Fund ......................................................... 5,218,700.00
31. State Lands Acquisition Fund ......................................................... 3,067,500.00
32. Division of Mineral and Geologic Resources................................... 1,386,200.00
Total Title III-5 ......................................................... $ 345,920,300.00
6. Tennessee Wildlife Resources Agency
1. Wildlife Resources Agency ............................................................. $ 83,557,700.00
2. Boating Safety ................................................................................ 12,058,700.00
3. Wetlands Acquisition Fund ............................................................. 15,838,000.00
4. Wetlands Compensation Fund ....................................................... 555,900.00
Total Title III-6 ......................................................... $ 112,010,300.00
The appropriation made under Title III-6 may be increased or decreased as realized
receipts of the Wildlife Resources Fund justify, subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51.
7. Department of Correction
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 80,637,100.00
2. Office of Investigations and Conduct .............................................. 13,170,100.00
3. Correction Academy ....................................................................... 8,246,600.00
4. Probation and Parole Field Supervision .......................................... 133,784,600.00
5. Community Corrections .................................................................. 14,795,500.00
6. Sex Offender Treatment Program ................................................... 3,030,200.00
7. State Prosecutions ......................................................................... 172,877,800.00
8. Correction Release Centers ........................................................... 1,103,700.00
9. Debra K. Johnson Rehabilitation Center ......................................... 44,371,100.00
10. Turney Center Industrial Complex .................................................. 67,112,800.00
11. Mark Luttrell Transition Center ....................................................... 23,650,500.00
12. Bledsoe County Correctional Complex ........................................... 111,013,400.00
13. West Tennessee State Penitentiary ................................................ 116,509,700.00
14. Riverbend Maximum Security Institution ......................................... 50,753,100.00
15. Northeast Correctional Complex ..................................................... 69,108,900.00
16. Northwest Correctional Complex .................................................... 94,419,800.00
17. Morgan County Correctional Complex ............................................ 105,968,000.00
18. Lois M. DeBerry Special Needs Facility .......................................... 78,242,600.00
19. Hardeman County Incarceration Agreement ................................... 57,830,800.00
20. Hardeman County Agreement – Whiteville ..................................... 51,484,000.00
21. South Central Correctional Facility ................................................. 55,697,200.00
22. Trousdale County Incarceration Agreement ................................... 85,695,300.00
23. Community Rehabilitative Services ................................................ 25,465,200.00
24. Major Maintenance ......................................................................... 9,851,100.00
25. Operating Funds for Imprisonment Changes .................................. 1,285,000.00
Total Title III-7 ......................................................... $ 1,476,104,100.00
- 6 - 003682

8. Department of Economic and Community Development
1. Administrative Services .................................................................. $ 8,921,800.00
2. Business Development ................................................................... 56,788,000.00
3. Innovation Programs ...................................................................... 6,460,400.00
4. Policy and Federal Programs ......................................................... 720,300.00
5. Economic Development District Grants .......................................... 2,080,000.00
6. FastTrack Infrastructure and Job Training Assistance .................... 25,002,400.00
7. Film and Television Incentive Fund ................................................ 10,668,300.00
8. Community and Rural Development ............................................... 18,466,500.00
9. Broadband Accessibility ................................................................. 317,500.00
Total Title III-8 ......................................................... $ 129,425,200.00
9. Department of Education
1. Administrative Services
1.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 21,864,900.00
1.2 State Board of Education ...................................................... 3,290,400.00
1.3 Charter School Commission .................................................. 4,702,000.00
1.4 Textbook Commission ........................................................... 900,600.00
1.5 Education Freedom Scholarship Program ............................. 148,600,000.00
2. Pre-Kindergarten, Kindergarten, Elementary, and Secondary
2.1 State Programs
a. Centers of Regional Excellence (CORE) .......................... 90,450,800.00
b. Career Ladder .................................................................. 206,058,900.00
c. Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement (TISA) .... 6,970,128,000.00
d. Driver Education ............................................................... 1,700,000.00
e. Academic Offices ............................................................. 55,325,300.00
f. Grants-in-Aid .................................................................... 31,192,500.00
g. Technology, Infrastructure, and Support Systems ............ 6,694,800.00
h. Data and Research .......................................................... 32,415,600.00
i. Early Childhood Education ................................................ 106,751,700.00
j. Non-Public Education Choice Programs ............................ 29,229,300.00
k. After-School Programs Special Account (Lottery-Funded) 19,332,600.00
2.2 Federally Funded and Supported Programs
a. Improving Schools Program ............................................. 3,415,700.00
b. School Nutrition Program ................................................. 4,836,300.00
c. Special Education Services .............................................. 1,208,300.00
d. ESSA and Federal Programs ........................................... 1,378,900.00
3. College, Career and Technical Education ....................................... 13,523,000.00
4. Special Schools
4.1 Alvin C. York Institute ............................................................ 8,390,200.00
4.2 Tennessee School for the Blind ............................................. 19,937,400.00
- 7 - 003682

4.3 Tennessee School for the Deaf ............................................. 26,117,600.00
4.4 West Tennessee School for the Deaf .................................... 4,148,700.00
4.5 Major Maintenance ................................................................ 239,100.00
Total Title III-9 ..................................................................... $ 7,811,832,600.00
10. Higher Education
1. Administration and Support Services
1.1 Tennessee Higher Education Commission ............................ $ 7,602,800.00
1.2 Contract Education ................................................................ 2,369,200.00
1.3 Tennessee Student Assistance Awards ................................ 125,262,500.00
1.4 Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation .......................... 3,095,800.00
1.5 Loan/Scholarship Programs .................................................. 1,052,500.00
1.6 THEC Grants......................................................................... 19,661,200.00
1.7 Lottery for Education Account (Lottery-Funded) .................... 504,800,000.00
1.8 Higher Education Capital Maintenance.................................. 50,000,000.00
2. Excellence Initiatives
2.1 Academic Scholars Program ................................................. 1,211,800.00
2.2 Centers of Excellence ........................................................... 21,322,700.00
2.3 Campus Centers of Emphasis ............................................... 1,544,900.00
Total Administration and Support Services
and Excellence Initiatives .................................................... $ 737,923,400.00
3. University of Tennessee System
3.1 Administrative and Other Services
a. UT University-Wide Administration ................................. $ 8,204,700.00
b. UT Institute for Public Service ........................................ 7,310,900.00
c. UT Municipal Technical Advisory Service ....................... 5,017,900.00
d. UT County Technical Assistance Service ....................... 4,443,700.00
e. UT Access and Diversity Initiative .................................. 5,806,700.00
f. UT Space Institute ......................................................... 11,335,700.00
g. UT Research Initiatives .................................................. 5,852,900.00
h. Tennessee Foreign Language Center ............................ 1,119,000.00
3.2 Agricultural Services
a. UT Agricultural Experiment Station ................................ 38,328,100.00
b. UT Agricultural Extension Service .................................. 53,161,100.00
c. UT Veterinary Medicine .................................................. 35,733,900.00
3.3 Medical Education
a. UT Health Science Center.............................................. 233,124,900.00
3.4 University Campuses
a. UT Chattanooga ............................................................. 85,074,800.00
b. UT Knoxville ................................................................... 379,205,700.00
c. UT Martin ....................................................................... 49,682,800.00
d. UT Southern .................................................................. 6,565,700.00
- 8 - 003682

Total University of Tennessee System .................................. $ 929,968,500.00
4. Tennessee Board of Regents System
4.1 Administration and Other Services
a. Tennessee Board of Regents ........................................... $ 35,570,300.00
b. Regents Access and Diversity Initiative ............................ 10,256,900.00
4.2 Medical Education
a. ETSU College of Medicine ............................................... 52,481,300.00
b. ETSU Family Practice ...................................................... 11,351,000.00
c. ETSU College of Pharmacy .............................................. 2,880,000.00
4.3 Locally Governed Institutions
a. Austin Peay State University ............................................ 78,939,800.00
b. East Tennessee State University ...................................... 106,964,900.00
c. University of Memphis ...................................................... 185,902,600.00
d. Middle Tennessee State University .................................. 150,168,600.00
e. Tennessee State University .............................................. 55,155,200.00
f. Tennessee Technological University ................................ 89,996,200.00
4.4 Tennessee Community Colleges ........................................... 406,805,200.00
4.5 Tennessee Colleges of Applied Technology .......................... 123,587,600.00
4.6 Agricultural Centers
a. TSU McMinnville Center ................................................... 1,595,900.00
b. TSU Institute of Agricultural and
Environmental Research .................................................. 6,019,900.00
c. TSU Cooperative Education ............................................. 6,242,700.00
d. TSU McIntire-Stennis Forestry Research ......................... 233,100.00
Total Tennessee Board of Regents System ........................ $ 1,324,151,200.00
Total Title III-10 ....................................................... $ 2,992,043,100.00
11. Department of Commerce and Insurance
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 2,467,300.00
2. Cemetery Consumer Protection Fund ............................................ 361,200.00
3. Pre-Need Funeral State Administrative Fund.................................. 350,100.00
4. Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy ............................. 4,832,200.00
5. Fire Fighting Personnel Standards and Education .......................... 9,960,900.00
6. Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) Commission ........... 15,145,200.00
7. Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy ............................ 5,552,400.00
8. 911 Emergency Communications Fund .......................................... 159,155,100.00
9. Regulatory Boards .......................................................................... 26,497,700.00
9.1 Real Estate Education and Recovery Fund ........................... 297,500.00
9.2 Auctioneer Education and Recovery Fund ............................ 82,800.00
10. Fire Prevention ............................................................................... 553,400.00
- 9 - 003682

11. Insurance ................................................................................ 2,930,800.00
Total Title III-11 ....................................................... $ 228,186,600.00
12. Department of Financial Institutions ...................................... $ 35,542,900.00
Total Title III-12 ...................................................... $ 35,542,900.00
13. Department of Labor and Workforce Development
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 6,478,700.00
2. Tennessee Occupational Safety and
Health Administration .................................................................... 7,465,700.00
3. Mines ............................................................................................. 333,400.00
4. Boilers, Elevators, and Amusement Devices .................................. 9,191,100.00
5. Labor Standards ............................................................................. 1,810,000.00
6. Workers' Compensation ................................................................. 19,914,400.00
7. Workers' Compensation Employee Misclassification ...................... 1,686,700.00
8. Subsequent Injury and Vocational Recovery Fund ......................... 9,082,500.00
9. Adult Basic Education ..................................................................... 17,067,400.00
10. Unemployment Insurance ............................................................... 456,400.00
11. Workforce Services ........................................................................ 16,230,800.00
Total Title III-13 ....................................................... $ 89,717,100.00
14. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
1. Administrative Services Division ..................................................... $ 27,889,700.00
2. Mental Health Services
2.1 Middle Tennessee Mental Health Institute ............................. 49,344,800.00
2.2 Western Mental Health Institute ............................................ 35,670,100.00
2.3 Moccasin Bend Mental Health Institute.................................. 39,280,700.00
2.4 Memphis Mental Health Institute ........................................... 17,821,500.00
2.5 Community Mental Health Services ....................................... 174,344,500.00
2.6 Major Maintenance ................................................................ 900,000.00
3. Community Substance Abuse Services .......................................... 91,205,900.00
Total Title III-14 ....................................................... $ 436,457,200.00
15. Department of Military
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 6,341,400.00
2. Army National Guard ...................................................................... 3,084,500.00
3. Air National Guard .......................................................................... 3,501,700.00
4. Tennessee Emergency Management Agency ................................ 17,488,600.00
5. TEMA Disaster Relief Grants .......................................................... 4,000,000.00
6. Armories Utilities ............................................................................ 1,400,600.00
7. Armories Maintenance .................................................................... 1,500,000.00
- 10 - 003682

8. Station Commanders Upkeep and Maintenance Fund .................... 150,000.00
9. STRONG Act of 2017 ..................................................................... 4,084,000.00
10. STORM Act ................................................................................ 539,000.00
Total Title III-15 ....................................................... $ 42,089,800.00
16. Department of Health
1. Administration
1.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 26,869,800.00
1.2 Public Health Policy, Planning, and Informatics ..................... 12,220,700.00
2. Manpower Resources and Facilities
2.1 Health Licensure and Regulation........................................... 1,683,700.00
2.2 Emergency Medical Services ................................................ 7,619,200.00
2.3 Laboratory Services .............................................................. 15,255,500.00
2.4 Health Related Boards .......................................................... 30,883,200.00
3. Community Health Services
3.1 Environmental Health ............................................................ 13,841,000.00
3.2 Family Health and Wellness .................................................. 23,939,300.00
3.3 Communicable and Environmental Disease
and Emergency Preparedness .............................................. 33,673,300.00
3.4 Community and Medical Services ......................................... 46,967,500.00
4. Health Services .............................................................................. 155,041,600.00
Total Title III-16 ....................................................... $ 367,994,800.00
17. Department of Human Services
1. Administration
1.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 83,883,400.00
1.2 County Rentals ...................................................................... 9,377,100.00
1.3 Appeals and Hearings ........................................................... 5,493,400.00
2. Family Assistance Services
2.1 Child Support ........................................................................ 26,153,500.00
2.2 Family Assistance Services ................................................... 113,766,700.00
2.3 Temporary Cash Assistance ................................................. 1,027,200.00
2.4 Child Care Benefits ............................................................... 14,000,000.00
3. Community Services ....................................................................... 35,694,100.00
4. Rehabilitative Services
4.1 Rehabilitation Services .......................................................... 17,980,200.00
Total Title III-17 ....................................................... $ 307,375,600.00
- 11 - 003682

18. Department of Revenue
1. Administration Division ................................................................... $ 10,085,600.00
2. Collection Services ......................................................................... 9,623,800.00
3. Tennessee Revenue Registration and Reporting System ............... 16,225,000.00
4. Taxpayer Services Division ............................................................ 15,314,600.00
5. Processing Division ........................................................................ 4,577,700.00
6. Audit Division ................................................................................ 32,490,500.00
7. Anti-Theft Unit ............................................................................... 2,829,000.00
8. Sales Tax Disaster Relief ............................................................... 250,000.00
9. Tax Refund Interest Expense ......................................................... 2,500,000.00
10. Vehicle Services Division................................................................ 26,501,200.00
11. Computerized Title and Registration System .................................. 7,172,300.00
12. Insurance Verification ..................................................................... 3,392,500.00
Total Title III-18 ....................................................... $ 130,962,200.00
19. Tennessee Bureau of Investigation ....................................... $ 116,883,300.00
Total Title III-19 ....................................................... $ 116,883,300.00
20. Department of Safety
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 23,122,600.00
2. Driver License Issuance ................................................................. 36,282,800.00
3. Highway Patrol ............................................................................... 277,846,000.00
4. Office of Homeland Security ........................................................... 165,613,500.00
5. Driver Education ............................................................................. 340,100.00
6. Motorcycle Rider Education ............................................................ 561,000.00
7. Communications ............................................................................. 23,053,000.00
8. Tennessee Highway Safety Office .................................................. 255,300.00
Total Title III-20 ....................................................... $ 527,074,300.00
21. Department of Finance and Administration,
Strategic Health-Care Programs
1. CoverKids ....................................................................................... $ 46,388,700.00
2. CoverRx ......................................................................................... 8,889,600.00
Total Title III-21 ....................................................... $ 55,278,300.00
22. Miscellaneous Appropriations
1. State Employee Benefits
1.1 State Employees' Unemployment
Compensation, Sick Leave, Death Benefit
Payments and Terminal Leave Payments ............................. $ 200,000.00
1.2 Public Employees in the Military… Sick Leave
in Lieu of Annual Leave ........................................................ 50,000.00
- 12 - 003682

2. Consolidated Retirement System and Insurance
2.1 Former Governors and Widows of Former
Governors – Pensions ........................................................... 650,000.00
2.2 Retirees Health Insurance .................................................... 25,340,000.00
2.3 Retired Teachers Insurance ................................................. 21,540,000.00
2.4 TCRS – Retirement Contribution Rate
Increase ................................................................................ 2,564,500.00
2.5 Hybrid Retirement Plan Conversion ...................................... 74,939,800.00
3. Group Health Insurance
3.1 Long-Term Disability Claims Processing Fee ........................ 700,000.00
3.2 Group Health Insurance – State Employees .......................... 15,406,800.00
3.3 Group Health Insurance – State Employees –
1/1/25 ................................................................................ 9,013,900.00
4. State Employee Compensation
4.1 TEAM Act – Performance Bonus Pool ................................... 32,790,300.00
4.2 TEAM Act – Performance Pay Pool ....................................... 58,726,500.00
4.3 Non-TEAM Act – Salary Pool ................................................ 13,737,000.00
4.4 Market Rate Adjustment ........................................................ 106,000.00
5. Attorney's Fees – Civil Rights Cases .............................................. 500,000.00
6. Special Election Reimbursement to Counties ................................. 2,000,000.00
7. Intergovernmental Conference Dues .............................................. 750,000.00
8. Statewide Rate Adjustments
8.1 MVM – Purchase of New Vehicles ........................................ 5,000,000.00
8.2 FRF Rent Adjustment ............................................................ 124,000.00
8.3 STS – MyTN.Gov Implementation ......................................... 2,500,000.00
8.4 Risk Management ................................................................. 9,100,000.00
8.5 Internal Service Fund Billings ................................................ 5,000,000.00
8.6 Enterprise Data Analytics ...................................................... 1,399,700.00
8.7 STS – Process Automation and Efficiencies .......................... 5,000,000.00
8.8 STS – Continued Transition to Cloud .................................... 1,350,000.00
8.9 IT Support and Maintenance ................................................. 1,000,000.00
8.10 STS Web Application Firewall ............................................... 651,000.00
8.11 STS – Cloud Billing ............................................................... 2,750,200.00
8.12 STS – BSD Cloud Optimization Support................................ 620,000.00
8.13 ERP – Grants Management Application Implementation Support 796,700.00
8.14 Policy Management Software ................................................ 1,000,000.00
8.15 STS – Security Enhancements .............................................. 3,016,300.00
8.16 STS – ERP Modernization Initial Phase ................................ 5,000,000.00
8.17 STS – Artificial Intelligence Enablement Program ................. 1,150,000.00
8.18 STS – Business Gateway ...................................................... 3,000,000.00
8.19 STS – ADA Compliance ........................................................ 5,000,000.00
8.20 STS – Data Center Operations .............................................. 4,120,000.00
8.21 STS – North Data Center Relocation ..................................... 40,000,000.00
8.22 STS – TNTrack Enhancements ............................................. 750,000.00
8.23 STS – Microsoft Office 365 License Agreement .................... 3,838,700.00
8.24 Unified Communications A/V Contract .................................. 186,000.00
- 13 - 003682

8.25 Enterprise Communications and Analytics Tool Licensing ..... 169,300.00
9. Grants
9.1 Criminal Justice Programs .................................................... 693,500.00
9.2 Tennessee Association of Rescue Squads ........................... 100,000.00
9.3 Volunteer Rescue Squad $25,000 Death Benefit.................. 25,000.00
9.4 Emergency Responder Death Benefit (2017 PC 408) .......... 25,000.00
9.5 Death Benefit for Certain First Responders (2017 PC 445) .. 75,000.00
9.6 Health Insurance for Immediate Family Members of
First Responders (2017 PC 476) .......................................... 8,400.00
9.7 Death Benefit for Firefighters – Leukemia/Testicular
Cancer in Line of Duty (2022 PC 1091) ................................ 50,000.00
9.8 YMCA Youth Legislature ...................................................... 25,000.00
9.9 YMCA Community Action Program....................................... 350,000.00
9.10 Forensic Center at Quillen College of Medicine .................... 100,000.00
9.11 UT CBER – Research Assistance ........................................ 180,000.00
9.12 UT CBER – State Census Data Center ................................ 300,000.00
9.13 Civil Rights Museum ............................................................. 250,000.00
9.14 Swipe and Ride Benefit ........................................................ 500,000.00
9.15 American Battle Monuments Commission –
Maintenance of Tennessee World War I
Monuments in France ......................................................... 3,500.00
9.16 Motor Vehicle Registration Fee Exemption for
Volunteer Fire Fighters and Rescue Squad
Members ............................................................................. 17,800.00
9.17 National Foundation for Women Legislators .......................... 15,000.00
9.18 Legal Expenses ..................................................................... 1,000,000.00
9.19 Pharmacy Benefits ................................................................. 277,200.00
9.20 STS – Cybersecurity for Local Governments ......................... 2,000,000.00
9.21 Electronic Work Papers for Audit ........................................... 365,500.00
9.22 OCJP – Grants to Local Government –
AFIS ................................................................................ 1,500,000.00
9.23 Support New Online Learning System ................................... 357,200.00
9.24 Breast Examination Coverage ............................................... 18,700.00
9.25 Firefighters – Leukemia/Testicular Cancer
Insurance Coverage (2022 PC 1091) ..................................... 10,000.00
9.26 Pharmacy Benefits Managers – Local
Education Plan .................................................................... 2,136,300.00
9.27 Pharmacy Benefits Managers – State and
Higher Education Plan ........................................................ 1,840,900.00
9.28 THP Retirees Insurance Premium/Defined
Contribution ........................................................................ 400,000.00
9.29 TWRA and TBI Commissioned Officer
Insurance Premium/Defined Contribution ............................ 400,000.00
9.30 The Faith Based and Community Initiatives
Foundation – Grant ............................................................. 1,487,000.00
9.31 Line of Duty Health Insurance Claims .................................... 191,600.00
9.32 Governor's Rural Education Foundation –
Grant ................................................................................ 18,091,600.00
- 14 - 003682

9.33 2023 PC 379 – Diagnostic Imaging and
Supplemental Breast Screening .......................................... 435,100.00
9.34 Duck River Regionalization .................................................... 100,000,000.00
9.35 Public Safety Crime Prevention Grants .................................. 175,000,000.00
9.36 Memphis Zoo Grant ............................................................... 20,000,000.00
9.37 Nashville Zoo Grant ............................................................... 20,000,000.00
9.38 Tennessee Performing Arts Center Grant .............................. 250,000,000.00
9.39 East Tennessee iLab Innovation Center Grant....................... 5,000,000.00
9.40 City of Maryville – Alexander Science Institute
Grant ................................................................................ 12,000,000.00
10. Amendment and Legislation
10.1 Administration Amendment ................................................... 8,000,000.00
10.2 Legislative Initiatives ............................................................. 8,000,000.00
10.3 PC 978 – Substance Abuse .................................................. 581,600.00
10.4 PC 512 – Transportation of Mental Health Patients ............... 4,000,000.00
10.5 PC 1021 – Uniform Administrative Procedures
Act Revision .......................................................................... 10,000.00
10.6 PC 470 – Pharmacy Benefit Managers.................................. 137,300.00
10.7 PC 460 – Statutory Pay Schedule Fiscal Note
Reconciliation ........................................................................ 1,363,600.00
10.8 PC 216 – State Employee Benefits ....................................... 6,531,700.00
10.9 PC 988 – AI Advisory Committee Travel
Reimbursement ..................................................................... 9,500.00
Total Title III-22 ….................................................... $ 1,005,399,700.00
23. Department of Children's Services
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 72,303,000.00
2. Family Support Services ................................................................. 74,450,400.00
3. Custody Services ........................................................................... 234,086,200.00
4. Needs Assessment......................................................................... 34,171,000.00
5. Adoption Services .......................................................................... 74,458,800.00
6. Child and Family Management ....................................................... 170,647,900.00
7. John S. Wilder Youth Development Center .................................... 17,507,900.00
8. Major Maintenance ......................................................................... 500,000.00
Total Title III-23 ....................................................... $ 678,125,200.00
24. Board of Parole ..................................................................... $ 12,575,100.00
Total Title III-24 ....................................................... $ 12,575,100.00
25. Department of Disability and Aging
1. Intellectual Disabilities Services Administration .............................. $ 3,545,200.00
2. Community Intellectual Disabilities Services ................................... 62,534,700.00
3. Protection from Harm ..................................................................... 645,500.00
- 15 - 003682

4. Harold Jordan Center ..................................................................... 6,476,500.00
5. West Tennessee Regional Office ................................................... 1,629,500.00
6. Middle Tennessee Regional Office ................................................. 1,262,900.00
7. East Tennessee Regional Office .................................................... 1,001,000.00
8. Seating and Positioning Clinics ...................................................... 4,081,300.00
9. West Tennessee Community Homes.............................................. 35,300.00
10. Middle Tennessee Community Homes ........................................... 95,900.00
11. East Tennessee Community Homes .............................................. 248,400.00
12. Major Maintenance ......................................................................... 500,000.00
13. Tennessee Early Intervention System ............................................ 61,961,900.00
14. Commission on Aging and Disability ............................................... 41,716,600.00
Total Title III-25 ....................................................... $ 185,734,700.00
26. Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of TennCare
1. TennCare Administration ................................................................ $ 207,300,300.00
2. TennCare Medical Services ............................................................ 4,796,628,000.00
3. Supplemental Payments ................................................................. 306,140,500.00
4. Intellectual Disabilities Services ...................................................... 437,040,200.00
5. Medicare Services .......................................................................... 607,596,600.00
Total Title III-26 ....................................................... $ 6,354,705,600.00
27. Emergency and Contingency Fund ....................................... $ 1,000,000.00
Total Title III-27 ....................................................... $ 1,000,000.00
The Emergency and Contingency Fund may be used for any purpose authorized by law
to be allowed on Executive Order of the Governor; provided, however, the Emergency and
Contingency Fund shall not be used to fund any law requiring the expenditure of state funds
unless an appropriation is made elsewhere for the estimated first year's funding.
28. Other Post-Employment Benefits Liability .............................. $ 4,460,000.00
Total Title III-28 ....................................................... $ 4,460,000.00
29. Facilities Revolving Fund
1. Facilities Operations ....................................................................... $ 7,518,000.00
2. Leases and Space Planning ........................................................... 4,784,000.00
Total Title III-29 ....................................................... $ 12,302,000.00
30. Department of Transportation
There is hereby appropriated for the use of the Department of Transportation such
receipts of highway revenues as are now provided by law, or may hereafter be so provided, to
accrue to that department during the fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, to be expended by the
Commissioner of Transportation, all according to the following schedule:
- 16 - 003682

2025-2026
1. Headquarters ................................................................................ $ 26,813,400.00
2. Bureau of Administration ................................................................ 104,050,500.00
3. Bureau of Operations ..................................................................... 1,633,311,500.00
4. Bureau of Engineering .................................................................... 362,253,400.00
5. Bureau of Planning ......................................................................... 279,251,000.00
Total Title III-30 ....................................................... $ 2,405,679,800.00
Grand Total ............................................................. $ 27,363,513,700.00
Said funds so appropriated shall be obligated and expended under the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51. There
is further appropriated to the Department of Transportation such departmental revenue,
expressly including federal matching funds, as may accrue to the department.
The "Proposed Highway Program for Fiscal Year 2025-2026", prepared by the
Department of Transportation as a supplement to and as "Supporting Data for the Budget
Request," is hereby incorporated into and made a part of the Appropriations Act.
Whenever a determination is made that one or more of the projects in the approved
program cannot be proceeded with, the Commissioner of Transportation shall furnish, in written
form as prescribed by the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means Committees of the Senate
and House and the Chairs of the Transportation Committees of the Senate and House, the
reasons for such proposed cancellation or rescheduling of said project, together with a
recommendation for a substitute project. The notice of cancellation or rescheduling of said
project shall be submitted to the Speaker of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means Committees of the Senate and
House, the Chairs of the Transportation Committees of the Senate and House and to the
individual Senator and Representative in whose districts the canceled project or proposed
substitution is located.
From the funds appropriated above in Item 3, Bureau of Operations, the sum of
$9,540,000 is allocated for the purpose of funding the state's eighty percent (80%) share of the
project cost of the 1990 Bridge Grant Program. For the fiscal 2025-2026 budget, the state shall
fund an eighty percent (80%) share of this program and local governments shall be responsible
for funding the remaining twenty percent (20%), as set forth in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title
54, Chapter 4, Part 5.
For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the Commissioner of Transportation shall
distribute this money among the ninety-five (95) county geographical areas of the state
according to the following formula:
One-half of the funds shall be distributed equally, and one-half shall be distributed on the
basis of structural needs. Structural needs shall be determined by calculating the ratio of linear
feet of bridges with a load rating of less than ten tons, in each county geographical area, located
on public roads other than those on a federal-aid system or the state system of highways, to the
total linear feet of like bridges in the state.
- 17 - 003682

31. State Funding Board
There is hereby appropriated to the State Funding Board for interest and reduction of the
state debt, for debt service expense and interest on proposed bond authorization:
2025-2026
1. Interest on State Debt ..................................................................... $ 54,947,000.00
2. Retirement of Bonds ....................................................................... 155,638,000.00
3. Debt Service Expense .................................................................... 3,500,000.00
4. Short Term Interest......................................................................... 4,000,000.00
5. Amortization of Authorized and Unissued Construction Bonds ....... 92,544,000.00
6. Amortization of Authorized and Unissued Highway Bonds .............. 80,000,000.00
Total Title III-31 ....................................................... $ 390,629,000.00
The appropriation made under Section 1, Title III-31, Items 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6 is made
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 9, and may be increased
to such amounts as will be necessary to carry out such provisions.
32. Capital Outlay
There is hereby appropriated to each of the departments and agencies enumerated
herein, funds for major maintenance, equipment, construction, and acquisition of land, and for
expansion, improvement, betterments, and repairs to existing structures. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to transfer the amounts herein appropriated to
the Capital Projects Fund for the use of the said departments and agencies.
1. Department of Environment and Conservation ............................... $ 48,500,000.00
2. Department of Military .................................................................... 17,273,000.00
3. Tennessee Board of Regents ......................................................... 45,000,000.00
4. Facilities Revolving Fund ................................................................ 3,500,000.00
Total Title III-32 ....................................................... $ 114,273,000.00
Said funds herein appropriated shall be used solely for improvements, betterments, and
additions to state structures and for the acquisition of additional land and space, including the
purchase of existing structures and grants, as described or referred to above and as approved
by the State Building Commission; provided, further, that such funds as are appropriated herein
shall be utilized to finance only those projects, improvements, betterments, or additions which
are presented in the State of Tennessee's 2025-2026 Budget Document, as amended by any
changes or additional projects contained in the Appropriations Act as passed on third and final
consideration; provided, further, that all funds appropriated in this act or other general acts of
this session for capital outlay shall be subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Title 4, Chapter 15, Part 1.
33. Capital Outlay - Sinking Fund
- 18 - 003682

There is hereby appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, to the Sinking
Fund from the receipts of the tax levied by Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 4, Part
20, "The Excise Tax Law," an amount to be determined by the State Funding Board.
SECTION 2. Capital Outlay and Major Maintenance.
Item 1. Any funds appropriated by this General Assembly for capital outlay,
capital maintenance, and major maintenance, shall not revert to the general fund but
shall remain available until expended. It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds
of capital outlay nature shall remain available until expended for the purpose for which
the appropriations were made.
In the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, the carry-forward
and reappropriation of unexpended appropriations for major maintenance shall be
subject to approval by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration based upon the
availability of revenues and reserves in the general fund at June 30, 2025, and June 30,
2026.
Item 2. Any unexpended capital outlay or capital maintenance funds
appropriated by previous General Assemblies for completed or discontinued projects
shall be accumulated in a capital account to be administered by the Department of
Finance and Administration. Expenditure of these funds is subject to approval by the
State Building Commission upon recommendation of the University of Tennessee, State
Board of Regents, boards of locally governed institutions, or Department of General
Services, as applicable, and certification of available funds by the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration. After such approvals and certification of available funds,
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer a portion of
such funds allocated to the Department of General Services from the aforementioned
capital account to the state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund.
Item 3. From the appropriations made to the State Funding Board in Section 1,
Title III-31, the Funding Board is hereby authorized to allocate and provide to the Capital
Projects Fund such funds not required for debt service during fiscal year 2025-2026 for
projects duly authorized and approved by the General Assembly; provided, however,
that when the Funding Board allocates funds under this provision, any other
appropriation or bond authorization for said purpose is hereby reduced accordingly.
Item 4. From the funds appropriated for capital outlay in this act and other acts
of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, with the approval of
the State Building Commission, is authorized to charge the administrative costs of the
construction programs to the capital outlay appropriations or to transfer from the Capital
Projects Fund to the general fund an amount sufficient to cover those costs. Such
expenditures shall be from non-bond proceeds.
Item 5. From the funds appropriated for capital outlay in this act and other acts
of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
establish and charge the costs of design and engineering positions to the capital outlay
appropriations or to transfer from the Capital Projects Fund to the general fund an
amount sufficient to cover these costs. This item is subject to approval by the State
Building Commission.
- 19 - 003682

Item 6. From the funds appropriated for capital outlay in this act and other acts
of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, with the approval of
the State Building Commission, is authorized to transfer the appropriations for capital
outlay to the Department of Finance and Administration to provide for the centralized
administration of capital outlay. It is further the legislative intent to allow for centralized
administration of any project recommended by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration and approved by the State Building Commission.
Item 7. To the extent that the accumulated yearly interest and earnings of the
Natural Resources Trust Fund are available through June 30, 2025, said funds are
hereby appropriated to the Department of Environment and Conservation to be available
for projects which are reviewed and evaluated under procedures established by the
authority of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-308.
Item 8. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction the
proceeds from the sale of any real property and facilities deposited in the reserve for
correctional facilities created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-120. The
appropriation shall be available for the uses provided in Section 12-2-120.
Item 9. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services the proceeds from the sale of any real property and facilities
deposited in the mental health trust fund created by Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 12-2-117. The appropriation shall be available for the uses provided in Section
12-2-117.
Item 10. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Military the proceeds
from the sale of any real property and facilities deposited in the reserve for military
facilities created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-121. The appropriation
shall be available to fund replacement facilities for the department subject to approval by
the State Building Commission.
Item 11. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Disability and Aging
the proceeds from the sale of any real property and facilities deposited in the intellectual
and developmental disabilities trust fund created by Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 12-2-117. The appropriation shall be available for the uses provided in Section
12-2-117.
Item 12. There is hereby appropriated to the state office buildings and support
facilities revolving fund created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-901, the
proceeds from the sale of any real property and facilities deposited to the fund, to be
used, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-119 for capital outlay
requirements of the state's office buildings and support facilities. This appropriation shall
be subject to approval of the State Building Commission.
Item 13. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture the
proceeds from the sale of any real property and facilities deposited in the reserve for
forestry maintenance created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-122 for
capital outlay for replacement facilities of the department or other capital outlay of the
- 20 - 003682

department. The appropriation shall be subject to approval by the State Building
Commission.
Item 14. Capital improvement projects recommended for higher education
institutions in the 2025-2026 Budget Document on pages A-136 to A-137 include funding
partially from institutional sources. It is the legislative intent that such projects include a
minimum matching component for new construction projects at the following rates by
type of institution: (a) R1, Very High Research (UT Knoxville and UoM), 17%, (b) ETSU,
MTSU, TTU, UT Chattanooga, 8%, (c) APSU, UT Martin, TSU, UT Southern, 6%, and
(d) Community Colleges and Specialized Units, 4%. Major renovations projects have a
minimum matching component at the following rates by type of institution: (a) R1, Very
High Research (UT Knoxville and UoM), 6%, (b) ETSU, MTSU, TTU, UT Chattanooga,
APSU, UT Martin, TSU, UT Southern, 4%, and (c) Community Colleges and Specialized
Units, 2%. All matching funds may include gifts, grants, institutional funds, student fees,
and other non-state sources. The match component for new construction projects shall
at a minimum consist of gifts to the institution in the following percentage of the total
pledged match: (a) R1, Very High Research Activity (UT Knoxville and UoM), 50%, (b)
Doctoral/Masters Universities, 33%, and (c) Community Colleges and Specialized Units,
0%.
It is further the legislative intent that institutions of higher education be authorized
to proceed with capital improvement projects funded in the 2025-2026 enacted capital
outlay budget by using Tennessee State School Bond Authority financing as bridge
funding for no more than one-third (1/3) of the total pledged institutional matching
component, under guidelines of and subject to approval of projects by the authority, and
that such obligations be reduced as the matching funds are raised and recognized;
provided, further, that at no time shall such school bonds be issued in lieu of institutional
matching funds.
Item 15. From the appropriations made in Section 1 and Section 4 of this act, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer appropriation
savings resulting from energy management projects to the major maintenance accounts
of the departments and agencies. These funds may be used to pay debt service on
associated bonds, to reimburse the general fund for appropriations made for energy
management capital projects, to pay energy management fees, and to fund energy
projects approved by the State Building Commission.
Item 16. From the appropriations made in Section 1 and Section 4 of Chapter
966, Public Acts of 2024, and in Section 1 and Section 4 of this act, the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer appropriation savings resulting from
Empower Tennessee energy management projects to the Capital Projects Fund.
Further, the funds may be used to pay Empower Tennessee energy management fees,
including interest, and to fund additional Empower Tennessee energy management
projects approved by the State Building Commission. The provisions of this item take
effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
Item 17. The appropriation in Section 1, Title III-10, to the Tennessee Higher
Education Commission, Higher Education Capital Maintenance, is subject to the
following provisions:
- 21 - 003682

(a) The appropriation in the amount of $50,000,000 is hereby
reappropriated to the commission for major maintenance and capital outlay
purposes.
(b) Any remaining unexpended balances at June 30, 2025, are carried
forward and hereby reappropriated to be expended in the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) From any remaining reserve fund balance carried forward at June 30,
2025, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the department for major
maintenance and capital outlay purposes.
(d) Other appropriations made under this act to the Tennessee Higher
Education Commission, Higher Education Capital Maintenance, are hereby
reappropriated to the commission for major maintenance and capital outlay
purposes.
Item 18. The appropriation in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 4.5, Department of
General Services, Statewide Capital Maintenance, is subject to the following provisions:
(a) The appropriation in the amount of $40,191,100 is hereby
appropriated for statewide major maintenance and capital outlay purposes.
(b) Any remaining unexpended balances at June 30, 2025, are carried
forward and hereby reappropriated to be expended in the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) From any remaining reserve fund balance carried forward at June 30,
2025, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the department for major
maintenance and capital outlay purposes.
(d) Other appropriations made under this act to the Department of
General Services, Statewide Capital Maintenance, are hereby reappropriated to
the department for major maintenance and capital outlay purposes.
Item 19. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
reallocate the appropriation in Section 1, Title III-32, Item 5, of Chapter 1130, Public Acts
of 2022 from the benefit of the Department of Finance and Administration to the benefit
of other agencies as certain new capital projects are identified for this appropriation and
submitted for approval to the State Building Commission.
Item 20. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 9.38 in the sum
of $250,000,000 (nonrecurring) is for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount
to the Tennessee Performing Arts Center Management Corporation, to be used for a
new performing arts center. This grant is subject to 20% matching funds by the
Corporation, and such matching funds must be raised before the state grant is
disbursed. Any unexpended funds shall not revert to the general fund and must be
carried forward in a reserve to be expended for purposes of this item.
SECTION 3. Certain Regulatory Programs and Other Dedicated Funds – Provisions,
Limitations, and Restrictions.
- 22 - 003682

Item 1. Appropriations made under Section 1, Titles III-11 and III-16, for the
operation of the state regulatory boards, shall be subject to allotment by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, and no expenditure shall be made by any
said boards out of fees collected by them unless and until such allotments have been
made by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration. Such allotments for the
operation of said respective boards as are made by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration shall be disbursed under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51.
The allotment hereinabove provided shall be subject to the condition that no
money shall be paid therefrom for the salary of any employee of said boards unless and
until such salary has been approved by the Commissioner of Human Resources. The
appointment of all employees of said boards shall likewise be approved by the
Commissioner of Human Resources.
No member of any board or commission established by law or pursuant to law
shall receive any compensation except in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-4-611.
Item 2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appropriations to the
Wildlife Resources Agency under Section 1, Title III-6, shall be paid out of the special
fund established under Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 1, Part 4 and
Section 69-9-203. Such appropriations shall be expended under the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51,
and shall be used only for the expenses of the Wildlife Resources Agency pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70 and Title 69, Chapter 9, Part 2, and no part of the
unexpended fund left at the end of the fiscal year shall be used for any other purpose but
shall be carried over in said fund and may be expended during the next year, and all of
said fees and revenues provided by Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70 and Title 69,
Chapter 9, Part 2, are herein specifically apportioned and appropriated to the use and for
the benefit of the Wildlife Resources Agency to be expended under the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51.
Nothing in this item shall be construed as relieving the Wildlife Resources Agency of the
duty of policing littering of lakes and streams.
Item 3. The appropriation to the State Board of Law Examiners in Section 1, Title
II, Item 16, shall be from funds generated by fees collected by the board under the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 23, Chapter 1.
In case the appropriation to the board shall prove inadequate to allow the board
to function efficiently, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration may make an
additional allotment thereto from the general fund, the total of all allotments to the board
not to exceed the revenues paid into the treasury by the board.
Item 4. The appropriation to the Department of Financial Institutions in Section 1,
Title III-12, shall be derived from banking fees assessed pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 45, Chapter 1, Part 1; credit union fees assessed pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 45, Chapter 4, Parts 9 and 10; and from certain fees
and revenues derived from other non-bank entities. No part of the unexpended banking
fees left at the end of the fiscal year shall revert to the general fund.
- 23 - 003682

DEPARTMENTAL REVENUES
SECTION 4. Appropriations from Departmental Revenues. All departmental revenues
of every kind, as hereinafter defined, collected by any department, institution, office, or agency,
in the course of its operations, for its own use, are hereby appropriated to it in addition to the
specific appropriations made by this act, unless otherwise provided in this act or other
provisions of law. Federal aid funds granted to the state for the use of or to be administered by
any department, institution, or agency, are likewise appropriated. For the purpose of this
section "departmental revenues" are defined as (1) earnings or charges for goods or services;
(2) donations, contributions or participation by political subdivisions, foundations, corporations,
firms or persons; and (3) certain state revenues which for budgetary purposes, are treated as
departmental revenues under the provisions of this section, unless otherwise provided in this act
or other provisions of law. State revenues, in contradistinction to departmental revenues, are
the proceeds of taxes, licenses, fees, fines, forfeiture or other imposts laid specifically by law.
Notwithstanding any provision of the previous paragraph, the Department of Health shall
deposit all funds generated by fees or taxes collected by such entity in the general fund of the
state. Any appropriations for the operation of such entity shall be subject to allotment by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, and no expenditure shall be made by any such
entity out of fees or taxes collected by it, unless and until such allotments have been made by
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration. Such allotments for the operation of such
entity as are made by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall be disbursed
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9,
Chapter 4, Part 51.
The departmental revenues and federal aid funds appropriated under this act shall
include the amounts hereinafter set out:
I. LEGISLATIVE 2025-2026
1. Legislative Administration Services ................................................ $ 17,000.00
2. House of Representatives .............................................................. 28,500.00
3. State Senate ................................................................................ 22,000.00
4. General Assembly Support Services .............................................. 70,000.00
Total Legislature ............................................................................. $ 137,500.00
Total Title I .............................................................. $ 137,500.00
II. JUDICIAL
1. Appellate and Trial Courts .............................................................. $ 27,300.00
2. Supreme Court Buildings ................................................................ 613,000.00
3. Child Support Referees .................................................................. 2,504,100.00
4. Indigent Defendants' Counsel ......................................................... 5,000.00
5. Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges ................................. 67,000.00
6. Judicial Conference ........................................................................ 40,000.00
7. Judicial Programs and Commissions .............................................. 498,200.00
8. Administrative Office of the Courts ................................................. 2,263,700.00
9. Appellate Court Clerks .................................................................... 1,627,100.00
- 24 - 003682

Total Title II ............................................................. $ 7,645,400.00
III. EXECUTIVE
1. Constitutional and Quasi-Judicial Offices
1. Attorney General and Reporter
1.1 Attorney General and Reporter ............................................. $ 15,397,400.00
1.2 Special Litigation ................................................................... 788,800.00
Total Attorney General and Reporter ..................................... $ 16,186,200.00
2. District Attorneys General Conference
2.1 District Attorneys General...................................................... $ 9,975,100.00
2.2 Executive Director ................................................................. 2,061,500.00
2.3 IV-D Child Support Enforcement ........................................... 39,747,200.00
Total District Attorneys General Conference ......................... $ 51,783,800.00
3. Secretary of State
3.1 Secretary of State ................................................................. $ 8,835,200.00
3.2 Records Management ........................................................... 1,597,000.00
3.3 State Library and Archives .................................................... 3,485,800.00
3.4 Regional Library System ....................................................... 791,100.00
3.5 Bureau of Ethics and Campaign Finance .............................. 665,100.00
3.6 Help America Vote Act .......................................................... 27,500,000.00
Total Secretary of State ......................................................... $ 42,874,200.00
4. District Public Defenders Conference
4.1 District Public Defenders ....................................................... $ 622,000.00
Total District Public Defenders Conference ........................... $ 622,000.00
5. Comptroller of the Treasury
5.1 Division of State Audit ........................................................... $ 6,261,600.00
5.2 Division of Local Government Audit ....................................... 1,459,100.00
5.3 Office of State Government Finance ..................................... 810,500.00
5.4 Division of Property Assessments ......................................... 1,899,500.00
5.5 State Board of Equalization ................................................... 107,400.00
5.6 Division of Technology Solutions ........................................... 222,500.00
Total Comptroller of the Treasury .......................................... $ 10,760,600.00
6. Treasury Department
6.1 Treasury Department ............................................................ $ 78,806,700.00
6.2 Small and Minority-Owned Business Assistance Program .... 250,000.00
6.3 TN Stars College Savings 529 Program ................................ 650,000.00
6.4 Tuition Guaranty .................................................................... 50,000.00
Total Treasury Department .................................................... $ 79,756,700.00
7. Claims and Compensation
7.1 Criminal Injuries Compensation ............................................. $ 4,850,600.00
7.2 Risk Management Fund ........................................................ 98,228,100.00
- 25 - 003682

Total Claims and Compensation ........................................... $ 103,078,700.00
Total Title III-1 ......................................................... $ 305,062,200.00
2. Executive Offices
1. Commissions
1.1 Commission on Children and Youth ...................................... $ 1,818,500.00
1.2 Alcoholic Beverage Commission ........................................... 13,122,200.00
1.3 Human Rights Commission ................................................... 969,800.00
1.4 Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations .......... 3,881,200.00
1.5 Tennessee Housing Development Agency ............................ 486,557,800.00
1.6 Arts Commission ................................................................... 4,048,400.00
1.7 Tennessee Public Utility Commission .................................... 2,542,000.00
1.8 Tennessee Rehabilitative Initiative in Correction (TRICOR) .. 54,052,800.00
1.9 State Museum ....................................................................... 415,000.00
1.10 Council on Developmental Disabilities ................................... 2,356,700.00
1.11 Corrections Institute .............................................................. 95,500.00
1.12 Health Facilities Commission ................................................ 15,087,400.00
Total Commissions ................................................................ $ 584,947,300.00
2. Department of Finance and Administration
2.1 Division of Administration ...................................................... $ 5,814,300.00
2.2 Strategic Technology Solutions (STS) Operations ................. 280,604,300.00
2.3 Benefits Administration .......................................................... 17,922,400.00
2.4 Division of Accounts .............................................................. 65,441,400.00
2.5 Criminal Justice Programs..................................................... 74,165,600.00
2.6 Volunteer Tennessee ............................................................ 8,291,100.00
2.7 Office of Inspector General.................................................... 6,339,300.00
2.8 Enterprise Resource Planning ............................................... 39,818,200.00
2.9 Business Solutions Delivery .................................................. 103,302,400.00
2.10 STS Agency Purchasing ....................................................... 85,500,000.00
Total Department of Finance and Administration ................... $ 687,199,000.00
3. Department of Human Resources
3.1 Executive Administration ....................................................... $ 1,949,900.00
3.2 HR Management Services..................................................... 5,977,000.00
3.3 Office of the General Counsel ............................................... 6,426,400.00
3.4 Human Resources Business Solutions .................................. 5,575,300.00
3.5 Office of People, Performance and Culture ........................... 6,797,000.00
Total Department of Human Resources ................................ $ 26,725,600.00
4. Department of General Services
4.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 9,808,200.00
4.2 Postal Services ..................................................................... 18,636,600.00
4.3 Motor Vehicle Management ................................................... 87,513,500.00
4.4 Real Estate Asset Management ............................................ 16,513,500.00
4.5 Printing and Media Services .................................................. 8,059,300.00
4.6 Procurement Office ............................................................... 14,722,400.00
- 26 - 003682

4.7 Distribution Center ................................................................ 5,311,100.00
4.8 Megasite Authority of West Tennessee ................................. 107,000.00
4.9 Megasite Water and Wastewater Authority ............................ 7,913,800.00
Total Department of General Services .................................. $ 168,585,400.00
5. Department of Veterans Services
5.1 Tennessee State Veterans Cemeteries ................................. $ 1,522,100.00
Total Department of Veterans Services ................................. $ 1,522,100.00
Total Title III-2 ......................................................... $ 1,468,979,400.00
3. Department of Agriculture
1. Administration and Grants .............................................................. $ 10,141,300.00
2. Consumer and Industry Services .................................................... 16,830,300.00
3. Business Development ................................................................... 3,102,000.00
4. Forestry Operations ........................................................................ 11,397,000.00
5. Grain Indemnity Fund ..................................................................... 126,700.00
6. Agricultural Regulatory Fund .......................................................... 740,300.00
7. Animal Health ................................................................................ 2,065,600.00
8. Technical Services ......................................................................... 3,195,400.00
Total Title III-3 ......................................................... $ 47,598,600.00
4. Department of Tourist Development
1. Administration and Marketing ......................................................... $ 3,501,400.00
2. Welcome Centers ........................................................................... 11,758,000.00
Total Title III-4 ......................................................... $ 15,259,400.00
5. Department of Environment and Conservation
1. Administrative Services .................................................................. $ 17,305,400.00
2. Recreation Educational Services .................................................... 7,100,800.00
3. Archaeology ................................................................................... 60,500.00
4. Geology .......................................................................................... 629,400.00
5. Tennessee State Parks .................................................................. 50,331,000.00
6. State Parks Maintenance................................................................ 600,000.00
7. Natural Areas ................................................................................. 160,100.00
8. Historical Commission .................................................................... 579,600.00
9. West Tennessee River Basin Authority ........................................... 10,254,500.00
10. Environment Administration ............................................................ 5,354,000.00
11. Air Pollution Control ........................................................................ 19,482,300.00
12. Radiological Health......................................................................... 7,457,400.00
13. Division of Water Resources .......................................................... 23,815,500.00
14. Solid Waste Management ............................................................... 13,154,800.00
15. DOE Oversight ............................................................................... 7,819,200.00
16. Hazardous Waste Remedial Action Fund ....................................... 11,480,300.00
- 27 - 003682

17. Underground Storage Tanks .......................................................... 1,973,400.00
18. Clean Water and Drinking Water State Revolving Fund ................. 128,545,200.00
19. Used Oil Collection Program .......................................................... 1,000.00
20. Fleming Training Center ................................................................. 1,761,400.00
21. Office of Sustainable Practices ....................................................... 886,300.00
22. Office of Energy Programs ............................................................. 50,227,100.00
23. Tennessee Heritage Conservation Trust Fund ............................... 1,000,000.00
24. Abandoned Lands .......................................................................... 1,111,400.00
25. Division of Mineral and Geologic Resources................................... 14,837,400.00
Total Title III-5 ......................................................... $ 375,928,000.00
6. Tennessee Wildlife Resources Agency
1. Wildlife Resources Agency ............................................................. $ 64,700,100.00
2. Boating Safety ................................................................................ 6,386,800.00
3. Wetlands Acquisition Fund ............................................................. 1,662,000.00
Total Title III-6 ......................................................... $ 72,748,900.00
7. Department of Correction
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 4,487,700.00
2. Correction Academy ....................................................................... 64,900.00
3. Probation and Parole Field Supervision .......................................... 1,069,500.00
4. State Prosecutions ......................................................................... 800,000.00
5. Debra K. Johnson Rehabilitation Center ......................................... 394,700.00
6. Turney Center Industrial Complex .................................................. 615,900.00
7. Mark Luttrell Transition Center ....................................................... 326,500.00
8. Bledsoe County Correctional Complex ........................................... 624,700.00
9. West Tennessee State Penitentiary ................................................ 507,600.00
10. Riverbend Maximum Security Institution ......................................... 106,600.00
11. Northeast Correctional Complex ..................................................... 314,200.00
12. Northwest Correctional Complex .................................................... 959,600.00
13. Morgan County Correctional Complex ............................................ 512,900.00
14. Lois M. DeBerry Special Needs Facility .......................................... 161,800.00
15. Hardeman County Incarceration Agreement ................................... 18,900.00
16. Hardeman County Agreement – Whiteville ..................................... 18,700.00
17. South Central Correctional Facility ................................................. 18,700.00
18. Trousdale County Incarceration Agreement ................................... 13,200.00
Total Title III-7 ......................................................... $ 11,016,100.00
8. Department of Economic and Community Development
1. Administrative Services .................................................................. $ 773,800.00
2. Business Development ................................................................... 20,475,300.00
3. Tennessee Job Skills Program ....................................................... 1,464,900.00
4. Policy and Federal Programs ......................................................... 28,663,000.00
5. FastTrack Infrastructure and Job Training Assistance .................... 25,340,500.00
- 28 - 003682

6. Film and Television Incentive Fund ................................................ 48,600.00
7. TNInvestco Tax Credits .................................................................. 1,500,000.00
8. Community and Rural Development ............................................... 43,703,900.00
9. Innovation Programs ...................................................................... 74,260,900.00
10. Broadband Accessibility ................................................................. 374,595,700.00
Total Title III-8 ......................................................... $ 570,826,600.00
9. Department of Education
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 2,234,800.00
2. ESSA and Federal Programs ......................................................... 408,203,600.00
3. Technology, Infrastructure, and Support Systems .......................... 517,900.00
4. Academic Offices ........................................................................... 8,588,300.00
5. Centers of Regional Excellence (CORE) ........................................ 2,281,600.00
6. Improving Schools Program ........................................................... 2,721,600.00
7. Data and Research......................................................................... 9,017,700.00
8. Early Childhood Education ............................................................. 9,359,200.00
9. Energy Efficient Schools Initiative ................................................... 1,211,500.00
10. School Nutrition Program................................................................ 413,719,900.00
11. Special Education Services ............................................................ 254,621,200.00
12. College, Career and Technical Education ....................................... 25,404,100.00
13. Alvin C. York Institute ..................................................................... 1,529,900.00
14. Tennessee School for the Blind ...................................................... 1,044,700.00
15. Tennessee School for the Deaf ...................................................... 558,600.00
16. West Tennessee School for the Deaf ............................................. 224,100.00
17. Charter School Commission. .......................................................... 108,756,200.00
18. Achievement School District ........................................................... 30,513,700.00
19. Relief and Recovery Funds ............................................................ 385,700.00
Total Title III-9 ......................................................... $ 1,280,894,300.00
10. Higher Education
1. Tennessee Higher Education Commission ..................................... $ 23,993,400.00
2. Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation ................................... 5,761,800.00
3. Academic Scholars Program .......................................................... 378,700.00
4. Loan/Scholarship Programs ........................................................... 291,000.00
Total Title III-10 ....................................................... $ 30,424,900.00
11. Department of Commerce and Insurance
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 12,403,600.00
2. Insurance ....................................................................................... 24,643,000.00
3. Securities ....................................................................................... 4,396,500.00
4. TennCare Oversight ....................................................................... 3,100,100.00
5. Fire Prevention ............................................................................... 25,394,400.00
6. Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy ............................. 1,628,300.00
7. Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) Commission ........... 43,300.00
- 29 - 003682

8. Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy ............................ 1,738,200.00
9. 911 Emergency Communications Fund .......................................... 5,821,800.00
10. Regulatory Boards .......................................................................... 931,900.00
11. Cemetery Consumer Protection Fund ............................................ 5,000.00
Total Title III-11 ....................................................... $ 80,106,100.00
12. Department of Financial Institutions ...................................... $ 2,400.00
Total Title III-12 ....................................................... $ 2,400.00
13. Department of Labor and Workforce Development
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 8,201,800.00
2. Tennessee Occupational Safety and Health
Administration (TOSHA) ................................................................. 5,074,700.00
3. Mines ............................................................................................. 231,800.00
4. Boilers, Elevators, and Amusement Devices .................................. 114,900.00
5. Workers' Compensation ................................................................. 205,700.00
6. Subsequent Injury and Vocational Recovery Fund ......................... 200,000.00
7. Adult Basic Education ..................................................................... 14,929,500.00
8. Workforce Services ........................................................................ 98,068,900.00
9. Unemployment Insurance ............................................................... 52,851,200.00
Total Title III-13 ....................................................... $ 179,878,500.00
14. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
1. Administrative Services Division ..................................................... $ 9,102,300.00
2. Mental Health Services
2.1 Community Mental Health Services ....................................... 48,614,200.00
2.2 Middle Tennessee Mental Health Institute ............................. 23,662,600.00
2.3 Western Mental Health Institute ............................................ 12,546,300.00
2.4 Moccasin Bend Mental Health Institute.................................. 12,582,800.00
2.5 Memphis Mental Health Institute ........................................... 7,150,000.00
3. Community Substance Abuse Services .......................................... 80,964,300.00
4. Tennessee Opioid Abatement Council............................................ 2,866,100.00
5. Opioid Abatement Fund .................................................................. 2,866,100.00
Total Title III-14 ....................................................... $ 200,354,700.00
15. Department of Military
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 887,800.00
2. Army National Guard ...................................................................... 12,152,300.00
3. Air National Guard .......................................................................... 15,454,500.00
- 30 - 003682

4. Tennessee Emergency Management Agency ................................ 12,855,900.00
5. TEMA Disaster Relief Grants .......................................................... 80,000,000.00
6. Homeland Security Grants .............................................................. 10,001,100.00
7. Armories Utilities ............................................................................ 4,041,200.00
8. Armories Maintenance .................................................................... 5,694,600.00
9. Station Commanders Upkeep and Maintenance Fund .................... 250,000.00
10. STORM Act ................................................................................ 100.00
Total Title III-15 ....................................................... $ 141,337,500.00
16. Department of Health
1. Administration
1.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 10,007,500.00
1.2 Public Health Policy, Planning, and Informatics ..................... 12,628,700.00
2. Manpower Resources and Facilities
2.1 Emergency Medical Services ................................................ 2,145,200.00
2.2 Laboratory Services .............................................................. 15,925,300.00
2.3 Health Related Boards .......................................................... 2,337,300.00
3. Community Health Services
3.1 Environmental Health ............................................................ 88,600.00
3.2 Family Health and Wellness .................................................. 81,953,000.00
3.3 Communicable and Environmental Disease and
Emergency Preparedness ..................................................... 61,655,700.00
3.4 Community and Medical Services ......................................... 58,958,200.00
3.5 Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) ..................................... 136,075,000.00
4. Health Services .............................................................................. 135,876,200.00
Total Title III-16 ....................................................... $ 517,650,700.00
17. Department of Human Services
1. Administration
1.1 Administration ....................................................................... $ 126,735,800.00
1.2 County Rentals ...................................................................... 12,226,200.00
1.3 Appeals and Hearings ........................................................... 10,103,400.00
2. Family Assistance Services
2.1 Child Support ........................................................................ 97,722,800.00
2.2 Child Care Benefits ............................................................... 276,795,600.00
2.3 Temporary Cash Assistance ................................................. 101,421,900.00
2.4 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program ......................... 3,209,112,700.00
2.5 Family Assistance Services ................................................... 151,834,400.00
3. Community Services ....................................................................... 199,928,000.00
- 31 - 003682

4. Rehabilitative Services
4.1 Rehabilitation Services .......................................................... 85,103,900.00
4.2 Disability Determination ......................................................... 75,129,400.00
Total Title III-17 ....................................................... $ 4,346,114,100.00
18. Department of Revenue
1. Administration Division ................................................................... $ 13,948,900.00
2. Collection Services ......................................................................... 3,369,900.00
3. Taxpayer Services Division ............................................................ 1,671,200.00
4. Processing Division ........................................................................ 3,294,700.00
5. Audit Division .................................................................................. 12,026,700.00
6. Vehicle Services Division................................................................ 3,545,400.00
Total Title III-18 ....................................................... $ 37,856,800.00
19. Tennessee Bureau of Investigation ....................................... $ 41,655,100.00
Total Title III-19 ....................................................... $ 41,655,100.00
20. Department of Safety
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 300,000.00
2. Driver License Issuance ................................................................. 33,847,300.00
3. Highway Patrol ............................................................................... 17,807,300.00
4. Auto Theft Investigations ................................................................ 349,800.00
5. Office of Homeland Security ........................................................... 565,600.00
6. Communications ............................................................................. 925,100.00
7. Tennessee Highway Safety Office .................................................. 28,375,700.00
Total Title III-20 ....................................................... $ 82,170,800.00
21. Department of Finance and Administration,
Strategic Health-Care Programs
1. CoverKids ....................................................................................... $ 140,213,800.00
2. CoverRx ......................................................................................... 3,000,000.00
3. Health-Care Planning and Innovation ............................................. 240,900.00
Total Title III-21 ....................................................... $ 143,454,700.00
22. Department of Children's Services
1. Administration ................................................................................ $ 43,296,000.00
2. Family Support Services ................................................................. 43,548,700.00
3. Custody Services ........................................................................... 419,798,900.00
4. Adoption Services .......................................................................... 87,489,800.00
5. Child and Family Management ....................................................... 248,967,200.00
- 32 - 003682

6. John S. Wilder Youth Development Center .................................... 400,800.00
7. Major Maintenance ......................................................................... 15,000.00
8. Social Security Income ................................................................... 13,737,200.00
Total Title III-22 ....................................................... $ 857,253,600.00
23. Board of Parole ..................................................................... $ 1,000.00
Total Title III-23 ....................................................... $ 1,000.00
24. Department of Disability and Aging
1. Intellectual Disabilities Services Administration .............................. $ 44,912,000.00
2. Community Intellectual Disabilities Services ................................... 2,052,000.00
3. Protection from Harm ..................................................................... 8,061,800.00
4. Harold Jordan Center ..................................................................... 1,000.00
5. West Tennessee Regional Office ................................................... 11,510,200.00
6. Middle Tennessee Regional Office ................................................. 11,990,400.00
7. East Tennessee Regional Office .................................................... 11,317,400.00
8. Seating and Positioning Clinics ...................................................... 772,600.00
9. West Tennessee Community Homes.............................................. 25,352,900.00
10. Middle Tennessee Community Homes ........................................... 19,515,800.00
11. East Tennessee Community Homes .............................................. 27,676,500.00
12. Tennessee Early Intervention System. ........................................... 44,831,900.00
13. Katie Beckett Waiver ...................................................................... 58,292,500.00
14. Commission on Aging and Disability ............................................... 34,470,400.00
Total Title III-24 ...................................................... $ 300,757,400.00
25. Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of TennCare
1. TennCare Administration ................................................................ $ 798,754,400.00
2. TennCare Medical Services ............................................................ 9,634,112,600.00
3. Supplemental Payments ................................................................. 730,146,800.00
4. Intellectual Disabilities Services ...................................................... 759,803,200.00
5. Medicare Services .......................................................................... 420,472,700.00
Total Title III-25 ....................................................... $ 12,343,289,700.00
26. Department of Transportation
1. Bureau of Administration ................................................................ $ 473,900.00
2. Bureau of Operations ..................................................................... 1,041,629,600.00
3. Bureau of Engineering .................................................................... 288,244,200.00
4. Bureau of Planning ......................................................................... 227,814,300.00
Total Title III-26 ....................................................... $ 1,558,162,000.00
27. Facilities Revolving Fund
- 33 - 003682

1. Facilities Operations ....................................................................... $ 61,284,900.00
2. Facilities Maintenance .................................................................... 4,943,400.00
3. Leases and Space Planning ........................................................... 59,479,300.00
4. FRF Debt Service ........................................................................... 33,100,000.00
Total Title III-27 ....................................................... $ 158,807,600.00
28. State Building Commission
1. Major Maintenance and Equipment ................................................ $ 150,000.00
Total Title III-28 ...................................................... $ 150,000.00
Grand Total ......................................................................... $ 25,175,524,000.00
SECTION 5. Refund of Receipts; Cancellation of Unredeemed Warrants; Recovery of
Returned Checks.
Item 1. There is hereby appropriated the necessary and sufficient sums to
refund any collection or part thereof made erroneously or illegally for the use or benefit
of the state or any of its departments, institutions, offices or agencies. Such refunds
shall be made in accordance with existing law as applicable in any particular case.
Item 2. With respect to any revenues or receipts collected by any department or
agency with the exception of those collected by the Department of Revenue, such
amounts as are determined to have been erroneously paid may be refunded by the
procedure established pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-607.
Item 3. The cancellation and write-off of unredeemed warrants, drafts, and
checks drawn on the State Treasury and subsequent claims by the payee of said
instruments shall be subject to the procedures specified in Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-4-601(a)(2).
Item 4. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall maintain a policy
to recover state funds and the state's costs associated with checks, warrants, drafts, and
electronic funds transfers deposited to a state account that are subsequently returned
unpaid by the drawer's bank.
SECTION 6. Certain Debt Service and Related Matters. In addition to the
appropriations made to the State Funding Board in Section 1, Title III-31, of this act, there is
appropriated the following items:
Item 1. From the funds appropriated in Section 1, Title III-31, Item 6,
Amortization of Authorized and Unissued Highway Bonds, the sum of $80,000,000.00 is
appropriated in lieu of issuing highway bonds under the provisions of Chapter 462,
Public Acts of 2017. The State Funding Board shall take the necessary action to cancel
the unissued bonds.
- 34 - 003682

Item 2. From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-31, of this act to the
State Funding Board, a sum not to exceed $3,285,100 is earmarked to pay debt service
on general obligation bonds issued under the authority of Chapter 582, Public Acts of
1996, for the purpose of making a grant to the Metropolitan Government of Nashville and
Davidson County for the construction of a sports stadium. It is the legislative intent that
said appropriations shall be funded first from the sales tax revenues allocated under the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(d)(1), as amended by
Chapter 401, Public Acts of 2021.
Item 3. To provide the debt service on the general obligation bonds authorized
under Chapter 313, Public Acts of 2003, relative to State Veterans' Homes, there is
hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from the funds available to the State Funding
Board pursuant to agreements entered into thereunder.
Item 4. From the funds appropriated in Section 1 and Section 4 of this act to the
Tennessee Board of Regents and the boards of Middle Tennessee State University and
the University of Memphis for defraying operating expenses in this act and other acts of
legislature, with the approval of the State Building Commission a sum sufficient is
appropriated to be used for payments to the State Funding Board as required for any
debt issued in an amount not to exceed $10,700,000 under the authorization of Chapter
591, Public Acts of 2007.
Item 5. In addition to the appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-31, of this act
to the State Funding Board, and to the extent that the board issues any tax revenue
anticipation notes pursuant to the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-
9-301, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from subsequently available funds
of the state to pay debt service on such notes within the fiscal year of issuance.
Item 6. There is hereby appropriated to the Tennessee State School Bond
Authority a sum sufficient in the amount of payments allowable to the Authority from the
federal government pursuant to the qualified school construction bond program or similar
programs, for purposes of debt service on such bonds.
Item 7. The funding of the appropriations for interest on state debt and
retirement of bonds made in Section 1, Title III-31 of this act includes an allocation of
motor vehicle title fees to the debt service fund in the amount of $2,700,000. The
allocation is made from the sum generated by the $1.50 motor vehicle title fee imposed
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-6-101(a)(1).
It is the legislative intent to recognize that the revenue generated from the $1.50
fee is earmarked for the purpose of paying the principal and interest on bonds
authorized in the amount of $5,000,000.00 and issued pursuant to the provisions of
Chapter 1028, Public Acts of 1992. Any funds in excess of the amount so required are
earmarked for the purpose of paying the principal and interest on general obligation
bonds authorized to fund capital projects at state parks.
Item 8. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from general fund interest
earnings for the purpose of funding the State of Tennessee's liability under IRS
regulations for arbitrage interest earnings on proceeds from general obligation debt.
- 35 - 003682

Item 9. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from the construction
funds trust agreement reserve authorized pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-9-103, for purposes of the construction funds trust agreement related to
financing for the construction of a domed sports stadium in Davidson County. The
provisions of this item take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SECTION 7. Earmarked Appropriations. The appropriations made by this act under
Sections 1 and 4 shall be subject to the following provisions, limitations, or restrictions. From the
funds appropriated to the:
Item 1. State Election Commission in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 3.2, there is
hereby appropriated funds for expenses of the State Election Commission, including the
printing of election laws, the office of the Coordinator of Elections, and other expenses of
administering election laws. The salary of each member of the State Election
Commission shall be six thousand nine hundred ninety-four dollars and thirty-two cents
($6,994.32) annually. The Secretary of State is hereby authorized to make all necessary
purchases of election supplies from funds appropriated for such purpose in accordance
with state purchasing procedures.
Item 2. Comptroller of the Treasury and the Department of Finance and
Administration, there is hereby authorized to be allocated an amount not to exceed
$45,000 for the purpose of meeting the State of Tennessee's participation in the cost of
supporting the National Council on Governmental Accounting or a governmental
accounting standards board in the establishment of governmental accounting standards
and principles.
Item 3. Criminal Injuries Compensation in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 8.1, there is
appropriated a sum not to exceed $302,200 for grants to the District Attorneys General
for domestic violence prevention and drug enforcement activities authorized under
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-13-116.
Item 4. Criminal Injuries Compensation, in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 8.1,
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-405 there is earmarked the sum
of $100,000 for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Tennessee
Coalition Against Domestic and Sexual Violence to support the activities of the Tommy
Burks Victim Assistance Academy.
Item 5. Treasury Department in Section 4, Title III-1, Item 6.1, there are hereby
appropriated funds sufficient to defray the cost of administering, on behalf of state
employees compensated on the centralized state payroll system, Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 25, Part 1, the same being the "Government Employees'
Deferred Compensation Plan Act"; and Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 25,
Part 3, the same being the "Profit Sharing or Salary Reduction Plans".
Item 6. Governor's Office in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 1.1, an amount of sixty
thousand dollars ($60,000) per year for Maintenance of the Tennessee Residence
(Executive Residence) and travel expenses as certified by the Governor shall be paid by
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, it being the legislative intent that the
residence should be maintained and operated as the official residence and office of the
Chief Executive of Tennessee in a manner required of the Office of Governor.
- 36 - 003682

Item 7. Commission on Children and Youth in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.1, the
sum of $2,400,000 for making grants in equal amounts of $40,000 to each of the 60
county Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA) programs, to be used for purposes
related to the operation or development of the programs.
Item 8. Arts Commission in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.9, the sum of $80,000 is
hereby appropriated for the purpose of making a grant to Fisk University for the
necessary staff, services and other costs associated with maintaining and showing the
Stieglitz Collection at Fisk University. It is the legislative intent that this appropriation is a
direct appropriation grant and that it be processed accordingly by the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration. This appropriation is made under the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-20-202.
Item 9. Arts Commission in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.9, an amount of
$100,000 is for the purpose of a grant to the Tennessee Performing Arts Center
Management Corporation for educational activities.
Item 10. Arts Commission in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.9, an amount of
$45,000 is for the purpose of a grant to Africa in April Cultural Awareness Festival, Inc.,
to support the Africa in April Cultural Awareness Festival.
Item 11. To the State Museum in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.10, an amount of
$100,000 is for the purpose of maintenance, restoration, and operational expenses of
the Green McAdoo Cultural Center.
Item 12. Department of Finance and Administration, Criminal Justice Programs,
in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 3.5, there is hereby earmarked a sum sufficient from the
proceeds of the $15.00 privilege tax on marriage licenses for purposes of funding family
violence shelters and shelter services. This appropriation is made under the provisions
of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-411.
Item 13. Department of Finance and Administration, Strategic Technology
Solutions (STS) Operations, in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 3.2, an amount of $1,796,800 is
for the purpose of employee training in next generation information technology (Next
Generation IT). The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer these appropriations to the appropriate organizational units of state government,
to adjust rates to reflect these purposes, to reduce the appropriations to an amount
required by the adjusted rates, and to adjust departmental revenue estimates
accordingly.
Item 14. Department of Finance and Administration, Division of Accounts, in
Section 1, Title III-2, Item 3.3, an amount of $4,746,700 is for the purpose of funding a
centralized accounting unit providing services to small agencies of state government.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer this
appropriation to the appropriate organizational units of state government, to adjust rates
to reflect this purpose, to reduce the appropriation to an amount required by the adjusted
rate, and to adjust departmental revenue estimates accordingly. The commissioner is
further authorized to transfer accounting positions from the organizational units of the
agencies to the Division of Accounts.
- 37 - 003682

Item 15. Department of Finance and Administration in Section 4, Title III-2, Item
2.3, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-25-401, for administering the
"Cafeteria Benefits Plan" for state employees.
Item 16. Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 1, Title III-2, Item
3, appropriations for the electronic monitoring indigency fund grant program shall be
subject to the provisions of Section 21 of this act.
Item 17. Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 1, Title III-2, Item
3, appropriations for VINE courts shall be disbursed to the Tennessee Sheriff’s
Association as subject to the provisions of Section 21 of this act.
Item 18. Department of General Services in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 4.3, shall
be paid as a direct appropriation to the Governor's Early Literacy Foundation.
Item 19. Department of Agriculture, Forestry Operations, in Section 1, Title III-3,
Item 5, the sum of $2,000,000 is intended to fund the depreciation cost to replace
bulldozers and wildland firefighting equipment. Unexpended funds for this purpose may
be carried forward and held in reserve until such a time as replacement is deemed
necessary.
Item 20. Department of Tourist Development, in Section 1, Title III-4, there is
hereby appropriated a sum not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars
($12,500), sufficient to defray the cost of advertising and other expenses in connection
with special events in which Tennessee is represented and/or events within the state for
which Tennessee will act as official host. Any allotment of funds made under the
authority of this section shall be made only on the approval of the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration.
Item 21. Department of Tourist Development, in Section 1, Title III-4, and
Department of Economic and Community Development, in Section 1, Title III-8, there
shall be paid expenses incurred by the two departments in representing the state in its
official capacity; provided, however, that nothing herein shall authorize the expenditure
by each agency for such purposes in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per
annum. The amount and purposes of such expenses are subject to approval by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 22. Department of Tourist Development, in Section 1, Title III-4, the sum of
$500,000 to establish a program to make grants to entities, including marinas, to
improve and maintain access to Tennessee's waterways.
Item 23. Department of Environment and Conservation, Environmental
Protection Fund, in Section 1, Title III-5, the sum of $5,280,000 is from revenues
available to the Environmental Protection Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Title 68, Chapter 203, from funds paid by the Tennessee Valley Authority (TVA)
pursuant to a Consent Decree regarding air emissions in Tennessee. Departmental
revenues shall be adjusted accordingly. These funds shall be exempt from and shall not
be considered in the calculations required by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-
203-104(b), (c), or (d). These funds shall be available for the purpose of funding energy
- 38 - 003682

conservation, alternative energy and/or pollution prevention projects and any other
projects authorized by the Consent Decree.
Item 24. Department of Environment and Conservation, Maintenance of Historic
Sites, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 9, an amount of $30,000 is for the sole purpose of
supplementing funding available for historic sites acquisition, improvements,
maintenance, and interpretation at the Parker's Crossroads Battlefield. This item is to be
allotted as a direct appropriation grant to the City of Parker's Crossroads. Further, any
unexpended funds shall not revert to the general fund and shall be carried forward in a
reserve to be expended for purposes of this item.
Item 25. Department of Environment and Conservation, in Section 1, Title III-5,
the sum of $50,000 for a grant to Good Samaritans Camp Tanase.
Item 26. The Historical Commission, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 8, an amount
of $100,000 (recurring) for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the
Stax Museum of American Soul Music, to be used for defrayal of operational costs.
Item 27. Historical Commission, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 8, the sum of
$100,000 for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Tennessee
Historical Society to be used for operational expenses.
Item 28. Historical Commission, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 8, the sum of
$19,000 for the sole purpose of making a grant to the Frank Clement Museum
Foundation.
Item 29. Historical Commission, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 8, the sum of
$40,000 for a grant to the Rocky Mount Historical Association, to be used for providing
educational and community outreach programs focused upon the history of the Rocky
Mount State Historic site.
Item 30. Department of Correction, Community Corrections, in Section 1, Title
III-7, Item 5, the department is authorized to make a grant of up to $832,000 to "Project
Return."
Item 31. Department of Correction, Community Corrections, in Section 1, Title
III-7, Item 5, the sum of $136,500 is for the sole purpose of making a grant in such
amount to DISMAS, Inc., to be used for assisting with their programs in the State of
Tennessee, and for no other purpose. From the funds appropriated to DISMAS, Inc.,
there is earmarked the sum of $25,000 to Chattanooga Endeavors (formerly DISMAS
House of Chattanooga) and $8,000 to Better Decisions (formerly DECISIONS, a
program of the DISMAS, Inc., home office) for the sole purpose of maintaining
operations at their former level.
Item 32. Department of Correction, in Section 1, Title III-7, the sum of $250,000
for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Tennessee Higher
Education Initiative, to be used for programs and services that provide access to on-site
degree-bearing higher education for individuals in Tennessee prisons. Any unexpended
funds shall not revert to the general fund and shall be carried forward in a reserve to be
expended for purposes of this item.
- 39 - 003682

Item 33. Department of Correction, in Section 1, Title III-7, the sum of $250,000
for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to Big Brothers Big Sisters
Amachi mentoring initiative.
Item 34. Department of Education, Grants-in-Aid, in Section 1, Title III-9, Item
2.1f, the sum of $100,000 is to be paid to Tennessee History for Kids, Inc., to be used for
programs, services, and operational expenses.
Item 35. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $200,000
is to be paid to the Arts Academy to be used for teacher professional development.
Item 36. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $200,000
is to be paid to the Arts Academy Foundation.
Item 37. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 3, College,
Career and Technical Education, the sum of $1,900,000 for Governor's Schools.
Item 38. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1f, Grants-in-
Aid, the sum of $2,786,800 to be granted to public television stations.
Item 39. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1i, Early
Childhood Education, the sum of $3,050,000 for family resource centers.
Item 40. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $900,000
for the sole purpose of making grants to the Science Alliance museums.
Item 41. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $1,650,000
for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Tennessee Science,
Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Innovation Network (TSIN), to
support STEM education programs and outreach.
Item 42. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $410,000
(recurring) to the State Museum for the sole purpose of providing a grant in such amount
to the Holocaust Commission.
Item 43. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the grant to the
Tennessee Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs shall be disbursed pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 36-6-413(b)(2)(F) and Section 21 of this act.
Item 44. Department of Education, in Section 1, Title III-9, the sum of $1,200,000
for making a grant to Save the Children Federation, Incorporated.
Item 45. Higher Education, in Section 1, Title III-10, Item 1.2, Contract
Education, the amount of $363,000 for a grant to the Southern College of Optometry.
Item 46. Higher Education, in Section 1, Title III-10, Item 1.6, THEC Grants, the
appropriation for increased graduate medical education shall be allotted by the
Tennessee Higher Education Commission after consultation with the Department of
Health.
- 40 - 003682

Item 47. From funds appropriated in Chapter 418, Public Acts of 2023, Section
60, Item 4, for the Tennessee Future Teacher Scholarship Act of 2023, there is
earmarked the sum of $236,300 (recurring through FY27-28) for the sole purpose of
implementing 2024 Public Chapter 982, relative to allowing students enrolled in an
approved educator program at Western Governor University to be eligible recipients of
the Tennessee Future Teacher Scholarship, if such bill becomes a law.
Item 48. Department of Commerce and Insurance, Fire Fighting Personnel
Standards and Education, in Section 1, Title III-11, Item 5, funds are earmarked for
payment to eligible units of local government to pay bonus supplements to firefighters
who successfully complete during calendar year 2025 an in-service training program
appropriate to such firefighter's rank and responsibility and the size and location of the
department of at least forty (40) hours duration at a school established or certified by
such commission. The funds appropriated by this item shall be disbursed in accordance
with the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 24 and Section 56-4-
205(c), and no supplement to any person shall exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).
Item 49. Department of Commerce and Insurance, Peace Officer Standards and
Training (POST) Commission in Section 1, Title III-11, Item 6, funds are earmarked for
payment to eligible units of local government which have required all police officers to
complete during calendar year 2025 an in-service training course appropriate to each
officer's rank and responsibility commensurate with the size and location of the
department of at least forty (40) hours duration at a school certified or recognized by the
POST Commission. The funds appropriated by this item shall be disbursed in
accordance with the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 8, Part
1, and no recipient shall be eligible to receive a supplement of more than eight hundred
dollars ($800).
Item 50. Department of Commerce and Insurance, Regulatory Boards, in
Section 1, Title III-11, Item 9, an amount of $400,000 is earmarked from the Board of
Architectural and Engineering Examiners revenues or reserve funds for disbursement to
accredited interior design programs, accredited architectural programs, accredited
engineering programs and accredited landscape architectural programs of any college or
university in the state of Tennessee, after application to and subject to approval by the
Board of Architectural and Engineering Examiners. The Board will develop guidelines
for application, award and disbursement of the funds appropriated herein.
Item 51. Commerce and Insurance, Fire Prevention, Tennessee Association of
Rescue Squads, in Section 1, Title III-11, Item 10, the appropriation of $100,000 is for
the sole purpose of maintaining a state headquarters of the association and to pay the
salary of an executive director of the association and other expenses appurtenant
thereto.
Item 52. Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, Community Mental
Health Services, in Section 1, Title III-14, Item 2.5, the department is authorized to
expend up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for reimbursement of
licensed supportive living facilities for the mentally ill, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 12-4-308, and such funds are specifically appropriated for that
purpose.
- 41 - 003682

Item 53. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
Community Mental Health Services, in Section 1, Title III-14, Item 2.5, an amount of
$700,000 is to be paid to Centerstone Military Services, in three regions of Tennessee
for the purpose of providing professional counseling services to veterans and their
families who suffer from post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD).
Item 54. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, in
Section 1, Title III-14, an amount of $200,000 for the sole purpose of making a grant in
such amount to the Prevention Alliance of Tennessee (PAT), to be used for establishing,
training, and supporting substance use prevention coalitions in Tennessee.
Item 55. Department of Health, Community and Medical Services, in Section 1,
Title III-16, Item 3.4, an amount of $263,700 is to be paid to St. Jude Hospital in
Memphis to defray, in whole or in part, the expenses of patients and their families who
are citizens and residents of Tennessee in traveling to and from St. Jude Hospital. Such
payments shall be administered by the hospital and shall be made on the basis of need.
Such patients, or their families, requesting assistance from these funds shall supply such
documents supporting need and travel expenses as the hospital may require.
Item 56. Department of Health, Health Services, in Section 1, Title III-16, Item 4,
the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) for the Health Access Incentive Fund. The
commissioner of health shall direct these funds, subject to the approval of the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, to programs designed to enhance health
access. The programs may include, but not be limited to, funding for services provided
by federally qualified health centers, recruitment incentives, community initiatives,
service-linked training opportunities, support for high technology/telecommunications
efforts, prevention initiatives, efforts to improve the built environment, strategies to
improve the health of the population, and other strategies to expand primary, obstetric
and dental health care services in underserved areas. Pursuant to a finding of need by
the commissioner, the health access program may also address the lack of adequate
access in underserved areas to other health care providers and health care services
such as emergency medicine, mental health care, and prevention treatment services for
low income, pregnant substance abusers.
Item 57. Department of Health, Community and Medical Services, in Section 1,
Title III-16, Item 3.4, there is appropriated the sum of $190,000 for the sole purpose of
contracting with a nonprofit organization for promotion of health awareness among
Tennessee males. Such nonprofit organization must have been established prior to
January 1, 2004; must have received a contract administered through the Tennessee
Department of Health; must have received funding through the vitamin supplement
settlement of June 2003, administered by the Tennessee attorney general's office; and
must possess substantial experience with general health outreach and education
activities for males in Tennessee, including activities for the general population and the
underserved living in Tennessee.
Item 58. Department of Health, Community and Medical Services, in Section 1,
Title III-16, Item 3.4, the amount of $100,000 is to be paid to Crumley House, located in
Washington County, to provide programs and services on behalf of persons suffering
from traumatic brain injuries.
- 42 - 003682

Item 59. Department of Health, in Section 1, Title III-16, the sum of $500,000 for
the sole purpose of making grants in the amount of $100,000 each to the five (5)
Regional Perinatal Centers: Erlanger Health System/Children's Hospital at Erlanger;
Johnson City Medical Center; the University of Tennessee Medical Center at Knoxville;
Vanderbilt University Medical Center/Monroe Carrell, Jr. Children's Hospital at
Vanderbilt; and, the Regional Medical Center at Memphis; to be used to provide
additional nurse educators and associated services.
Item 60. Department of Health in Section 1, Title III-16, an amount of $500,000
for a grant to the Meharry Wellness Program.
Item 61. Department of Health, Emergency Medical Services, in Section 1, Title
III-16, Item 2.2, funds are earmarked for payment to eligible units of local government to
pay bonus supplements to emergency medical services personnel who successfully
complete during calendar year 2025 an in-service training program appropriate to such
personnel’s rank and responsibility and the size and location of the department of at
least forty (40) hours duration at a school established or certified by the emergency
medical services board. The funds appropriated by this item shall be disbursed in
accordance with the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part
18 and Section 68-140-335, and no supplement to any person shall exceed eight
hundred dollars ($800).
Item 62. Department of Health, in Section 1, Title III-16, appropriations for the
State HIV Surveillance and Prevention Program shall be subject to the provisions of
Section 21 of this act.
Item 63. Department of Disability and Aging, in Section 1, Title III-25, an amount
of $355,000 for a grant to Vanderbilt University Medical Center, to be used for the
Providing Access to the Visual Environment (PAVE) Program.
Item 64. Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, and from
revenues receivable by the department pursuant to the appropriation of federal revenue
in Section 4, Title III-17, an amount not to exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000)
hereby is appropriated to the department for the purpose of making advance payments
to certain social services contractors, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71,
Chapter 1, Part 2.
Item 65. Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, Item 3, the
amount of $1,613,600 is to be paid to Human Resource Agencies and Community
Action Agencies subject to the provisions of Section 21 of this act.
Item 66. Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, the amount of
$1,000,000 for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Second
Harvest Food Bank of Middle Tennessee, to be used for the purpose of purchasing,
handling, and transporting food for hunger relief. The Second Harvest Food Bank of
Middle Tennessee shall distribute the funds to the five (5) food banks across the state,
as follows:
(a) 35% to Second Harvest Food Bank of Middle Tennessee;
- 43 - 003682

(b) 25% to Memphis Food Bank;
(c) 20% to Second Harvest Food Bank of East Tennessee;
(d) 10% to Chattanooga Area Food Bank;
(e) 10% to Second Harvest Food Bank of Northeast Tennessee.
Item 67. Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, the sum of
$100,000 (recurring) for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to Society of
St. Andrew - Tennessee, to be used for food bank supplies and operational expenses
related to hunger relief.
Item 68. Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, the sum of
$187,500 for a grant to the Tennessee state alliance of YMCAs rural communities.
Item 69. Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 7, for
Intergovernmental Conference Dues, it is the legislative intent that annual dues
assessed by the Council of State Governments (CSG), the National Conference of State
Legislatures (NCSL), and the National Conference of Insurance Legislators be paid
timely in the following amounts: (a) CSG, $250,937; (b) NCSL, $255,326; and (c)
National Conference of Insurance Legislators, $20,000.
Item 70. Miscellaneous Appropriations, UT-CBER – Research Assistance, and
UT-CBER – State Census Data Center, in Section 1, Title III-22, Items 9.11 and 9.12,
are for research assistance to the Department of Finance and Administration and for
services delivered under the state data contract with the U.S. Census Bureau.
Item 71. Miscellaneous Appropriations, in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 9.32, shall
be paid as a direct appropriation to the Governor's Rural Education Foundation.
Item 72. Miscellaneous Appropriations, PC 512 – Transportation of Mental
Health Patients, in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 10.4, shall be paid subject to the
provisions of Section 21 of this Act.
Item 73. Department of Children's Services, Family Support Services, in Section
1, Title III-23, Item 2, the amount of $49,000 is to be paid to A Secret Safe Place for
Newborns of Tennessee, Inc., to be used for operational expenses.
Item 74. Department of Children’s Services, in Section 1, Title III-23, the amount
of $700,000 for a grant to Carroll Academy.
Item 75. From state funds available to the Department of Children's Services,
there is earmarked the sum of $588,000 (recurring) for the sole purpose of funding four
(4) additional Safe Baby Courts in Tennessee and Safe Baby Court training.
Item 76. Emergency and Contingency Fund in Section 1, Title III-27, there is
hereby appropriated an amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the
following purposes: (1) assistance related to natural disasters, including but not limited
to, forest fires, floods, and tornadoes, (2) payment of indemnities for destruction of
livestock, including poultry, and extraordinary veterinary payrolls for cattle market
fluctuations by the Department of Agriculture, (3) payment of extraordinary expenditures
for insect and pest control efforts and for extraordinary livestock, including poultry,
- 44 - 003682

disease control efforts by the Department of Agriculture, and (4) the cost of personnel
and equipment needed to restore law and order in instances arising out of civil disorders.
SECTION 8. Sum-Sufficient Appropriations from State Revenues and Reserves. In
addition to the appropriations made in Section 1 of this act and subject to the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51, there is
hereby appropriated a sum sufficient:
Item 1. To pay all lawful claims due from the state to any of the several counties
thereof on account of unpaid court costs, unpaid allotments of taxes distributable by the
state to the counties and such other sums as may be due from the state to the counties,
but none of such funds shall be distributed to the counties of the state until after the
validity of the claims has been investigated and approved by the State Comptroller and
the Governor. Provided, however, that such funds shall not include funds due to
counties and cities for the state share of costs to cities and counties as required by
Section 24, Article II, of the Constitution of Tennessee.
Item 2. From the appropriations in Sections 1 and 4 of this act, for state
agencies to pay the professional privilege tax levied in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title
67, Chapter 4, Part 17, on behalf of certain full-time state employees. Such payments
shall be limited to the circumstances and made under the procedure established in
Section 67-4-1709.
Item 3. For the purpose of implementing an employee maintenance policy by the
Department of Finance and Administration. It is the legislative intent to hold harmless,
employees affected by the maintenance policy who were employed as of June 30, 1998.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to allocate the
appropriation to the appropriate organizational units and programs of state government
and to adjust federal aid and departmental revenue allotments accordingly.
Item 4. Settlement and Judgment Awards and Similar Awards. To affected state
agencies, such sums as are received by the Attorney General and Reporter or other
state officials and agencies in settlements and judgments and similar awards for the
purposes received, as determined by the Attorney General and Reporter in accordance
with such settlements and judgments. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration
shall classify such funds as are received in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles and, as advised by the Attorney General and Reporter, is
authorized to allot such funds for expenditure by the appropriate departments and
organizational units of state government. This appropriation shall not include any
amounts of a settlement, judgment, or award not required to be set-aside or expended
for a specific purpose, nor any amounts intended to reimburse or benefit the general
fund, and such revenue hereby expressly is not appropriated. The Attorney General and
Reporter shall file a written quarterly report with the Speaker of the Senate, the Speaker
of the House of Representatives and the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis upon
receipt of any settlement or judgment in excess of $1,000,000; such report shall specify
the nature of the settlement or judgment, the amount of the settlement or judgment and
the purposes for which any such settlement or judgment funds are received. In addition
to the report required on the receipt by the state of settlement and judgment awards in
excess of $1,000,000, the Attorney General and Reporter shall also file a written
- 45 - 003682

quarterly report with the Speaker of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis upon the payment by any
state officials and agencies of any settlement or judgment award against the state in
excess of $1,000,000. Such report shall specify the nature of the settlement or
judgment, the amount of the settlement or judgment, and any other information deemed
by the Attorney General and Reporter to be informative and not subject to any provision
of law prohibiting its disclosure.
Item 5.
(a) In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is hereby appropriated
a sum sufficient from the unexpended balances of grants made to state agencies
under the provisions of Section 23 of Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, and
previous appropriation acts, and previously classified in state accounts as
deferred revenue, to be transferred to dedicated reserves in the general fund at
June 30, 2024. The reappropriation and carry-forward of these funds is subject
to approval by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
(b) In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is hereby appropriated
a sum sufficient from the dedicated reserves in the general fund created at June
30, 2024, from the unexpended balances of grants made to state agencies under
the provisions of Section 23 of Chapters 966, Public Acts of 2024, and previous
appropriation acts, and previously classified in state accounts as deferred
revenue. The reappropriation and carry-forward of these funds is subject to
approval by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 6. From general fund interest earnings for the purpose of funding the state's
liability for the exchange of interest with the federal government as provided for in the
Cash Management Act of 1990.
Item 7. From earmarked and/or dedicated agency revenues and reserves to
provide for the costs of implementing the state's Underground Storage Tanks Program.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall allocate the costs to the
individual agencies and establish the appropriations required from revenues and
reserves available to the individual agencies.
Item 8. From the revenues and reserves of the Electronic Monitoring Indigency
Fund created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-419, in the
amounts allocated to the departments of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
and Safety, as follows:
(a) To the Department of Safety, Tennessee Highway Safety Office, for
grants to local law enforcement agencies for obtaining and maintaining
equipment and personnel for alcohol-related offenses;
(b) To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
Community Substance Abuse Services, for the alcohol and drug addiction
treatment fund; and
- 46 - 003682

(c) To the Department of Safety from its revenues pursuant to the cited
law, to defray its expense of administering the program.
Item 9. To the Tennessee Code Commission for the following purposes: (1) to
purchase pocket supplements for the state-owned sets of Tennessee Code Annotated;
(2) to purchase replacement volumes for state-owned sets of Tennessee Code
Annotated; (3) to purchase replacement sets of Tennessee Code Annotated; (4) to
purchase sets of Tennessee Code Annotated for judges of new courts created during
the 2024 Session of the General Assembly; (5) to purchase pocket supplements for the
state-owned sets of the Index to the Private Acts of Tennessee; and (6) to pay for
proofreading and other expenses involved in preparing supplements and replacement
volumes for Tennessee Code Annotated.
Item 10. To pay the salaries and travel expenses of all persons appointed to sit
as Special Judges, Special District Attorneys General and/or District Attorneys General
Pro Tem, and Special Prosecutors under statutes relating to the state judicial system.
Item 11. To provide for indigent defendants counsel in capital cases.
Item 12. To pay fees of special counsel who may be employed by the Governor
on recommendation of the Attorney General, in accordance with Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 8-6-106, and to pay other expenses in special cases of litigation
involving the state. In matters involving the Tennessee Public Utility Commission,
Housing Development Agency, Wildlife Resources Agency, Department of Financial
Institutions, regulatory boards and other programs and agencies funded by earmarked or
dedicated revenues, the sum sufficient appropriation shall be provided from said
earmarked or dedicated revenues. In matters involving departments, agencies and/or
programs funded in whole or in part with federal aid and/or departmental revenues and
reserves, the sum sufficient appropriation may be provided in whole or in part from said
revenues and reserves.
Item 13. From the Tennessee general fund opioid abatement fund revenues and
reserves for opioid abatement and remediation activities.
Item 14. To the Administrative Office of the Courts from revenues and reserves
available to the following programs:
(a) Divorcing Parent Education and Mediation Fund and the Marriage
License Tax pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-413(b)(2).
(b) Tennessee Judicial Information System Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 16-3-807.
(c) Board of Professional Responsibility, Tennessee Lawyers Assistance
Programs, Continuing Legal Education and Client Protection Fund. Additional
positions as required are authorized to be established.
(d) Municipal Court Judges and Municipal Court Clerks Training and
Continuing Legal Education pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-
18-304.
- 47 - 003682

(e) General Sessions Judges' Conference pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 16-15-5007 and Section 67-4-606(a)(9), to defray expenses
of serving the general sessions courts.
(f) Judicial Commissioner Continuing Education Account pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-602(k)(5).
(g) Civil Legal Representation from the earmarked litigation taxes levied
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-602(g) and the earmarked
bail bond tax levied pursuant to Section 67-4-806, for the purpose of providing
legal representation to low-income Tennesseans, pursuant to Section 16-3-808.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust the
appropriation in Section 1, Title II, Item 6, as realized receipts of the program
justify.
(h) Professional Bail Bonding Agents Continuing Education from the
earmarked bail bond tax levied pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
67-4-806, for the purpose of developing and providing the education program,
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 11, Part 4. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust the
appropriation in Section 1, Title II, Item 6, as realized receipts of this education
program justify.
Item 15. To the Attorney General and Reporter from the revenues and reserves
available to the following programs:
(a) False Claims Act Fund established pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 4-18-104(j). The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to adjust the appropriation made under Section 1,
Title III-1, Item 1.1, of this act to recognize any reimbursement for expenses
already provided.
(b) Reserve for Attorney General Litigation Settlement. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to establish positions
as may be required.
Item 16. To the District Attorneys General Conference from the revenues and
reserves of the district attorneys expunction fund created by Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(10), for the purposes therein specified.
Item 17. To provide for payment of administrative law judge services. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to allocate the funds to the
appropriate organizational units, adjust departmental revenues accordingly, and
establish authorized positions.
Item 18. To the Tennessee Local Development Authority, a sum sufficient from
the Underground Storage Tank Fund for the purpose of paying debt service and
expenses in connection with any debt issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 444,
Public Acts of 1997, relative to underground storage tanks.
- 48 - 003682

Item 19. To the Office of the District Public Defenders Conference pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-14-210. Additional positions as required are
authorized to be established.
Item 20. To the District Public Defenders Conference from the revenues and
reserves of the public defenders expunction fund created by Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(11), for the purposes therein specified.
Item 21. To the Comptroller of the Treasury, from the revenues and reserves,
including interest earnings, of the Utility Revitalization Fund, pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 7-82-708.
Item 22. To the Treasury Department, Claims and Compensation, from the
reserves of the Educator Liability Trust Fund authorized by Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-8-204, for the purposes therein specified.
Item 23. To the Treasury Department, from bond forfeitures as a result of federal
antitrust litigation settlements.
Item 24. To the Treasury Department, from the tuition guaranty fund established
in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-2018(b).
Item 25. To the State Treasurer, Unclaimed Property, for payment of claims and
claims administrative expense. The provisions of this item take effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it.
Item 26. To the State Treasurer, from a portion of the privilege tax collected
pursuant to Sections 5 and 6 of Chapter 7 of the Public Acts of 2025 (Senate Bill 1 /
House Bill 4) (1st Extraordinary Session).
Item 27. To the Health Facilities Commission a sum sufficient from the revenues
and reserves of the agency.
Item 28. To the Health Facilities Commission from the fees charged pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1620.
Item 29. To the Health Facilities Commission from the fees charged pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-2304(c).
Item 30. To the Health Facilities Commission from the revenues and reserves
available to the following programs:
(a) Nursing Home Resident Protection Trust Fund pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-827.
(b) Medicaid Nursing Home Trust Fund pursuant to Federal Regulations,
Chapter 42, Section 488.442.
(c) Trauma System Fund created by Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 68-59-105. Subject to approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
- 49 - 003682

Administration, the appropriation may be increased or decreased as collections
from the tax established pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-
1025(e), justify.
Item 31. To the Corrections Institute, from revenues and reserves available to
the Local Correctional Officer Training Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 41-7-104.
Item 32. To the Tennessee Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental
Relations (TACIR) from the TACIR reserves authorized by Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 4-10-107. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
adjust departmental revenues accordingly.
Item 33. To the Tennessee Public Utility Commission, a sum sufficient from the
revenues and reserves of the commission.
Item 34. To the Sports Wagering Advisory Council a sum sufficient from the
revenues and reserves of the council.
Item 35. From revenues collected from accounts receivable, to provide for a
consultant's services in review of accounts receivable management for the State of
Tennessee and for the implementation of those recommendations to the extent the
recommendations are approved by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration may establish such positions as may
be required to cost-effectively implement such recommendation. The Commissioner
also is authorized to allocate a portion of the revenues collected to the appropriate
organizational units and programs of state government and to adjust federal aid and
other departmental revenue accordingly. Each allocation shall be a one-time incentive
to maximize accounts receivable collections and shall be used to fund non-recurring
items only.
Item 36. To the Department of Finance and Administration to reimburse the
federal government for arbitrage on the state's general obligation debt.
Item 37. To the Department of Finance and Administration from revenues and
reserves available to the following programs:
(a) To provide funding for the additional sexual assault program services
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 6, Part 3, and 40-24-
108. Any unexpended funds shall not revert to the general fund balance at June
30 and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal year.
(b) To provide funding for family violence shelters and shelter services
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Sections 39-13-101 and 67-4-411. Any
unexpended funds shall not revert to the general fund at June 30 and are hereby
reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) To provide funding from the revenues apportioned to the Domestic
Violence Community Education Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 36-3-616.
- 50 - 003682

(d) To provide funding from the litigation tax apportioned to fund grants to
local governments to purchase and maintain electronic fingerprint imaging
systems pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Sections 67-4-602 and 67-4-
606.
(e) To provide funding for grant awards to halfway houses whose primary
focus is to assist drug and alcohol offenders pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 55-10-419(d)(6). Any unexpended funds shall not revert to
the general fund at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent
fiscal year.
(f) To provide funding for grant awards to child abuse prevention services
from the Child Abuse Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-
13-530.
(g) To provide funding for family mediation, education, and any related
services, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-413.
(h) To provide funding for disbursements from the sale of specialty
license plates pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-301 and 55-
4-296.
Item 38. To the Department of General Services, Real Estate Asset
Management division, to replace any real estate transaction fees waived under the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1105(22). This appropriation is
subject to approval of the State Building Commission.
Item 39. To the Department of Agriculture from revenues and reserves available
to the following programs:
(a) Agricultural Resources Conservation Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 67-4-409(l).
(b) Agricultural Regulatory Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 1, Part 7.
(c) Certified Cotton Growers' Organization Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 6, Part 4.
(d) Tennessee Grain Indemnity Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 32, Part 2.
(e) Agricultural Development, Agricultural Development Fund pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-298.
(f) Division of Forestry, from the proceeds of revenue allocated pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-305(b)(3), pertaining to the sale
and replacement of real property.
- 51 - 003682

(g) Consumer and Industry Services a sum sufficient pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-1311, pertaining to kerosene and
motor fuels quality inspection.
Item 40. To the Department of Environment and Conservation from revenues
and reserves available to the following programs:
(a) Local Park Land Acquisition Fund, State Lands Acquisition Fund, and
State Lands Compensation Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Sections 67-4-409(i) and (j).
(b) Heritage Conservation Trust Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 11-7-103.
(c) State parks program from revenues derived from nonprofit support
groups pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 11, Chapter 3, Part 2.
(d) State Park Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 11,
Chapter 3, Part 3.
(e) State Parks Hospitality Maintenance and Improvement Fund pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-3-306.
(f) State Parks Maintenance from revenue received pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-112(a)(10), from the lease of surplus
state real property for communications relay apparatus or antennae sites.
(g) From revenues derived from the sale of Tennessee Elk River
Development Agency lands. This appropriation is subject to approval by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
(h) Environmental Protection Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 203, Part 1. Departmental revenues shall be
adjusted accordingly.
(i) Radiation Reclamation Trust Fund and the Perpetual Care Trust Fund
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-202-405.
(j) Solid Waste Assistance program from revenues received pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 4, Part 16 and Title 68, Chapter
211, Part 8.
(k) Used Oil Collection Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 68-211-1004.
(l) Hazardous Waste Remedial Action Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 212, Part 2.
(m) Petroleum Underground Storage Tank Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 215, Part 1.
- 52 - 003682

(n) Drycleaner Environmental Response Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 217, Part 1.
(o) Solid Waste Disposal Site Restoration Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 68-211-116.
(p) Hazardous Waste Trust Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 68-212-108.
(q) Tire Environmental Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 68-211-304.
(r) Ocoee River Recreation and Economic Development Fund pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-8-103. The provisions of this item
take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
(s) Natural Areas, from donations to the program.
(t) The reserve for state IIJA matching funds.
Item 41. To the Historical Commission from the Tennessee Civil War or War
Between the States site preservation fund for the purposes provided in Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 4-11-112.
Item 42. To the Historical Commission from the historic property land acquisition
fund for the purposes provided in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-11-113.
Item 43. To the Wildlife Resources Agency from revenues available to the
Wetlands Acquisition Fund and the Wetlands Compensation Fund pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-409(g).
Item 44. To the Wildlife Resources Agency from the general fund for any
difference between the actual charges to the agency under the indirect cost allocation
plan and the amount the TWRA can justify and continue to receive federal funds.
Item 45. To the Wildlife Resources Agency from its own revenues to implement
the programs, activities and projects approved by the Wildlife Resources Agency
Commission. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust
departmental revenue accordingly and to establish positions as may be required.
Item 46. To the Department of Correction from revenues and reserves available
for the following programs:
(a) Sex Offender Treatment Program pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 39-13-708.
(b) Probation and parole supervision and rehabilitation fees pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-203.
- 53 - 003682

Item 47. To the Department of Education in amounts equal to the unexpended
balances of prior year accrued liabilities in the following education programs: (a) Safe
Schools Act of 1998, (b) State testing programs, (c) Governor's Schools, and (d) Special
Schools.
Item 48. To the Department of Education, Charter School Commission, from the
revenues and reserves of the commission relative to the charter authorizer fee, pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 13, Part 1.
Item 49. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, Regulatory Boards,
from revenues and reserves available for the following purposes:
(a) To purchase examinations for regulatory boards. This appropriation
is contingent upon the fees collected for giving examinations being in excess of
the budgeted estimates.
(b) To fund data processing systems development and implementation.
Said appropriations are made pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
9-4-5117.
(c) To the Real Estate Education and Recovery Fund, to provide for
court-ordered payments and to print and distribute to all licensees a manual of
laws and rules and regulations.
(d) To the Auctioneer Education and Recovery Fund, to provide for court-
ordered payments.
(e) To the Cemetery Consumer Protection Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 46-1-105.
(f) To the Pre-Need Funeral Consumer Protection Fund pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-5-414. The Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to make transfers from the Pre-Need Funeral
Consumer Protection Fund to the Burial Services program in the Division of
Regulatory Boards.
(g) To the Board of Court Reporting pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 20-9-616.
(h) To fund payments through the Board for Licensing Contractors
pursuant to the Go Build Tennessee Act, Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-
41-105.
Item 50. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, 911 Emergency
Communications Fund, from the revenues collected pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 86, Part 3.
Item 51. To the Department of Financial Institutions from the following revenues:
- 54 - 003682

(a) Annual banking fee assessed pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 45-1-118. The appropriation from said source may be
increased or decreased as realized receipts from the annual banking fee justify,
subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part
10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51.
(b) Credit union annual supervision fee assessed pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 45-4-1002, and credit union merger fees assessed
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-4-903, and the appropriation
from said fees and reserves may be increased or decreased as realized receipts
from credit union regulation activities justify, subject to the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4,
Part 51.
(c) Compliance division annual supervision fee assessed pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-1-118(i), and the appropriation from said
source may be increased or decreased as realized receipts from the compliance
division justify, subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4,
Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51.
Item 52. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from
revenues and reserves available to the following programs:
(a) Uninsured Employers Fund program pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 50-6-801.
(b) Tennessee Occupational Safety and Health Administration (TOSHA)
program pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 3, Part 4.
(c) Boilers, Elevators, and Amusement Devices pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Sections 68-121-108, 68-121-110, 68-121-115, 68-121-117,
68-122-113, and 68-122-205.
(d) Lawful Employment Enforcement Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 50-1-708.
(e) Workers' Compensation Employee Misclassification Education and
Enforcement Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-913.
(f) Unemployment Compensation Special Administration Fund pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-7-503.
Item 53. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
from the revenues and reserves available to the following programs:
(a) Alcohol and Drug Addiction Treatment Fund pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 40-33-211(c)(2).
- 55 - 003682

(b) Drug Court Treatment Program Resources Fund to provide funding to
establish drug courts pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 16, Chapter
22, Part 1.
Item 54. To the Department of Military to provide for the cost of personnel and
equipment needed to maintain law and order in instances arising out of civil disorders.
Item 55. To the Department of Military, Disaster Relief Grants, for the purpose of
matching federal funds and to the Department of Military to pay the administrative costs
of the Disaster Relief Program. Said appropriations shall be made first from the Reserve
for Disaster Relief, and they are in addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Title
III-15, Item 5, of this act. Federal aid and other departmental revenue may be adjusted
accordingly.
Any unexpended funds remaining in the Reserve for Disaster Relief or from the
appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-15, Item 5, of this act, other acts of this General
Assembly or acts by previous General Assemblies shall not revert to the general fund
balance at June 30.
Item 56. To the Department of Military from the revenues and reserves of the
following programs:
(a) Hurricane Helene Interest Payment Fund, pursuant to Section 1 of
Chapter 2 of the Public Acts of 2025 (Senate Bill 3 / House Bill 3) (1st
Extraordinary Session); and
(b) Governor’s Response and Recovery Fund, pursuant to Section 1 of
Chapter 2 of the Public Acts of 2025 (Senate Bill 3 / House Bill 3) (1st
Extraordinary Session).
Provided, further, pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 2 of the Public Acts of 2025
(Senate Bill 3 / House Bill 3) (1st Extraordinary Session), the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to transfer all or a portion of the interest earnings of the
Governor’s Response and Recovery Fund to the Hurricane Helene Interest Payment
Fund.
Item 57. To the Department of Health from revenues and reserves available to
the following programs:
(a) Child Safety Fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
55-9-602(f).
(b) Traumatic Brain Injury Fund to allow for the provision of enhanced
and/or new services which benefit traumatic brain injury persons and their
families as authorized in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 55, Part
4. Any additional appropriations provided under this item are non-recurring from
carry-forward funds which exist in the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund and are
subject to approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
- 56 - 003682

(c) Health Related Boards, for data processing systems development
and implementation costs and for the cost of investigations and subsequent
prosecution of licensees in violation of their practice acts. Said appropriations
are made pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5117.
Item 58. To the Department of Revenue to pay interest, attorney fees and other
costs which are due with certain taxpayer refund payments.
Item 59. To the Department of Revenue from the C.I.D. Anti-Theft reserve fund
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-3-206.
Item 60. To the Department of Revenue, Administration Division, from proceeds
resulting from investigation and enforcement of state tobacco laws.
Item 61. To the Department of Revenue for sales tax disaster relief payments
made pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-396. Said appropriations
shall be made first from the Department of Revenue unencumbered balance reserve for
sales tax disaster relief, and they are in addition to the appropriation made in Section 1,
Title III-18, Item 8, of this act.
Item 62. To the Department of Revenue, in addition to the appropriation in
Section 1, Title III-18, Item 9, Tax Refund Interest Expense, for interest due to taxpayers
on tax refunds pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-801(b)(1).
Item 63. To the Department of Revenue from the revenues and reserves of the
Insurance Verification program, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-12-
213, for the uninsured motorist identification restricted fund.
Item 64. To the Department of Safety from revenues and reserves available to
the following programs:
(a) Motorcycle Rider Safety reserve fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 55-51-104.
(b) Driver Education reserve fund pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 67-4-606(a)(2)(B).
Item 65. To the Department of Safety from the revenues and reserves of the
Immigration Enforcement Fund, pursuant to Section 5 of Chapter 1 of the Public Acts of
2025 (Senate Bill 2 / House Bill 1) (1st Extraordinary Session).
Item 66. To the Department of Transportation for payments to the Risk
Management Fund. Said appropriation shall be made from the highway fund balance.
Item 67. To the Department of Transportation, for the Air, Water, and Rail
Transportation program, from the Transportation Equity Fund. This appropriation is
subject to the availability of revenue in the fund.
Item 68. To the Department of Transportation, in addition to the appropriations
made in Section 1, Title III-30, for highway maintenance and state highway construction
- 57 - 003682

such amount as the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall determine is
available from tax revenues allocated to the highway fund and from the highway fund
balance.
SECTION 9. Sum-Sufficient Appropriations from Departmental Revenues and
Reserves. In addition to the appropriations made in Section 4 of this act and subject to the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9, Chapter 4,
Part 51, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient:
Item 1. To the Attorney General and Reporter, if the appropriation made in
Section 4, Title III-1, Item 1.1, shall prove inadequate to allow the Attorney General and
Reporter to represent the state agencies and officials before the Claims Commission, or
state agencies and officials in other cases of litigation or other legal matters. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, upon the request of the Attorney General
and Reporter, is hereby authorized to increase the departmental revenue estimate by an
amount sufficient to provide for such representation and to establish positions as may be
required.
Item 2. To the Attorney General and Reporter, a sum sufficient from the Risk
Management Fund for the purposes of implementing the provisions of Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 42, relative to legal representation for state employees. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, upon the request of the Attorney General
and Reporter, is authorized to establish positions as may be required to implement the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 42, Part 1.
Item 3. To the Attorney General and Reporter for the Consumer Affairs program
from departmental revenues and reserves of the program.
Item 4. To the District Attorneys General Conference, from funds confiscated
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-3-207.
Item 5. To the Bureau of Ethics and Campaign Finance from fees collected by
the bureau.
Item 6. To the Secretary of State, Help America Vote Act program, in Section 4,
Title III-1, Item 3.6, from the state reserve for the Help America Vote Act for the purpose
of matching federal funds.
Item 7. To the Comptroller of the Treasury, Division of Property Assessments,
from revenues and reserves derived from the annual assessor's training session.
Item 8. To the State Treasurer, with the concurrence of the Speaker of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, for the purpose of developing
and implementing programs designed to enhance investment and pensions
administration performance, including programs designed to recruit, hire, and retain
qualified investment and administrative staff. The State Treasurer, with approval from
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, is further authorized to establish
additional positions and funding for such positions needed to effectuate the purposes of
this section.
- 58 - 003682

Item 9. To the State Treasurer from the revolving account created pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-603(g).
Item 10. To the State Treasurer from revenues and reserves available to the
Financial Literacy Program pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1706.
Item 11. From the fund created in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-5-
113, to the State Treasurer for purposes of conducting a purchasing disparity study. It is
the legislative intent that such study include the University of Tennessee system and the
state university and community college system; provided, however, the costs of such
study shall not exceed amounts previously set aside therefor. Should available funds be
insufficient to conduct a valid purchasing disparity study, funds appropriated by this item
may be used to conduct a review to determine best practices related to increasing
purchasing opportunities with small and minority-owned businesses and to implement
recommendations arising from the study.
Item 12. To the State Treasurer, Small and Minority-Owned Business Assistance
Program, from funds allocated to the program pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 65-5-113.
Item 13. To the State Treasurer, TN Stars College Savings 529 Program, from
funds transferred into the program from the college savings trust fund program pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-824(c).
Item 14. To the State Treasurer, TN Stars College Savings 529 Program, from
funds transferred into the program from the Small and Minority-Owned Business
Assistance Program pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-5-113(c).
Item 15. To the State Treasurer, TN Stars College Savings 529 Program, from
financial management fees in the program.
Item 16. To the State Treasurer from the earnings of the funds of the Tennessee
Retiree Group Trust to the Tennessee Department of Treasury a sum sufficient for
implementation of Chapter 780, Public Acts of 2022; provided, however, that said sum
sufficient shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration. The State Treasurer shall file a request to establish such sum sufficient
with the Commissioner of Finance and Administration and the Chair and Vice Chair of
the Council on Pensions and Insurance. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration shall not act upon such request until in receipt of a letter from the Chair
and Vice Chair of the Council on Pensions and Insurance acknowledging receipt of the
State Treasurer's request. Within the appropriation approved pursuant to this item the
State Treasurer, with the approval of the Speaker of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, is authorized to establish positions and funding needed to
effectuate the provisions of Chapter 780, Public Acts of 2022.
Item 17. To the Alcoholic Beverage Commission from departmental revenues
available to defray the expenses of outstanding litigation.
- 59 - 003682

Item 18. To the Alcoholic Beverage Commission from the revenues and
reserves of the Responsible Vendor Certification Fund, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 57-5-609.
Item 19. To the Health Facilities Commission from the revenues and reserves of
the Temporary Health Care Staffing Registry.
Item 20. From federal funds available to the Tennessee Housing Development
Agency, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to meet obligations incurred by the
agency, pursuant to the federal Section 8 program and the Hardest Hit Fund (HHF)
Program.
Item 21. To the Tennessee Housing Development Agency from the sale or rental
of housing and other property rehabilitated by the Neighborhood Stabilization Program.
Item 22. To Tennessee Rehabilitative Initiative in Correction Board (TRICOR), in
an amount equal to the balance in the revolving fund, for benefit of the program.
Item 23. To the Tennessee State Museum from (a) deferred revenue and
departmental revenues available to the museum to be used for the purchase of artifacts,
and (b) donations made to the State Museum. Any unexpended revenues shall not
revert to the general fund balance at June 30 and such revenues shall be carried
forward in a reserve at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal
year.
Item 24. To the Tennessee State Museum from departmental revenues from gift
shop sales and rentals of museum space. Any unexpended revenues shall not revert to
the general fund balance at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent
fiscal year.
Item 25. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
adjust departmental revenues related to inter-agency agreements with the Electronic
Health Initiative for the purpose of implementing federal electronic health initiatives.
Item 26. To the Department of General Services for equipment and supplies
ordered but not delivered at June 30, 2025.
Item 27. To the Department of General Services, Warehousing and Distribution
program, from available revenues and reserves.
Item 28. To the Department of General Service, Megasite Authority of West
Tennessee, from the revenues and reserves of the authority.
Item 29. To the Department of General Services, Megasite Water and
Wastewater Authority from the revenues and reserves derived from the megasite water
and wastewater fund.
Item 30. To the Department of Veterans Services, Tennessee State Veterans
Cemeteries, from the revenues and reserves of donations made to the cemeteries
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 46-6-102.
- 60 - 003682

Item 31. To the Department of Agriculture from monies received for
reimbursement for expenses incurred while providing firefighting personnel and services
to other states.
Item 32. To the Department of Agriculture, Carbon Sequestration Program, from
available revenues and reserves.
Item 33. To the Department of Agriculture, Forestry Operations, from federal aid
and other departmental revenues for natural disasters, including wildfire emergencies.
Subject to this appropriation, authorized positions may be increased as required for
wildfire emergencies. This item is subject to approval by the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration.
Item 34. To the Department of Agriculture from departmental revenues from
merchandise sales and rentals of agriculture space. Any unexpended revenues shall
not revert to the general fund balance at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated in the
subsequent fiscal year.
Item 35. To the Department of Agriculture from the reserves of the Riparian
Buffer Incentive Program.
Item 36. To the Department of Tourist Development from revenues received
from communities, businesses, non-state organizations, federal funds, and other
sources of departmental revenue to be used for marketing programs of the department.
Any unexpended balances at June 30 shall be carried forward in a reserve and are
hereby reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal year.
Item 37. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, West Tennessee
River Basin Authority, from funds provided by the counties within the authority area.
Item 38. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Tennessee State
Parks, from revenues collected by the parks system.
Item 39. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Office of Energy
Programs and Energy Loan Programs, from the revenues and reserves of the Petroleum
Violation Escrow Fund.
Item 40. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Natural Areas,
from revenues generated from the disposal of invasive and/or non-native species from
lands under department management undergoing ecological restoration and donations
received for such purpose.
Item 41. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Office of Energy
Programs, from the revenues and reserves of the Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation
Trust Fund.
- 61 - 003682

Item 42. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Clean Water and
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, for administrative expense reimbursement from
the Comptroller of the Treasury.
Item 43. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Office of Energy
Program, from available revenues from settlements entered into by the Department.
Item 44. To the Department of Environment and Conservation from the Oak
Ridge Monitoring fund reserve.
Item 45. To the Department of Correction all monies collected as contraband
from the inmate population at any of the facilities operated by or under authority of the
department. Any unexpended revenue shall not revert to the state general fund balance
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-6-147.
Item 46. To the Department of Correction for the federal State Criminal Alien
Assistance Program.
Item 47. To the Department of Correction for revenues and reserves from the
fees collected by inmate telephone calls.
Item 48. To the Department of Economic and Community Development from
revenues received from communities, businesses, non-state organizations, federal
funds, and other sources of departmental revenue to be used for marketing programs of
the department. Any unexpended balances at June 30 shall be carried forward in a
reserve and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal year.
Item 49. To the Department of Economic and Community Development:
(a) To meet community development block grant expenditure
requirements. This appropriation shall be from federal aid funds.
(b) From monies received from conferences, trade missions, trade shows
and other activities which reimburse the state for expenses.
(c) From interest earnings allocated to the FastTrack Program; Job Skills
Fund; Broadband Fund, and Small Cities Community Development Block Grant
(CDBG).
Item 50. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
TNInvestco liquidation events, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter
28.
Item 51. To the Tennessee Film, Entertainment and Music Commission from
departmental revenues received by and interest earnings allocated to the commission.
This appropriation is subject to approval by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration.
- 62 - 003682

Item 52. To the Department of Education, Achievement School District program,
(a) grants to the district from non-profit entities, (b) from donations made to the program,
and (c) student fees collected by the district; provided, further, that any new grants from
non-profit entities are subject to the provisions of Section 23 of this act.
Item 53. To the Department of Education from student fees collected by the
department and Special Schools.
Item 54. To the Department of Education from donations to the Commission on
Education Recovery and Innovation.
Item 55. To the Department of Education, Charter School Commission, from the
revenues and reserves collected by the commission from the Basic Education Program
or Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement program, pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 13, Part 1.
Item 56. To the Department of Education, from the revenues, including local
revenues, and reserves of the following programs in the Department of Education: (a)
Education Savings Accounts (ESA); (b) Individualized Education Accounts (IEA); and (c)
Achievement School District (ASD).
Item 57. To the Department of Education, from the revenues, including local
revenues, and reserves of the following programs in the Department of Education: (a)
Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement program.
Item 58. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance:
(a) Insurance, from revenues and reserves of the Insurance Education
Fund.
(b) Securities, from the revenues and reserves of the Securities
Enforcement and Legal Training reserve and the Securities Education Fund.
(c) Fire Prevention, for administration and payment of electrical
inspections. This appropriation is contingent upon the fees collected for making
electrical inspections being in excess of the budgeted estimate.
(d) Fire Service and Codes Enforcement Academy, from departmental
revenues for administration and training purposes.
(e) Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy, from departmental
revenues and reserves for administration and training purposes.
Item 59. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from federal
aid funds and other departmental revenues. Subject to this appropriation, authorized
positions may be increased up to one hundred (100) positions.
Item 60. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from federal
National Emergency Grant funds.
- 63 - 003682

Item 61. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
from revenue received from managed care organizations and other non-state
organizations for inpatient mental health services provided for publicly funded or
potentially publicly funded persons.
Item 62. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
from the revenues and reserves of the Tennessee Opioid Abatement Council, pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 13. The council is further
authorized to establish additional positions, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 33-11-104.
Item 63. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
from the revenues and reserves of the Tennessee Opioid Abatement Fund, pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 13.
Item 64. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
from the revenues and reserves of the K-12 mental health special reserve account,
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-502.
Item 65. To the Department of Military, TEMA and Disaster Relief Grants, from
federal aid disaster relief funds.
Item 66. To the Department of Military, Station Commanders Upkeep and
Maintenance Fund and Armories Maintenance, from the station commanders upkeep
and maintenance fund created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-1-
512, to be used for purposes specified therein.
Item 67. To the Department of Health from departmental revenues related to
premiums and drug rebates for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of the Ryan
White program.
Item 68. To the Department of Health from departmental revenues received
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1307, to provide for contracts
with qualified experts relative to hospital cooperative agreements.
Item 69. To the Department of Human Services, subject to the financial reporting
requirement that the value of federal supplemental nutrition assistance be recognized in
the state's accounting system, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from federal
funds to recognize the value of supplemental nutrition assistance.
Item 70. To the Department of Human Services from the revenues and reserves
of the Tennessee Blind Enterprises program.
Item 71. To the Department of Human Services, Disability Determination
Services, from federal aid provided by the federal Social Security Administration.
Subject to this appropriation, the number of authorized positions may be increased to
respond to changes in caseload. This item is subject to approval of the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration.
- 64 - 003682

Item 72. To the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation from revenues and reserves
available to the following programs:
(a) To conduct records and background checks for handgun carry
permits pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351.
(b) To conduct criminal history records checks on purchasers of firearms
(Tennessee Instant Check System – TICS) pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 39-17-1316.
(c) To conduct criminal history checks for employment requirements
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Sections 33-2-1201, 37-5-502, 49-5-
406, 68-11-233, 68-11-234, and 71-2-403.
(d) To certify endorsement of transporting hazardous material on
commercial driver licenses pursuant to 49 CFR Part 1572.
(e) To provide criminal history information through the Tennessee Online
Records Information System (TORIS) pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 38-6-120.
Item 73. To the Department of Safety, Driver License Issuance, from revenues
and reserves available to defray expenses of handgun carry permit program pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351.
Item 74. To the Department of Safety from any donations received from any
non-profit organization created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-
2017.
Item 75. To the Department of Safety, the Department of Revenue, the
Tennessee Bureau of Investigation, the Tennessee National Guard, the Alcoholic
Beverage Commission, and the Office of Inspector General in the Department of
Finance and Administration from the proceeds of property seized and forfeited under
federal procedures which are shared with the departments or the commission.
Item 76. To the Department of Safety, the Department of Military - Tennessee
Emergency Management Agency, and the Department of Environment and
Conservation from the revenues and reserves of the nuclear safety fund, pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-15-114.
Item 77. To the Department of Children's Services, for departmental revenues
from the federal Social Security Administration for the benefit of children in the
department's care.
Item 78. To the Department of Transportation from local government funds,
federal aid and other departmental revenues.
- 65 - 003682

SECTION 10. Provisions, Limitations, and Restrictions on Appropriations. The
appropriations made by this act shall be subject to the following provisions, limitations, or
restrictions:
Item 1. Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-4-109 and Section 8-
4-116, any entity which receives state funds appropriated by the provisions of this act
shall be subject to audit by the Comptroller of the Treasury as to the expenditure and
obligation of such funds.
Item 2. In case revenues are not adequate to meet in full all appropriations made
by this act, the appropriations made for Sinking Fund Debt Service and the amounts
necessary to cover the salary and wage obligations of the state shall have preferential
payment.
Item 3. No expenditure of public funds pursuant to this act shall be made in
violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42
United States Code, 2000(d).
Item 4. No funds appropriated by this act shall be obligated and/or expended for
any newsletter, periodical, or other material which is to be distributed to all, or
substantially all, state employees (excluding higher education) until the agency head
proposing to make such distribution contacts the two Speakers and makes available
equal space for legislative information in such newsletter, periodical, or other material.
This item shall not apply to policy and/or procedural directives.
Item 5. It is the legislative intent to encourage that all conferences, workshops,
meetings, seminars, programs, and similar endeavors conducted for officials and/or
employees of the legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government be
conducted in state facilities whenever practicable.
Item 6. From the appropriations made by this act, claims for official travel
expenses of state employees and members of boards and commissions shall be paid in
accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-26-116.
Item 7. From the appropriations in Sections 1 and 4 for the Appellate and Trial
Courts and other relevant programs of the Judiciary, travel expenses of the state
justices, judges, and chancellors shall be paid in accordance with Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 8-26-101(1) and other applicable law.
Item 8. The Supreme Court shall fix the salaries of the marshals for the Eastern,
Middle, and Western Divisions, which salary shall be payable out of the appropriations
for Appellate Court Clerks.
Item 9. The commission in charge of the Supreme Court Building in Nashville,
established by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-3-701, is authorized to employ
an experienced Engineer-Superintendent to supervise the air-conditioning and heating of
the Supreme Court Building at Nashville and to employ the necessary assistants to keep
and maintain the building. Payment for said services shall be paid out of the
appropriations made by this act.
- 66 - 003682

Light, heat, and water for the Supreme Court Building in Nashville and for the
Supreme Court Building in Knoxville is to be provided by the Department of General
Services out of the appropriation herein made for it.
Item 10. Employees of the office of the Executive Director to the District Public
Defenders Conference, District Public Defenders and employees of a District Public
Defenders Office, as created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter
14, shall only travel and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the
provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the Department of
Finance and Administration and approved by the Attorney General.
Item 11. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 5.8, for the Tax
Relief Program, is made for the purpose of providing tax relief for elderly low-income
homeowners, disabled homeowners, and disabled veteran homeowners, as provided by
law. The income eligibility limit for elderly low-income homeowners and for homeowners
totally and permanently disabled shall be adjusted for the fiscal year 2025-2026 under
the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-702 and Section 67-5-703.
Item 12. From the funds appropriated to the TennCare program, the state shall
comply with applicable federal law.
Item 13. Subject to the concurrence of the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration, the Commissioner of Human Resources is authorized to develop and
implement a system whereby the cost of the Board of Appeals created by Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 8-30-108, and of services rendered to the Department of
Human Resources by the Administrative Procedures Division of the Department of State
is recovered from those departments, boards and commissions to whom services are
rendered.
Item 14. The funds appropriated in Section 4, Title III-3, Item 4, to Forestry
Operations, shall include the proceeds from timber, communication access, and carbon
credit sales conducted by the Department of Agriculture. It is the legislative intent that
said proceeds shall be accounted for as departmental revenue.
Item 15. The appropriation to the Department of Correction, Sex Offender
Treatment Program in Section 1, Title III-7, Item 6, is made pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 39-13-708.
Item 16. From the appropriation made to State Prosecutions in Section 1, Title
III-7, Item 7, payments to reimburse counties for housing convicted felons shall not
exceed $41.00 per inmate per day. Provided, however, the $41.00 per inmate per day
limitation on reimbursement payments shall be inapplicable to the extent the state is
obligated by the specific terms of a written contract to provide reimbursement at a rate in
excess of $41.00 per inmate per day, but only to the extent of that contractual obligation.
Item 17. The General Assembly recognizes that demands on available state
revenue are such that it may be necessary to establish priorities among state services
and programs and to revise the methods of allocating state resources. Therefore, it is
the legislative intent that local governments should consider in undertaking long-term
obligations based on state payments, specifically state per diem payments for housing
- 67 - 003682

state inmates in local jails, that existing payments may be reduced or eliminated in the
future and such not be regarded as the principal source of funding for debt repayment
obligations.
Item 18. From the appropriation to the Department of Correction, State
Prosecutions, in Section 1, Title III-7, Item 7, payments for boarding jurors shall be made
in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-18-107.
Item 19. Within the amount appropriated in Section 1, Title lll-17, and in Section
4, Title lll-17, for Temporary Assistance to Needy Families, the Commissioner of Human
Services shall establish by rule or regulation, pursuant to the provisions of Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 71-3-105, to be effective July 1, 2025, the standard of need for
each family size in the Families First program; and, provided further, that the
Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration, may by rule to be effective on July 1, 2025, establish certain
categories of Families First recipients to whom an additional grant differential may be
paid.
Item 20. The appropriations to the Department of Revenue under Section 1, Title
III-18, provide for all the activities of the department and include amounts in lieu of
percentages allowed by law on collection of certain taxes and revenues; such
percentage shall be covered into and made a part of the general fund. Appropriations
also include amounts for motor vehicle registration and any other activities which may be
administered by the Department of Revenue.
Item 21. No funds appropriated by the provisions of this act for any cultural,
specialty earmarked, new specialty earmarked, and collegiate license plate shall be
allocated by the Department of Finance and Administration to the Department of
Revenue until such plate has met all statutory requirements for issuance, as provided in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 4.
Item 22. It is the legislative intent that the appropriation in Section 1, Title III-20,
for the Statewide School Resource Officer (SRO) Program, provides a pool of funding
for grants to local law enforcement entities through local governments for the purpose of
placing one full-time, POST-certified school resource officer position in each public
school. The funding amount per SRO shall not exceed $75,000 per year. The
Department of Safety shall make grant funds available to a local law enforcement entity
after that local law enforcement entity presents to the department an executed
memorandum of understanding (MOU) between the entity and the LEA, public charter
school, or alternative school, pursuant to which the local law enforcement entity shall
provide full-time SROs to schools in the LEA, public charter school, or alternative school.
The MOU shall be in a form prescribed by the department. Further, this pool of funding
shall not be awarded for more than one SRO per public school and is subject to periodic
audit and reporting as deemed necessary by the department. The Department shall
submit a report to the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means Committees of the
Senate and the House of Representatives and the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis
at least quarterly, beginning October 1, 2025, detailing the following information
concerning the School Resource Officer Program: the number of LEAs, public charter
schools, and alternative schools that have executed an MOU with a law enforcement
entity as part of the program; the number of LEAs, public charter schools, and alternative
- 68 - 003682

schools that have executed an MOU with a law enforcement entity as part of the
program and have been provided a full-time SRO; the percentage of public elementary
schools that have an executed MOU and the percentage of those that have been
provided a full-time SRO; the percentage of public secondary schools that have an
executed MOU and the percentage of those that have been provided a full-time SRO;
and a breakdown by county of the percentage of public schools in the county that have
an executed MOU and the percentage of those that have been provided a full-time SRO.
Item 23. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 9.35 in the sum
of $175,000,000 (nonrecurring) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) $100,000,000 shall be allocated to the Violent Crime Intervention
Fund; and
(b) $75,000,000 shall be allocated to the Downtown Public Safety grant
program for the purpose of making grants to local governments to increase public
safety and reduce crime in downtown business and commercial areas. Grants
made from this program shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration.
Item 24. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-8, in the sum of
$50,000,000 (non-recurring) shall be disbursed only upon certification by the
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development to the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration that the Tennessee Valley Authority has secured funding
from the federal Department of Energy to assist in accelerating construction of small
modular reactors.
Item 25. From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-6, the sum of
$30,000,000 (non-recurring) shall be a subsidy from the general fund to the wildlife
resources fund and shall be transferred by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration. This item is subject to Senate Bill ___ / House Bill ___, relative to
expanding uses of the Wetland Acquisition Fund, becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it.
Item 26. From the funds appropriated to the State Treasurer in Section 4, Title
III-1, Item 6.1 and 7.2, for the Treasury Department and Risk Management Fund, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, upon the request of the State Treasurer, is
authorized to transfer amounts budgeted for contract services to payroll, and to increase
the number of authorized positions to replace contractors with state employees.
SECTION 11. Department of Education. The appropriations made by this act under
Sections 1 and 4 to the Department of Education shall be subject to the following provisions,
limitations, or restrictions:
Item 1. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, for the
Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement (TISA) funding formula, shall be
administered pursuant to the provisions of Title 49, Chapter 3, Part 1 and any rules
promulgated for the implementation of the funding formula. The TISA formula shall be
calculated for the fiscal year using the following criteria:
- 69 - 003682

(a) The state shall provide seventy percent (70%) of the statewide funds
generated for the base funding amount and weighted allocations. The state shall
provide one hundred percent (100%) of the statewide funds generated for the
direct funding amounts and outcomes bonuses. For the weighted allocations for
economically disadvantaged provided for the 2025-2026 school year, allocations
shall ensure no district experiences more than a 75% gap reduction of
economically disadvantaged ADM as compared to those funded in the 2024-
2025 school year.
(b) The dollar value of the base funding amount shall be seven thousand
two hundred ninety-five dollars ($7,295) per member student, inclusive of state
and required local funds.
(1) Of the total funds generated in the base by all students, one
hundred and twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) of these funds,
inclusive of state and required local funds, shall be restricted pursuant to
49-3-105(e) for purpose of providing salary increases to existing
educators.
(c) The dollar values of the direct funding amounts, to be fully state
funded, shall be as follows:
(1) Pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(1), a rising fourth grade student who
is determined to not be proficient in English language arts (ELA) based on
the student achieving a performance level rating of "below" or
"approaching" on the ELA portion of the student's most recent TCAP test
shall generate five hundred dollars ($500) to be allocated through the
formula.
(2) Pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(2) – student members in career and
technical programs shall generate funding aligned with following levels
and year progressions:
(A) A student member assigned to the first year of a level
one (1) career and technical program shall generate five thousand
dollars ($5,000) to be allocated through the formula.
(B) A student member assigned to the second year of a
level one (1) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand fifty dollars ($5,050) to be allocated through the formula.
(C) A student member assigned to the third year of a level
one (1) career and technical program shall generate five thousand
one hundred fifty dollars ($5,150) to be allocated through the
formula.
(D) A student member assigned to the fourth year of a
level one (1) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand three hundred dollars ($5,300) to be allocated through
the formula.
- 70 - 003682

(E) A student member assigned to the first year of a level
two (2) career and technical program shall generate five thousand
two hundred dollars ($5,200) to be allocated through the formula.
(F) A student member assigned to the second year of a
level two (2) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250) to be allocated through
the formula.
(G) A student member assigned to the third year of a level
two (2) career and technical program shall generate five thousand
three hundred fifty dollars ($5,350) to be allocated through the
formula.
(H) A student member assigned to the fourth year of a
level two (2) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) to be allocated through the
formula.
(I) A student member assigned to the first year of a level
three (3) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand four hundred dollars ($5,400) to be allocated through the
formula.
(J) A student member assigned to the second year of a
level three (3) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand four hundred fifty dollars ($5,450) to be allocated
through the formula.
(K) A student member assigned to the third year of a level
three (3) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand five hundred fifty dollars ($5,550) to be allocated through
the formula.
(L) A student member assigned to the fourth year of a
level three (3) career and technical program shall generate five
thousand seven hundred dollars ($5,700) to be allocated through
the formula.
(M) A student member assigned to a level two (2) or a
level three (3) career and technical program that is also identified
as a high-cost program shall generate funding equal to the student
member’s proportional share of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to
support additional resources needed in such programs.
(3) Pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(3), a junior or senior in high school
who has not previously taken a postsecondary readiness assessment or
a junior or senior in high school who has previously taken a
postsecondary readiness assessment, but only once, shall generate forty-
three dollars ($43) to fund an opportunity for each the original test attempt
- 71 - 003682

and the retake attempt (eighty-six dollars per student in total) to be
allocated through the formula;
(4) Pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(4), a student in any of the grades
kindergarten through three (K-3) shall generate five hundred dollars
($500) to be allocated through the formula;
(5) Pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(5), a student who attends a public
charter school shall generate funding equal to the student's ADM
proportional share of twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000)
representing the total of the charter school facilities funding shifted into
the TISA formula to be allocated through the formula to all students
identified pursuant to 49-3-105(c)(5);
(d) The dollar value of the outcomes bonuses shall be eighty million
dollars ($80,000,000) to be disbursed pursuant to 49-3-106 and any rules
promulgated for this purpose.
(e) Pursuant to 49-3-104(13), the fiscal capacity calculation shall be
determined as the average of the fiscal capacity estimates generated by the
formula established by the Boyd Center for Business and Economic Research at
the University of Tennessee and the formula established by the Tennessee
advisory commission on intergovernmental relations.
Item 2. From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, for the
Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement (TISA), additional funding for local
education agencies shall be administered pursuant to the provisions of Title 49, Chapter
3, Part 1 and any rules promulgated for the implementation of these purposes:
(a) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) is appropriated for
the purpose of providing fast growth and infrastructure stipends to eligible local
education agencies pursuant to 49-3-107 and rules promulgated for the
implementation of this purpose. From this amount, a maximum of five million
dollars ($5,000,000) may be used for the purposes of issuing infrastructure
stipends.
(b) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) is appropriated for
the purpose of :
(1) providing additional funding for local education agencies
identified pursuant to 49-3-108(b) related to transitioning from the Basic
Education Program to TISA; and,
(2) providing additional funding for local education agencies
identified pursuant to 49-3-108(c) related to ensuring no local education
agency experiences a decrease more than five percent (5%) in funding
between two fiscal years.
- 72 - 003682

(c) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 is appropriated for the purpose of
providing additional funding for local education agencies identified pursuant to
49-3-108(d)(1)(A)(i) related to distressed or at-risk counties for which local
education agencies experience an increase in maintenance of effort
requirements.
(d) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the purpose of
making distributions to local education agencies as identified pursuant to 49-3-
108(d)(1)(A)(ii) related to active tourism development zones.
(e) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed $0 is appropriated for the purpose of providing
additional funding for local education agencies identified pursuant to 49-3-
108(d)(2) related to cost differential factor grants.
(f) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed $14,500,000 is appropriated for the purpose of
addressing teacher compensation disparity, and such funds shall be distributed
pursuant to 49-1-302, to the extent available.
(g) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1c, TISA,
an amount not to exceed seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) is appropriated
for the purpose of proving direct payments as financial incentives for high-
performing local education agencies, where fifty percent (50%) or more of the
eligible schools in the LEA received an "A" letter grade, pursuant to 49-1-228.
(h) For any funds appropriated within Item 2, should the formula
generated funds exceed the appropriated funds for the state's K-12 education
funding formula, the department, with approval from the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration, may utilize unused or pro-rated amounts of funds
from these appropriations to avoid pro-rating overall formula funds.
Item 3. Pursuant to 49-3-106(e), funds appropriated that remain unexpended at
the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general funds but must be used to
supplement future allocations of outcome incentive dollars.
Item 4. Under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-357
and Section 49-3-358, pertaining to interest accruing on investments and deposits to the
Education Trust Fund and the TISA, it is the legislative intent that only interest earnings
be recognized and that no interest expense be charged to the fund and the program.
Item 5. From the appropriations made to the Department of Education under
Section 1, Title III-9, of this act or through other funds received by local education
agencies, local education agencies are required to contribute a portion of the premium of
participation in the basic health plans as authorized by Tennessee Code Annotated 8-
27-302 at the following levels:
- 73 - 003682

(a) Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-303(a)(1)(B),
each local education agency shall pay on behalf of each instructional employee
participating in the health insurance coverage authorized by Tennessee Code
Annotated, Sections 8-27-302 and 303 a minimum of forty-five percent (45%) of
the monthly premium for the coverage elected by the instructional employee.
(b) Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-303(a)(1)(D),
each local education agency shall pay on behalf of each support staff employee
participating in the health insurance coverage authorized by Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 8-27-302 and 303 a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the
monthly premium for the coverage elected by the support staff employee.
The Local Education Insurance Committee shall determine a calendar year 2026
plan of benefits, related services, and monthly premiums for each of the health care
options offered through the "basic plan" it authorizes pursuant to Section 8-27-302,
Tennessee Code Annotated, which results, with reasonable certainty, in the provision of
sufficient revenues to pay plan expenses and to provide for the funding of reserves, as
approved by the Local Education Insurance Committee, for estimated incurred but
unreported claims. The monthly premiums shall be subject to the approval of the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 4-3-1006.
Item 6. The Department of Education shall submit to the Office of Legislative
Budget Analysis the revised TISA funding formula for the ensuing fiscal year no later
than January 1 each year.
SECTION 12. Certain Legislation – Appropriations and Provisions for Funding.
Item 1. It is the legislative intent to recognize a revenue loss from bills that result
in no expenditure increase but forgo revenue which has not been collected previously.
Item 2. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Finance and Administration for
distribution to the appropriate entities a sum sufficient to fund any bill on which the fiscal
note indicates that the cost of implementation of the bill as enacted is not significant. It
is the legislative intent that if funding is earmarked for implementation in such bills that
the funds appropriated in this item be reduced accordingly.
Item 3. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act, if
the fiscal note on any bill states that state revenues would be increased in an amount
equal to or greater than state expenditures as a result of the enactment of such bill, then
there is appropriated a sum sufficient from such increased revenue to the appropriate
entity, as determined by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, to implement
such bill.
Item 4. The provisions of this item take effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it. From the appropriations made in this act, there hereby is
appropriated a sum sufficient for implementation of any legislation cited or otherwise
described by category in this act or in the Budget Document transmitted by the Governor
that has an effective date prior to July 1 of the current calendar year, provided that such
- 74 - 003682

legislation is funded in the Budget Document as submitted by the Governor or in the final
legislative balancing schedules summarizing enacted amendments incorporated into this
act or other appropriations acts of this legislative session and that the fiscal impact of
implementing the legislation, as indicated in the final cumulative fiscal note of the Fiscal
Review Committee on enacted legislation, is less than or equal to the amounts indicated
in the Budget Document or the amendment balancing schedules. The final legislative
balancing schedules may incorporate in summary form the amounts included in the
amendment(s) submitted by the Governor, to the extent adopted, as indicated on the
balancing schedule accompanying the Governor's recommended amendment(s).
Item 5. From funds available to any department, commission, board, agency, or
other entity of state government, there is earmarked a sum sufficient to fund any bill or
resolution, that becomes law or is adopted, respectively, for which the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration certifies in writing that the cost of implementation of the bill
or resolution will be funded within existing appropriations of the entity, within the
availability of revenues received by the entity, or within other existing budgetary
resources. The certification shall include the source of obtaining the funds to provide for
such appropriations. It is the legislative intent that such funding be earmarked for
implementation of any such bills or resolutions in the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025
and June 30, 2026. This item takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it.
Item 6. From the funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation, there
is earmarked a sum sufficient for the sole purpose of funding any general bill or
resolution that is not otherwise funded in this act and becomes a law designating an
interstate, United States highway or state highway as a memorial highway or as a
memorial bridge for certain individuals killed in the line of duty, pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 54-1-133.
SECTION 13. Board of Claims, Property Insurance, and Risk Management.
Item 1. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
reallocate appropriations for Board of Claims premiums and property insurance
premiums among state agencies and programs, based on the actuarial study provided
by the State Treasurer, and to adjust federal and other departmental revenues
accordingly. There is further appropriated for this purpose sums sufficient from
dedicated and earmarked revenues to provide for the allocation of appropriations to
those agencies and programs funded by dedicated and earmarked revenues. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration also shall reduce appropriations from the
general fund and from dedicated and earmarked revenues where necessary, to reflect
the allocations of the actuarial study.
Item 2. From the appropriation made in Section 4, Title III-1, Item 7.2, Risk
Management Fund, funds may be expended for purposes outlined in Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 9-8-109(d), including, but not limited to, contracting with a third party
for claims management services.
SECTION 14. Provisions, Limitations, and Restrictions on Obligation and Expenditure of
Appropriations.
- 75 - 003682

Item 1. The appropriations made by this act and all other appropriations,
including appropriations of departmental revenues as set forth in Section 4 of this act,
shall be obligated and expended under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10, and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51, which shall remain in full
force and effect; and in case of conflict with any other law, the provisions of such laws
shall prevail. All appropriations, except those made by acts authorizing bond issues and
expenditures thereof, though made by other statutes, shall likewise be obligated and
expended under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part
10, and Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 51. Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-
4-5113(b), obligation and expenditure of appropriations made to the following agencies
are exempt from the requirement that agencies first obtain certification of availability of
funds by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration: the General Assembly, Court
System, Attorney General and Reporter, District Attorneys General, Public Defenders,
Office of the Post-Conviction Defender, Secretary of State, Comptroller of the Treasury,
and the State Treasurer.
Item 2. Contracts, agreements, and obligations involving the expenditure of
money by the General Assembly, Court System, Attorney General and Reporter, District
Attorneys General, District Public Defenders, Office of the Post-Conviction Defender,
Secretary of State, Comptroller of the Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall be made
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5113(b).
Item 3. The Department of Finance and Administration may examine and
approve or refuse to approve requisitions for purchases made from the appropriations in
this and other acts, in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-
1006(8). Pursuant to such law, requisitions from the following are excluded from this
examination: The General Assembly, Court System, Attorney General and Reporter,
Secretary of State, Comptroller of the Treasury, and the State Treasurer.
SECTION 15. Provisions, Limitations, and Restrictions on Appropriations.
Item 1. No part of the funds appropriated to any department, office,
instrumentality, or agency of the state government shall be expended in any other such
entity, but if the head of any department, office, commission or instrumentality of the
state government finds that there is a surplus in any classification, division, or unit under
such entity, and a deficiency in any other division, unit or classification, then in that event
the head of such department, office, commission or instrumentality of the state
government may transfer such portion of such funds as may be necessary for the one
division, unit or classification where the surplus exists to the other, except as otherwise
provided herein, provided such transfer is approved by the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration. Such transfer of funds pursuant to this item shall be subject to the
approval of a majority of a committee comprised of the Speaker of the Senate, the
Speaker of the House and the Comptroller of the Treasury.
Item 2. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration may establish in any
department, office, commission or instrumentality of the state government a clearing
account through which all salaries and wages, including the state's portion of retirement,
insurance, Social Security, etc., may be disbursed. In the event such accounts are
established, department records shall be maintained showing the distribution of such
amounts among the various appropriation codes, and any financial reports shall present
- 76 - 003682

expenditures as if such expenditures had been made through the individual
appropriation accounts.
Item 3. In case any division or function of government for which an appropriation
is provided in this act or otherwise, shall be transferred from an existing department, to
any other department, such transfer shall automatically result in the appropriation for
such transferred division or function becoming available to the department to which such
transfer is made for the purposes of such transferred division or function.
Item 4. From the appropriations made to the various state departments and
agencies under this act, and other general acts appropriating money, there may be paid
any expenses incurred by said departments and agencies for the purpose of conducting
and serving as host for regional or national conferences of which such departments or
agencies may be members. Before any funds shall be expended under this
authorization, the amount and purpose of the proposed expenditure shall be approved
by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 5. No department or agency in the executive branch of state government
shall make organizational changes within such department or agency except with the
prior approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-4-101(b). Where an organizational change
requires a transfer of funds between organizational accounts and would constitute a
change in the purpose of the appropriation, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration shall not approve the organizational change until the transfer of funds has
been approved by the committee established by Section 4-4-101(b).
Item 6. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to draw
down disputed federal funds and to reserve the funds to prevent their expenditure until
the dispute is settled; and the Commissioner of Finance and Administration in
consultation with the State Treasurer is authorized to allocate interest earnings on the
draw-down of disputed federal funds and to pay interest earnings to the federal
government in those instances when expenditures are ultimately disallowed.
Item 7. From the appropriation made in Section 4, Title III-2, Item 4.4, to General
Services, Real Estate Asset Management, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to establish new positions for property management for new
buildings the state maintains.
Item 8. Financial Systems Billings. From the funds appropriated in this act, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to approve adjustments in
rates charged by the Department of Finance and Administration for enterprise resource
planning (ERP, or Edison) and the Division of Accounts, the Department of Human
Resources, and the Department of General Services; to reserve any funds needed to
rebate savings to the federal government; and to reallocate state appropriations between
departments and reduce appropriations, and adjust federal aid and other departmental
revenue accordingly.
Item 9. From the appropriations made for accounting functions and other fiscal
activities in this act and other acts of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to establish and charge the costs of accounting positions
- 77 - 003682

and other fiscal positions to said appropriations. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is further authorized to transfer between departments and agencies
existing accounting positions, other fiscal positions and the funding provided in this act
for transferred positions.
Item 10. From the appropriations made in Section 1, Titles III-2 through III-30
and in Section 4, Titles III-2 through III-28, to the Executive Branch departments and
agencies, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer
amounts budgeted for contract services to payroll and to increase the number of
authorized positions to replace contractors with state employees.
Item 11. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
maintain an indirect cost recovery plan to recognize overhead costs associated with the
operations of the Tennessee Public Utility Commission, Wildlife Resources Agency,
Department of Financial Institutions, Housing Development Agency and the regulatory
boards and commissions not under the administration of the Department of Commerce
and Insurance or the Department of Health. The Commissioner is further authorized to
charge the departments and agencies covered by the indirect cost recovery plan for their
individual overhead costs.
Item 12. The state regulatory fee shall be assessed at the rate of five dollars
($5.00) for one (1) year and ten dollars ($10.00) for two (2) years. The fee shall be in
lieu of any allocation of indirect costs which would otherwise be allocated to the
regulatory boards covered by the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-
5117.
Item 13. If any appropriation in this act fails to designate a department or agency
of state government to be responsible for the administration of the appropriation, then
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby directed to designate the
state department or agency to administer the appropriation.
Unless otherwise directed by language in this act, appropriation grants to
agencies outside of state government shall be administered in such manner as the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall determine. Direct appropriation
grants for the benefit of agencies outside of state government may be administered by
the Department of Finance and Administration.
Item 14. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized
to adjust departmental revenue and reserve estimates and related expenditures: (a) for
internal service funds and enterprise funds to record fees received for services provided
to departments, agencies, boards, and commissions, and (b) to record payment for
services provided to state agencies by another state agency.
Item 15. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized
to adjust departmental revenue and related expenditures to recognize (a) the carry-over
of federal funds and other departmental revenues that were budgeted and allotted but
unexpended or unobligated at June 30; (b) an increase in the federal rate of
reimbursement or match in federal programs so that there is less state expense or the
additional federal funds are available to meet increasing costs without improving
programs; and (c) an unexpected increase in federal grant funds so that there is less
- 78 - 003682

state expense or the additional federal funds are available to meet increasing costs
without improving programs.
Item 16. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized
to adjust the estimates of federal block grant funds and other federal grant-in-aid funds
estimated in Section 4 and Section 31 of this act to reflect the actual allocations of
federal revenues made available to the State of Tennessee by the federal government.
Item 17. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer procurement positions from departments and agencies funded by this act to the
central procurement office attached to the Department of General Services, upon the
request of the chief procurement officer, and to adjust departmental revenue estimates
and authorized positions accordingly. The plan for centralization of such procurement
functions is subject to approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 18. From the appropriations made for human resources functions and other
personnel activities in this act and other acts of the legislature, the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to charge the costs of human resources
positions and other personnel positions to said appropriations. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is further authorized to transfer between departments and
agencies existing human resources positions, other personnel positions and the funding
provided in this act for transferred positions.
Item 19. From the appropriations made for radio communications functions in
this act and other acts of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to transfer between departments and agencies existing
radio communications positions and the funding provided in this act for transferred
positions. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further authorized to
adjust departmental revenues as may be required.
SECTION 16. Payments to Consolidated Retirement System.
Item 1. Each department, division or agency for the benefit of which an
appropriation is made herein and which participates in the Consolidated Retirement
System, shall pay from such appropriation monthly such sums as may be due such
Consolidated Retirement System as the state's contribution from such department,
division or agency.
Item 2. From the funds appropriated in this act for the purpose of funding the
state's liability for employee participation in the state retirement system, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust departmental
allotments to reflect active participation in the various programs of the retirement system,
to reallocate appropriations between departments and reduce appropriations, and to
adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
SECTION 17. Group Health Insurance, Long Term Disability Insurance, Dental
Insurance, and Life Insurance Program for State Employees.
Item 1. From the appropriations made herein, the various departments,
agencies, boards and commissions of state government shall pay on behalf of each
- 79 - 003682

participating covered individual within the respective departments, agencies, boards and
commissions, not less than eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the coverage option for
employees and employees' dependents, determined by the state insurance committee to
be the basic health plan for funding purposes in the basic group medical insurance
program, one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the long term disability coverage
option three (3) as approved by the state insurance committee for employees, fifty
percent (50%) of the cost of all dental insurance coverage options for employees and
employees' dependents, one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of basic term life
insurance coverage, and of basic accident insurance coverage for each participating
covered individual; such coverages to be established pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 27, Part 2. In addition to this basic health plan for funding
purposes, the state insurance committee may offer other plan options. Such
appropriations made herein shall not prohibit the state insurance committee from offering
other benefit options as permitted by Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 27,
Part 2.
The employer contribution amounts established by the State Insurance
Committee for eligible participating employees shall not exceed, in the aggregate, the
amounts appropriated in this act. The State Insurance Committee shall determine a
calendar year 2026 plan of benefits, related services, and monthly premiums for each of
the health care options it authorizes pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-
27-202, which result, with reasonable certainty, in the provision of sufficient revenues to
pay plan expenses and to provide for the funding of reserves for estimated incurred but
unreported claims. The monthly premiums and the employer contribution amounts shall
be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration pursuant
to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1006.
The State Insurance Committee shall recognize the annualized rate and benefits
adjustments intended to be effective on January 1, 2026, which are required so that the
plan of benefits, on an annualized basis, shall not exceed the recurring revenues and
any reserves deemed necessary to pay plan expenses.
Item 2. From the appropriations made herein the Department of Military is
hereby authorized to pay, on behalf of each participating national guardsman called up
to state active duty, the cost of each individual's participation in the state-approved
Group Life Insurance Plan for national guardsmen called up to state active duty. The
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 27, Part 2, shall apply.
Item 3. The State Insurance Committee shall establish and maintain, within the
appropriations made in this act for supplemental medical insurance for retired state
employees and retired teachers and in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 8-27-209 and Title 8, Chapter 27, Part 3, the respective contribution levels to be
made by the state on behalf of the eligible participating retirees. The annualized
contribution rate established by the Committee for the eligible participating employees
shall not exceed the amount appropriated in this act, and the rate established is subject
to approval by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 4. It is the legislative intent that the State Insurance Committee establish a
schedule of premium payments for retirees participating in the group insurance plan
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-205(b).
- 80 - 003682

Item 5. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to
establish positions and make appropriate adjustments to the Benefits Administration
budget to reflect changes in the contractual arrangements for medical and other
insurance coverage provided to state insurance plan participants. The establishment of
additional positions and the allotment of additional departmental revenue are subject to
approval by the State Insurance Committee.
Item 6. From the funds appropriated in this act for the purpose of funding the
state's liability for employee participation in the state group health insurance program,
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust allotments to the
various departments, agencies, boards and commissions of state government and to the
institutions of higher education in order to recognize non-recurring savings which may be
generated by actions of the state insurance committee. The Commissioner is further
authorized to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenues, to adjust
appropriations to dedicated and earmarked sources, and to reallocate general fund
appropriations.
SECTION 18. Appropriation of Tax Revenue Allocated by Statute. There are
appropriated all tax revenues which are allocated by statute in accordance with the provisions of
such statutes. The provisions of this section shall apply to all statutes becoming a law prior to
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 19. Duplicate and Similar Appropriations. Whenever similar or duplicate
appropriations are made in this act to those carried in any other act, such appropriation herein
shall not be deemed as a supplemental appropriation, it being the legislative intent that there
shall be no overlapping appropriations for equivalent amounts; but if this act simply supplements
the appropriations made by the other act, then such supplemental appropriation shall be valid.
The same shall apply to similar or duplicate appropriations made solely within this act.
SECTION 20. Proceeds of Surplus Real Property Sales. Whenever the State of
Tennessee has any surplus lands or other surplus real properties which are sold or conveyed
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the proceeds from the sale of such lands or other
real property shall be subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-
112, relative to disposal of interests in real property, and Title 11, Chapter 14, Part 3, relative to
the natural resources trust fund, and other applicable law.
SECTION 21. Direct Appropriations to Non-Governmental Entities – Provisions.
Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a direct appropriation to a non-
governmental agency or entity shall not be disbursed until the recipient has filed with the head
of the agency through which such disbursement is being made a plan specifying the proposed
use of such funds and the benefits anticipated to be derived therefrom, and has agreed to file an
interim status report to be delivered by February 1 of the use of such funds. As a prerequisite to
the receipt of such direct appropriation, the recipient shall agree to provide to the agency head,
within ninety (90) days of the close of the fiscal year within which such direct appropriation was
received, an accounting of the actual expenditure of such funds, and benefits derived, including
a notarized statement that the report is true and correct in all material respects; provided,
however, that the head of the agency through which such disbursement is being made may
require, in lieu of the accounting as provided above, an audited financial statement of the non-
- 81 - 003682

governmental agency or entity. A copy of such accounting or audit, as the case may be, shall
be filed with the Office of the Comptroller of the Treasury.
SECTION 22. Division of Insurance Revenues and Base Funding Level. From the
appropriation made in Section 4 of this act, to the Department of Commerce and Insurance,
Division of Insurance, it is the legislative intent to recognize a base level funding of $7,479,700.
It is further the legislative intent that expenditures in excess of the $7,479,700 base level shall
be funded from the increase in revenues generated by Chapter 333, Public Acts of 2001, which
established funding appropriated to the Division of Insurance in the fiscal year ending June 30,
2001, as the base level.
SECTION 23. Budget and Positions Reconciliation, Allotment, and Reporting.
Item 1. Budget and Authorized Positions Reconciliation and Reporting;
Allotments. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration revise the funding recommendations and personnel
summaries contained in the Budget Document to conform with this act, other general
acts of this Session and any other actions which affect the level of departmental or other
such revenue. The commissioner is directed to make all necessary adjustments to
revenues, appropriations, authorized positions, and totals to effectuate the provisions of
this act as amended by the General Assembly. Said revised summaries shall be
provided to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis, Finance, Ways and Means
Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and to the Office of the
Comptroller of the Treasury and Fiscal Review Committee.
In establishing allotments from the appropriations herein made, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration may establish total spending
authorizations in the amount of the specific appropriation from state revenues herein
made, plus the federal and departmental revenues estimated to be available as
presented in the revised funding summaries cited above. In the event federal and
departmental revenues for any particular program, appropriation code, or other
classification are less than the amount estimated to be available under the allotments
then and to that extent the spending authorizations are hereby reduced; to the extent
that federal or departmental revenues in excess of the amounts allotted are realized,
such excess shall not constitute increased spending authorizations, except under the
conditions herein specified.
In establishing the allotments herein authorized, the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration shall divide the total spending authorizations by allotment code, into
two subdivisions, as follows: (1) Personal Services and Benefits and (2) Other Operating
Expenses.
Item 2. Appropriation Adjustments Required for Proper Revenue Accounting.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to establish state
appropriations and reduce appropriations of departmental revenue made in Section 4
and other sections of this act to the extent required to reflect proper accounting of state
revenues under generally accepted accounting principles. To the extent that state
appropriations are established, departmental revenue estimates shall be reduced.
- 82 - 003682

The Commissioner of Finance and Administration also is authorized to establish
departmental revenue estimates and reduce state appropriations made in Section 1 and
other sections of this act to the extent required to reflect proper accounting of
departmental revenues under generally accepted accounting principles. To the extent
that departmental revenue estimates are established, state appropriations shall be
reduced.
In no instance shall the adjustments made under the provisions of this item result
in a greater allotment of funds than is otherwise provided by this act.
Item 3. Program Expansion Reports (Federal and Other Departmental
Revenue). No state revenues shall be expended by any state agency unless such
revenues are appropriated by the General Assembly, as reflected in the provisions of
this act and the revised summaries cited above. No state agency shall establish any
new programs or expand any existing programs, beyond the scope of those already
established, recognized and approved by the General Assembly, as reflected in this act
and the revised summaries cited above, unless each such new or expanded program is
funded entirely from unanticipated or excess departmental revenues or federal
revenues. However, no such expenditure of unanticipated or excess departmental
revenues or federal revenues shall occur until written notice of the program and the
availability of unanticipated or excess departmental revenues or federal revenues is
submitted by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration to the Chairs of the
Finance, Ways and Means Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives
and until said committee chairs have acknowledged in writing receipt of such written
notice; provided, however, that capital outlay program projects, whether capital
improvements or capital maintenance, shall be submitted to the State Building
Commission to be acknowledged. When submitted, a copy of operational budget
expansion reports shall be provided to the Fiscal Review Committee executive director
and the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis directors for information purposes. For the
purposes of this paragraph, the term "departmental revenues" means earnings or
charges for goods or services; or donations, contributions or participation by political
subdivisions, foundations, corporations, firms or persons; and the term "state revenues"
means the proceeds of taxes, licenses, fees, fines, forfeiture or other imposts laid
specifically by state law.
An expansion report shall not be acknowledged by the Chairs of the Finance,
Ways and Means committees during a time that the General Assembly is in regular,
annual session until each Finance, Ways and Means Committee has held a hearing on
the proposed program expansion, or the committees have held a joint hearing.
Item 4. Reporting on Certain Federal Grant Applications. Each state agency
shall report to the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means Committees of the Senate
and the House of Representatives and to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis when
the agency applies for a new federal grant of more than $100,000.
Item 5. Time-Limited Federal Criminal Justice Grant-Funded Positions. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall report to the Chairs of the Senate and
House Finance, Ways and Means Committees on positions funded by federal criminal
justice grants that are time-limited. The report shall include the number of positions and
costs by federal program and by state agency and program, the period of the grant, the
- 83 - 003682

outlook for federal continuation of the grant beyond the expiration date, and any
conditions of the grant indicating a state obligation upon expiration of the grant. A copy
of the report also shall be provided to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis directors
and the Fiscal Review Committee executive director.
Item 6. Capital Outlay Projects Change Reporting. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration shall provide a written quarterly report to the directors of the
Office of Legislative Budget Analysis and to the executive director of the Fiscal Review
Committee identifying additions, deletions or other modifications of capital improvement
and capital maintenance projects occurring subsequent to enactment of the annual
budget through the appropriations and bond authorization acts.
Item 7. Overlapped Positions Reports. The Commissioner of Human Resources
shall submit a monthly report to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis regarding
positions that have been overlapped for ninety (90) days or more. In addition, the
budget as introduced shall indicate the number of positions overlapped for ninety (90)
days or more at a time no more than thirty (30) days before transmittal of the budget.
Item 8. On or before February 1, 2026, the Commissioner of General Services
shall submit to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis the Annual Facilities Revolving
Fund Report.
Item 9. On or before February 1, 2026, the Departments of General Services
and Finance and Administration shall each submit a report to the Chairs of the Finance,
Ways and Means Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives and the
Office of Legislative Budget Analysis regarding the balance in each department's capital
reserve fund, including information on the dates on which such funds have or will be
expended and the purposes of those expenditures, or alternatively, if such funds have
not and will not be expended, then such report shall include the dates on which such
funds will be returned to the general fund.
Item 10. On or before January 15, 2026, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall submit to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis a report detailing
each state agency's salary equity balance.
SECTION 24. Certain Non-Executive Agencies – Approval of Work Program, Personnel
Authorization, and Revisions, and Administration of Certain Appropriations.
Item 1. The work program and personnel authorization of the General Assembly,
Court System, Attorney General and Reporter, Secretary of State, Comptroller of the
Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall be approved in accordance with Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5110(b).
Item 2. Revisions to the work program of the Secretary of State, Comptroller of
the Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall be approved in accordance with Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5112(b).
Item 3. Appropriations to the Secretary of State, Comptroller of the Treasury,
and the State Treasurer shall be administered in a ministerial capacity by the
- 84 - 003682

Commissioner of Finance and Administration, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-4-5113(c).
SECTION 25. Sovereign Immunity. All appropriations of state revenues and
departmental revenues made in this act and in prior acts shall be protected by the state's
sovereign immunity, as provided in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-1-103(a).
SECTION 26. General Assembly Provisions. From the appropriation made for the
General Assembly under Section 1, Title I, payment shall be made for, but not limited to, the
following items:
Item 1. Any lawful expenses of the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly,
for which funds have not been obligated on June 30, 2025, such funds herein
appropriated as are required may be made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025.
Item 2. The lawful expenses of the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly.
Item 3. The cost of staffing, maintaining and operating the offices of the Speaker
of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, including necessary
travel and other expenses incident to said offices, not covered by Section 1, Title I, Items
1.2 and 1.3, of this act.
Item 4. Such expenses as may be incurred for maintaining legislative facilities
including the maintenance and staffing and such other expenses as may be necessary
to provide offices and other services to members of the General Assembly and their staff
in state facilities in Nashville.
Item 5. Expenses and travel pay to legislators for each day when attending
conferences, workshops, and other official meetings, both within and without the State of
Tennessee, when said travel is approved by the Speaker of the Senate and/or the
Speaker of the House of Representatives. Payments shall be at the same rate provided
for members of the standing committees of the General Assembly when meeting
between sessions. Provided, further, that reimbursement may be made to legislators for
registration fees incurred while attending conferences and meetings as may be
approved by the Speaker of the Senate and/or the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
Item 6. Expenses and travel pay allowed to members of the Joint Legislative
Services Committee at the same rates and in the same manner provided by Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106, and to members of the Fiscal Review Committee, as
authorized under Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-7-102.
Item 7. The Speakers may transfer to the Office of Legal Services for the
General Assembly and to the Fiscal Review Committee sufficient funds to enable them
to complete all studies assigned to them by the One Hundred Fourteenth General
Assembly, and to furnish such help as may be required by standing, select and joint
committees of the General Assembly.
- 85 - 003682

Item 8. Membership dues to the National Conference of State Legislatures,
similar service organizations, and such other conferences as may be approved by the
Speaker of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
Item 9. Any expenditures for legislative purposes called for by resolutions or joint
resolutions properly adopted by either or both Houses of the General Assembly.
Item 10. Payment of expenses to any member, as provided by law, for
attendance at any meeting of any standing, special, or select committee of the General
Assembly, whether such meeting occurs during or between sessions of the General
Assembly. Such expenses for meetings held between sessions shall be paid at the
same rate as provided in the general law for meetings held while the General Assembly
is in session.
Item 11. In addition to appropriations made under Section 1, Title I, there is
hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to cover any increase automatically occurring
under mandate of law in any compensation, benefits, or expenses funded under Section
1, Title I.
Item 12. From funds available to the General Assembly, there is earmarked a
sum sufficient for the sole purpose of funding expenses of members of the General
Assembly for meetings of study committees of the General Assembly on which they
serve; provided, that such expense payment is subject to approval by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives and the Speaker of the Senate in accordance with Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106.
All items listed above, together with any other expenses for the General Assembly, upon
the approval of the Speaker of the Senate and/or the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
shall be paid through the Office of Legislative Administration, who shall also be authorized to
make arrangements for, and incur obligations incident to, any convening of the One Hundred
Fourteenth General Assembly.
Provided, further, that during any period when the Offices of the Speaker of the Senate
or the Speaker of the House of Representatives are vacant, or otherwise upon authority of the
Speakers, the Director of the Office of Legislative Administration is hereby authorized to do any
act which the Speaker might do under the provisions of this section.
The provisions of the section shall not be construed to countermand any general act
passed by the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly.
SECTION 27. General Assembly Provisions – Speakers. The Speaker of each House of
the General Assembly shall be paid from funds appropriated to the General Assembly the
following sums:
Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for their ex officio services during any session
of the General Assembly; plus the sum of five thousand seven hundred dollars ($5,700)
annually for local office expenses in their county of residence which will be in addition to
the cost of maintaining and operating offices in the State Capitol. In addition, each
Speaker shall be allowed the same amount for expenses and travel pay as that provided
for members of the standing committees of the General Assembly when meeting
- 86 - 003682

between sessions, for attending meetings of standing, select, or joint committees of the
General Assembly or when absent from their county of residence on official duty as
Speaker.
The allowance for ex officio duties authorized by this section shall be paid at the
request of each Speaker at any time after adjournment of a session. The amount
authorized hereby for local office expenses shall be paid annually on or after November
1st of each year at the request of each Speaker. Requests for payments shall be
addressed to the Director of the Office of Legislative Administration and need not be
accompanied by a list of expenditures for which allowances the reimbursements are
claimed. Payments for attending meetings between sessions or when absent from
county of residence shall be paid from time to time on request of each Speaker.
SECTION 28. Internal Audit Coordination and Standards. In order to prevent
duplication of effort and to establish professional standards, audits to be performed by internal
audit staffs or grantees of departmental activities funded from appropriations made in this act
shall be coordinated with the Office of the Comptroller of the Treasury, and such reports as may
be issued shall be prepared in accordance with standards established as required by law by the
Comptroller of the Treasury. No department, agency, institution, board, or commission shall
cause internal auditing to be performed by persons who do not meet the job specifications for
internal auditors established by the Commissioner of Human Resources and approved by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration and the Comptroller of the Treasury, pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-304.
SECTION 29. Higher Education. The appropriations to public institutions of higher
education set forth in Section 1 of this act shall be subject to the conditions and limitations set
forth in this section, and shall not be subject to other provisions of this act except as otherwise
expressly stated.
Item 1. Salaries to be paid from the appropriations made to educational
institutions shall be fixed as follows:
The President and the staff of the University of Tennessee, by the Board
of Trustees; the Presidents and staffs of the institutions within, and the
Chancellor and staff of, the State University and Community College System of
Tennessee, by the Board of Regents and the boards of the locally governed
institutions; and the Presidents and staffs of the colleges of applied technology
by the Board of Regents; all of which shall be within the appropriations provided
and available for said purposes.
Item 2. Each higher education institution, including colleges of applied
technology, shall report to the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, the
Tennessee Higher Education Commission, and the Office of Legislative Budget
Analysis, the actual amount of expenditures for maintenance and operation of the
physical plant, exclusive of utilities, for the fiscal year, and any deviation in these
expenditures from the amounts recommended in the funding formula for these purposes,
prorated to reflect actual funding levels appropriated in this act.
Item 3. All institutional revenues of any kind collected by the institutions in the
course of their operations are hereby appropriated, in addition to the specific
- 87 - 003682

appropriations made by this act, for use as deemed necessary or appropriate by the
governing board of the institution and shall be subject to the conditions and limitations
set forth in this Section 29, and shall not be subject to other provisions of this act except
as otherwise expressly stated.
Item 4. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the fee charges among the
public institutions of higher education of the state, be subject to the nature and scope of
the institutions, and that the State Board of Regents, the boards of the locally governed
institutions, and the Board of Trustees of the University of Tennessee shall adjust fee
schedules for universities, community colleges, and colleges of applied technology
within or lower than ranges set by the Higher Education Commission.
Item 5. The appropriations herein for higher education and appropriations of all
higher education departmental and institutional revenue are subject to the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, and Section 4-3-1006(4) and (5). Within
the general requirements of these provisions, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration, in consultation with the Comptroller of the Treasury and the Higher
Education Commission, shall specify the content and procedures for submitting
operating budgets and revisions thereto. The operating budgets shall be submitted to
the Higher Education Commission by the respective governing boards. The Higher
Education Commission shall then submit such operating budgets with their comments to
the Department of Finance and Administration for approval. In addition, the
appropriations in this act to institutions of higher education shall be subject to the
requirements, restrictions and controls of the State Board of Claims and the State
Building Commission in the same manner as other agencies of the state. The governing
boards shall submit to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis both the original and
revised operating budgets proposed. The Tennessee Higher Education Commission
shall submit to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis the revised higher education
funding formula for the ensuing fiscal year no later than December 1 of each year.
Item 6. From the appropriations made herein, institutions of higher education are
hereby authorized to pay, on behalf of each participating employee, a percentage
amount equal to the amount paid by other agencies of the state of the cost of each
employee's participation in the state-approved Group Insurance Plan for state
employees.
Item 7. All appropriations of state revenues and institutional and program
revenues made in this act and in prior acts to institutions and programs of higher
education shall be protected by the state's sovereign immunity, as provided in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-1-103(b).
Item 8. From the appropriations made in this act and other appropriations acts,
the budgetary units in higher education shall pay to the Tennessee Consolidated
Retirement System the employer's share of retirement and shall pay to the Social
Security Administration the Social Security costs including the additional benefit costs
associated with pay, pay raises funded from fees, revenues, payroll savings or any other
funding source.
Item 9. The appropriations in this act for Centers of Excellence and Campus
Centers of Emphasis are subject to allocation by the Higher Education Commission and
- 88 - 003682

the Commissioner of Finance and Administration. In allocating the appropriation for
Centers of Excellence, a consideration shall be planned reductions to existing
expenditures to supplement funding for the centers.
Item 10. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated to the Student Assistance Corporation all reserve balances now
held by the Corporation for the Student Assistance Program authorized by Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 3. It being the legislative intent that these
reserves may be used to cover any expenditures resulting from over-awards of
assistance to students enrolled during the 2025-2026 academic year under the Student
Assistance Program. The allotment of funds appropriated by this item shall be subject to
the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10 and Title 9,
Chapter 4, Part 51.
Item 11. In the Tennessee Student Assistance Awards Program any prior year
appropriations recovered from prior recipients by June 30, 2025, shall not revert to the
fund balance but shall be added to the reserve balances now held by the Student
Assistance Corporation for the Student Assistance Program authorized by Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 3.
Item 12. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the Tennessee Student
Assistance Corporation from accumulated interest earnings in the Academic Scholars
Program (Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-203).
Item 13. From the appropriations in Section 1, Title III-10, Item 1.3, there is
hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to fund scholarships for the Dependent Children
program authorized pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-704.
Item 14. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated a sum
sufficient to the Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation from revenues received
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-702(c) for the loan-scholarship
program for graduate students in professional nursing. Said funds shall not revert to the
general fund, but shall be carried forward for future student awards.
Item 15. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from the departmental
revenues and reserves of the Tennessee Higher Education Commission for the Post-
Secondary Authorization Program.
Item 16. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that the Tennessee
Higher Education Commission shall, as part of the budget recommendation to the
Governor each year, provide estimates of likely increases in student fees at various
levels of state appropriations varying from zero increase in state appropriations to full
funding of the Commission's recommendations. It is further the intent of the General
Assembly that the Commission include within its recommendations the total revenues
expected to be available to each higher education institution for educational and general
purposes (including state appropriations, student fees and any other available funds),
compared to total educational and general revenues recommended for each institution
under the Commission's formula at full funding.
- 89 - 003682

Item 17. State appropriations to higher education institutions will be budgeted
and expended in a manner that advances the priorities and goals of the approved higher
education master plan.
Item 18. From the appropriation to UT Martin in Section 1, Title III-10, the
following sums are for the purpose of supporting the operations of higher education
centers: $200,000 recurring at Parsons; $250,000 recurring at Selmer; $250,000
recurring at Somerville; and $250,000 recurring at Ripley. It is the legislative intent that
such funds shall not be distributed by means of the higher education formula.
Item 19.
(a) From funds previously appropriated for such purpose, it is the intent
of the General Assembly that there is established the Jimmy Naifeh Center for
Effective Leadership at the University of Tennessee to prepare elected and
appointed officials for the challenges of serving the public; to provide leadership
and management programming for government officials from across the state
and the nation; and to provide studies and research in public service on any and
all matters relating to the development of professional skills to enhance
effectiveness as representatives of the people.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that in addition to or as part of
the services provided pursuant to subsection (a), the Center shall administer the
Tennessee Government Executive Institute, the Tennessee Government
Management Institute, and the Local Government Leadership Program as well as
other such programs or initiatives that promote leadership development and
public service.
Item 20. From the appropriation to the University of Tennessee, Institute for
Public Service, in Section 1, Title III-10, the sum of $500,000 is earmarked for the Law
Enforcement Innovation Center for the purpose of technology transfer, management
best practices, and training for law enforcement agencies.
Item 21. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $2,500,000 (recurring) to East Tennessee State
University for state operating support of the Gatton College of Pharmacy.
Item 22. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $2,000,000 (recurring) to Tennessee Tech University for
the sole purpose of operating and maintaining the university's wind tunnel system.
Item 23. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $200,000 (recurring) to the University of Tennessee for
the sole purpose of providing assessor education and technical assistance through the
County Technical Assistance Service (CTAS).
Item 24. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $6,739,500 (recurring) to the University of Tennessee
for the sole purpose of funding operations and core instructional programs at the
University of Tennessee Health Science Center.
- 90 - 003682

Item 25. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is hereby appropriated to the Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation in the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all reserve balances now held by the Corporation from
the TSAC operating fund of the Federal Family Education Loan Program referenced in
U.S. Code Annotated, Title 20, Section 1072b. It is the legislative intent that such
reserve funds be used for agency operating and program expenditures permitted under
Section 1072b.
Item 26. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to transfer, upon the joint recommendation of the
Treasurer and Commissioner of Finance and Administration, from the Lottery for
Education Account established in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-51-111(b), an
amount exceeding the required balance in the general shortfall reserve subaccount
established in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-51-111(b)(3) to the Tennessee
Promise special reserve account for the purpose of funding the Tennessee Promise
scholarships. Such transfer shall occur after all other required expenses for the lottery
scholarship program are made.
It is the legislative intent that the unexpended earnings of the Tennessee
Promise endowment account and special reserve account shall not revert to the general
fund at June 30, 2025 but be carried forward each June 30 and added to the funds
appropriated in the succeeding year for expenditure as awards in the Tennessee
Promise scholarship program.
Item 27. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the Tennessee Higher
Education Commission and Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation from existing (a)
departmental revenues available to the commission or corporation granted from non-
profit entities, and (b) donations made to the commission or corporation. Any
unexpended revenues shall not revert to the general fund balance at June 30 and such
revenues shall be carried forward in a reserve at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated
in the subsequent fiscal year. Any new grants or donations from such entities shall be
subject to the provisions of Section 23, Item 3 of this act.
Item 28. From the appropriation made in Chapter 758, Public Acts of 2016,
Section 1, Title III-10, Item 4.1a, an amount of $28,742,600 was appropriated for a
Community Colleges Shared Services Initiative. An amount up to, but not more than,
one half of said appropriation shall be reimbursed by the Tennessee Board of Regents
to the general fund according to the provisions of a memorandum of understanding
between the Board of Regents and the department of Finance and Administration. Said
reimbursement to the general fund shall not occur until two fiscal years after the
Community Colleges Shared Services Initiative is fully operational; provided further, that
said reimbursement shall occur over ten fiscal years.
Item 29. From the funds appropriated in Section 1, Title III-32, for capital outlay,
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized, subject to approval of the
Tennessee Board of Regents, the presidents of the locally governed institutions, and the
Tennessee Higher Education Commission, to transfer appropriations from the locally
governed institutions to the Tennessee Board of Regents.
- 91 - 003682

Item 30. From the funds appropriated to the Tennessee Higher Education
Commission in Chapter 405 of the Public Acts of 2019, Section 61, Item 17, there is
appropriated the unexpended balance of such recurring appropriation to the Tennessee
Higher Education Commission to be used for the purposes of this item. The previously
appropriated funds shall be for the sole purpose of making grants to The Washington
Center for Internships and Academic Seminars, in Washington, D.C., for the University
of Tennessee system and the six (6) locally governed state universities, to be used for
scholarships for students from the University of Tennessee, Knoxville; the University of
Tennessee at Martin; and the University of Tennessee at Chattanooga; and such state
universities to participate in the internship program provided by The Washington Center
for Internships and Academic Seminars. The Washington Center shall decide on the
scholarship level and a plan for distributing the scholarships. The Washington Center
shall invoice THEC three times a year for scholarship dollars based on the number of
students who are participating in the internship program in each of its three terms. The
Washington Center shall submit a written report by August 1, 2026, and by August 1 of
each year thereafter, that shows where the state money was used to provide the
educational opportunities for the students.
Item 31. From the appropriation made in Chapter 418, Public Acts of 2023,
Section 60, Item 4, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient for scholarships in the
Tennessee Future Teacher Scholarship Program (Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-701).
Item 32. The capital outlay projects listed in the 2025-2026 Budget Document
and which are identified with the heading "Proposed Capital Projects from School Bonds
and Other Sources, Fiscal Year 2025-2026," are presented for informational purposes
only. The projects are subject to recommendation and approval procedures involving
the higher education institutions and their governing boards, the Tennessee Higher
Education Commission, Finance and Administration, the Tennessee State School Bond
Authority, the State Funding Board, and the State Building Commission.
The following proposed capital outlay projects, to be funded from school bonds,
institutional/auxiliary and other funds, are in addition to those projects listed on page A-
141 in the 2025-2026 Budget Document:
SECTION 30. Salary Administration.
Item 1. Salaries provided under the appropriations made in Sections 1 and 4 of
this act to the respective departments, institutions, offices and agencies shall be fixed as
under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 23.
Item 2. Within the appropriations made for the Office of the Attorney General
and Reporter under this act, the salaries of the attorneys, legal and clerical staff and
other employees shall be fixed by the Attorney General. The expenditures provided for
herein shall not exceed the amount of the appropriation to the Office of the Attorney
General and Reporter.
Item 3. The salaries of all employees of the Judicial Branch, except those whose
salaries are set by law, shall be fixed by the Director of the Administrative Office of the
Courts with the approval of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court. The compensation
- 92 - 003682

of the judges, chancellors, and justices of the state's trial and appellate courts shall be
set in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-23-103.
Item 4. Within the appropriations herein made, the salaries of the subordinates
and employees of the Treasurer, Comptroller, and Secretary of State shall be fixed by
the heads thereof, respectively, and the salaries of the employees and subordinates of
the Fiscal Review Committee and the Joint Legislative Services Committee shall be
fixed in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3.
Item 5. All other salaries and wages in departments, institutions, offices, and
agencies, other than the Legislative Branch and agencies enumerated in Items 2, 3, and
4 of this section and in Section 29, Item 1, shall be approved by the Commissioner of
Human Resources, provided, however, that the establishment of salary ranges within
such departments, institutions, offices and agencies shall be subject to the approval of
the Commissioner of Finance and Administration. To the extent that additional funds are
appropriated or are generated within a department or agency by abolishing vacant and
funded positions, subject to review and approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration and the Commissioner of Human Resources, salary increases may be
granted from such funds.
Item 6. Salaries of state employees shall be paid in accordance with the direct-
deposit policy established in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-23-
202(c).
SECTION 31. Federal Block Grant Programs. The provisions of this section take effect
upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. Under the provisions of Section 4 and
Section 23 of this act, it is the legislative intent to appropriate the proceeds of federal block grant
programs, as assumed by the State of Tennessee, in the following manner:
Item 1. Social Services block grant in the amount of $35,363,800 to the
Department of Human Services.
Item 2. Mental Health Services block grant in the amount of $20,407,700 to the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services.
Item 3. Child Care Development Funds block grant in the amount of
$252,916,600 to the Department of Human Services.
Item 4. Maternal and Child Health block grant in the amount of $2,621,700 to the
Department of Health.
Item 5. Preventive Health block grant in the amount of $950,000 to the
Department of Health.
Item 6. Community Services block grant in the amount of $14,981,900 to the
Department of Human Services.
Item 7. Low-Income Energy Assistance block grant in the amount of
$65,794,200 to the Tennessee Housing Development Agency.
- 93 - 003682

Item 8. Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment block grant in the amount of
$35,880,500 to the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services.
Item 9. Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF) block grant in the
amount of $232,280,100 to the Department of Human Services.
Item 10. Small Cities Community Development block grant in the amount of
$56,269,200 to the Department of Economic and Community Development. Said sum
being the estimated allocation of funds for the fiscal years 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
combined.
Provided, however, that all expenditures of any community development block
grant funds in addition to those appropriated and enumerated in this section shall be
subject to the following limitations and restrictions:
The Housing and Community Development Act of 1981 made it possible for
states to assume administration of the Small Cities Community Development Block
Grant (CDBG) previously administered by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD). In Tennessee, the CDBG Program shall be administered by the
Department of Economic and Community Development (ECD).
There shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to ECD such funds as may
be allocated to Tennessee by the federal government for the CDBG Program. The state-
administered CDBG Program shall be developed within the parameters of the CDBG
legislation, applicable federal regulations, and consultation with citizens and elected
officials in Tennessee.
The CDBG goals shall be three-fold: (1) target on areas of economic distress; (2)
stimulate the growth of jobs and income in these areas; and (3) maximize the number of
grantees. Additionally, all CDBG projects must meet one of the three national objectives
of (1) principally benefiting persons of low and moderate income; (2) elimination or
prevention of slums and blight; or (3) elimination of conditions detrimental to health,
safety or public welfare. ECD shall be authorized to make grants and/or loans of CDBG
monies to eligible city and county governments in Tennessee to achieve these goals.
Loan payments and interest shall be reserved for reappropriation and shall not revert to
the general fund balance at year end.
Eligible applicants shall be all city and county governments in Tennessee except
those cities and counties designated by HUD as CDBG entitlement areas. Cities
excluded from the state-administered CDBG Program include Memphis and Shelby
County, Nashville (Davidson County), Chattanooga, Knoxville and Knox County,
Clarksville, Bristol, Johnson City, Oak Ridge, Murfreesboro, Kingsport, Hendersonville,
Morristown, Cleveland, Franklin, and Jackson. These cities and counties will receive
their CDBG funds directly from HUD.
Based upon anticipated CDBG allocations of $28,178,000 in fiscal year 2024-
2025 and of $28,091,200 in fiscal year 2025-2026, the following target funding levels
shall be established:
- 94 - 003682

2024-2025 2025-2026
Administrative Costs .................................... $ 875,300 $ 869,600
Public Health and Safety ............................. 8,719,300 8,692,500
Community Infrastructure ............................ 6,294,200 6,274,800
Community Revitalization ............................ 2,946,100 2,937,000
Water/Sewer................................................ 8,135,100 8,109,300
Set-Aside .................................................. 1,000,000 1,000,000
Miscellaneous .............................................. 208,000 208,000
A fifty percent (50%) reduction in any category will be permitted to facilitate
proper program management and allow administrative flexibility. The funds so reduced
shall be allocated to other categories with priority given to water/sewer projects.
Selection criteria for project approvals shall be uniform within categories,
objective and quantitative, and shall be based on project need, project feasibility, project
impact, community need, the percent of project beneficiaries that have family incomes
below the low and moderate income (LMI) levels, and, for community livability projects,
essentialness.
Project application materials will be supplemented, as appropriate, by site visits
and by informed opinions of state agencies knowledgeable about particular projects.
The level of CDBG assistance for individual projects shall be determined by the
following factors: (1) a maximum grant of $600,000 for individual projects ($400,000 for
community livability projects); and (2) the grantee's ability to pay. A ThreeStar bonus
that increases the grant amount by 5% is added to grantees in certified ThreeStar
counties. Higher grant levels (up to $1,000,000) may be approved for regional projects.
If modifications in the expenditure plan for the CDBG Program are required, said
modifications shall be accomplished in the following manner: (1) If the General Assembly
is in session, such modifications shall be approved by the General Assembly; or (2) if the
General Assembly is not in session, the Governor may either (a) submit such
modifications to the State Funding Board for approval or (b) call a special session of the
General Assembly for approval.
SECTION 32. FastTrack Infrastructure Development and Job Training Assistance. The
provisions of this section are relative to appropriations made in Section 1 of this act and
previous appropriations acts to the FastTrack Infrastructure and Job Training Assistance
program.
Item 1. The appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-8, Item 6, to the
Department of Economic and Community Development for the FastTrack Infrastructure
and Job Training Assistance program shall be expended pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 4-3-716 and Section 4-3-717.
Item 2. There hereby are reappropriated sums sufficient from any amounts
carried forward in the FastTrack fund at the end of each fiscal year pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-716(d).
- 95 - 003682

Item 3. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer sums sufficient from the appropriation for FastTrack Infrastructure and Job
Training Assistance to Community and Rural Development, Business Development, and
Innovation Programs for economic development projects, and the unexpended balances
of the amounts transferred also may be transferred back to the FastTrack program.
Item 4. The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development is
authorized to reallocate sums sufficient from the appropriations for FastTrack
Infrastructure and Job Training Assistance and Tennessee Jobs Skills Program, subject
to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration, and the unexpended
balances of the amounts transferred also may be transferred back to the FastTrack
program.
Item 5. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer from the general fund to the capital projects fund available appropriations made
in this act and previous appropriations acts to the Department of Economic and
Community Development for economic development projects, including amounts allotted
to the FastTrack Infrastructure and Job Training Assistance program and Business
Development program. A transfer may not be made if it would result in a deficiency in
available funds for any FastTrack or Business Development project for which a
contractual agreement has been made, unless such agreement has been amended to
reduce the amount required to be expended in the amount to be transferred or unless
appropriations are available otherwise.
Transfers also may be made from the capital projects fund to the two operating
budget programs from available funds appropriated to the Department of Economic and
Community Development for economic development capital outlay projects. Transfers
are authorized only from available current funds in the capital projects fund and may not
include any amounts from bond authorizations. Before transfers from the capital
projects fund may occur, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall
determine that the current funds are available, that any associated grant agreement for
the capital outlay project has been amended to reduce the capital outlay grant in the
amount to be transferred or that an agreement has not been made for the capital outlay
grant, and that the State Building Commission has approved the capital outlay project
current-funds reduction. Such transfers may not be made if they would result in a
deficiency in available funds for any capital outlay project previously funded, except
under the conditions of this item.
Transfers authorized in this item are subject to the approval of the Commissioner
of Finance and Administration.
Item 6. At the close of each fiscal year, the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development shall report to the directors of the Office of Legislative Budget
Analysis any transfers or reallocations made in Items 3 and 4 of this Section.
SECTION 33. On or before January 31 of each calendar year, the Boyd Center for
Business and Economic Research of the University of Tennessee shall cause to be published a
comprehensive report on the state's economy. Said report shall be based on projections from
the Tennessee Econometric Model and such other information as the Center may deem
appropriate. The report shall contain projections for ten years (beginning with the calendar year
- 96 - 003682

preceding the year in which the report is due) of the annual economic activity (level and percent
change over prior year) for each of the state's major economic sectors; shall include ten-year
projections of selected economic indicators, as specified by the State Funding Board; and shall
also include a narrative description of the short-term and long-term prospects for economic and
business activity in the state based on these indicators. Quarterly projections shall also be
published if available.
Said report shall be distributed to the Governor and the other members of the State
Funding Board. The State Funding Board shall report to the General Assembly as provided in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5202.
SECTION 34. Authorization to Transfer Appropriations in 2024-2025. The provisions of
this section take effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it. From the
appropriations made in Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to make transfers from the appropriations made:
Item 1. To the Attorney General and Reporter in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 1.
Item 2. To the District Attorneys General in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 2.
Item 3. To the Public Defenders Conference in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 4, but
excluding the appropriations to Shelby County Public Defender and Davidson County
Public Defender.
Item 4. To the Department of Finance and Administration in Section 1, Title III-2,
Item 3, and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 5. To the Department of Veterans Services in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 5,
and to adjust federal aid and departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 6. To the Department of Agriculture in Section 1, Title III-3, and to adjust
federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 7. To the Department of Tourist Development in Section 1, Title III-4, and to
adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 8. To the Department of Economic and Community Development in Section
1, Title III-8.
Item 9. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 1, Title III-11,
and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 10. To the Department of Safety in Section 1, Title III-20, and to adjust
federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 11. From the unexpended balance of the Miscellaneous Appropriations in
Section 1, Title III-22, a sum sufficient is authorized to be transferred for reimbursement
of the Tennessee Consolidated Retirement System, if the appropriation in Item 2.1 of the
cited title is insufficient for payment of pensions of former governors and widows of
former governors.
- 97 - 003682

Item 12. From the unexpended balance of the Miscellaneous Appropriations in
Section 1, Title III-22, a sum sufficient is authorized to be transferred for payment of
dues to the National Governor's Association, National Conference of State Legislatures,
Council of State Governments, Southern Governors Association, National Association of
State Budget Officers, and National Conference of Insurance Legislators, if the
appropriation in item 7 of the cited title is insufficient for payment of intergovernmental
conference dues to the organizations cited in this item.
SECTION 35. Authorization to Transfer Appropriations in 2025-2026. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to make the following transfers from
the appropriations made in this act:
Item 1. To the Judicial Branch in Section 1, Title II, but excluding the
appropriations for Board of Law Examiners, Board of Professional Responsibility,
Tennessee Lawyers Assistance Program, Continuing Legal Education, and Client
Protection Fund. Transfer of appropriations to or between Guardian Ad Litem, Indigent
Defendants' Counsel, Civil Legal Representation, Court Interpreter Services, and
Verbatim Transcripts are sanctioned, but transfers from these programs to other
programs are excluded.
Item 2. To the Department of General Services, Division of Motor Vehicle
Management Internal Service Fund, from the funds appropriated to state agencies and
programs by this act, a sum sufficient for the acquisition of motor vehicles.
Item 3. From the funds appropriated in Section 1, Title III-3, to the Department of
Agriculture for the agricultural enhancement program.
Item 4. To the Department of Agriculture in Section 1, Title III-3, to recognize
administrative reorganization and to adjust authorized positions, federal aid, and other
departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 5. In Section 1, Title III-3, Title III-4, Title III-5, and Title III-8, a reallocation
of appropriations between the Departments of Agriculture, Tourist Development,
Environment and Conservation, and Economic and Community Development is
authorized to implement the Tennessee Outdoor Partnership. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal aid and other departmental
revenue accordingly.
Item 6. Subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
administration, in Section 1, Title III-4, and Title III-8, a reallocation of appropriations
between the Departments of Tourist Development and Economic and Community
Development is authorized to economic development and tourism development
initiatives, including but not limited to grants to the Nashville raceway, the music scene
certified program, and tourism enhancement grants for rural communities. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal aid and
other departmental revenue accordingly.
- 98 - 003682

Item 7. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 1, Title
III-5, to recognize administrative reorganizations and to adjust authorized positions,
federal aid, and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 8. To the Department of Correction in Section 1, Title III-7, and to adjust the
number of authorized positions within the department's authorized level.
Item 9. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
Section 1, Title III-8, from Community and Rural Development and Policy and Federal
Programs to Economic Development District Grants to comply with the requirements of
Chapter 521, Public Acts of 2007.
Item 10. To the Department of Economic and Community Development in
Section 1, Title III-8, to recognize administrative reorganizations. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust authorized positions, federal aid, and
other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 11. Subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration, in Section 1, Title III-8, and Title III-13, a reallocation of appropriations
between the Departments of Economic and Community Development and Labor and
Workforce Development is authorized for workforce development initiatives. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal aid and
other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 12. To the Department of Education in Section 1, Title III-9, to recognize
administrative reorganizations and to adjust the authorized positions, federal aid, and
other departmental revenue accordingly. To implement the Achievement other
departmental revenue accordingly. To implement the Achievement School District
program, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further authorized to
increase authorized positions in the Department of Education and to adjust federal aid
and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 13. In Section 1 for Non-Public Education Choice Programs, a reallocation
of funds between the Department of Education and Miscellaneous Appropriations is
authorized. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further authorized to
adjust departmental revenues as may be required.
Item 14. To the administration and support services programs in Section 1, Title
III-10, Item 1, which are administered by the Tennessee Higher Education Commission
or the Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation, to implement administrative
reorganizations upon recommendation of the Executive Director of the Tennessee
Higher Education Commission.
Item 15. In Section 1 for Financial Literacy, a reallocation of funds between the
Department of Financial Institutions and the Tennessee Financial Literacy Commission
is authorized, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-12-126. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further authorized to adjust departmental
revenues as may be required.
- 99 - 003682

Item 16. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in Section 1,
Title III-13, and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 17. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in
Section 1, Title III-14, and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue
accordingly.
Item 18. To the Department of Military, but excluding Disaster Relief Grants, in
Section 1, Title III-15, and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue
accordingly.
Item 19. To the Department of Health in Section 1, Title III-16, and to adjust
federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 20. In Section 1 for Targeted Case Management Services, a reallocation of
funds between the Department of Disability and Aging and the Department of Children's
Services is authorized. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further
authorized to adjust departmental revenues as may be required.
Item 21. To the Department of Human Services in Section 1, Title III-17, and to
adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 22. To the Department of Revenue in Section 1, Title III-18, and to adjust
departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 23. To the Department of Finance and Administration, Strategic Health-
Care Programs, in Section 1, Title III-21, and to adjust federal aid and other
departmental revenues accordingly.
Item 24. The appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-22, Miscellaneous
Appropriations, are authorized to be allocated and transferred to the appropriate
organizational units and programs of state government by the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration. For each appropriation so allocated and transferred, there is further
appropriated sums sufficient from dedicated and earmarked revenues to provide for the
comparable allocation of appropriations to those agencies and programs funded by
dedicated and earmarked revenues.
In addition to the appropriations made in Section 4 of this act, there is hereby
appropriated to the organizational units and programs of state government all federal aid
funds and departmental revenue earnings associated with the allocation and transfer of
Miscellaneous Appropriations authorized under the preceding paragraph in this item.
Item 25. To the Department of Children's Services in Section 1, Title III-23, and
to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 26. To the Department of Disability and Aging in Section 1, Title III-25, and
to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
- 100 - 003682

Item 27. To the Department of Finance and Administration, TennCare program,
in Section 1, Title III-26, and to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue
accordingly.
Item 28. To the Department of Transportation in Section 1, Title III-30, to provide
additional funds for resurfacing as determined by the Commissioner of Transportation.
Item 29. To the Department of Transportation in Section 1, Title III-30, to
recognize administrative reorganizations and to adjust authorized positions, federal aid,
and other departmental revenue accordingly.
Item 30. To the Department of Transportation in Section 1, Title III-30, to
reorganize programs for better accounting and personnel management practices made
possible by the enterprise resource planning system and to adjust authorized positions,
federal aid, and other departmental revenue accordingly.
SECTION 36. Carry-forward and Appropriation of Certain Unexpended Balances. The
provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
Subject to the availability of funding at June 30, 2025, any unexpended balances of
appropriations made under Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, other acts of this General
Assembly or acts by previous General Assemblies, listed in this section are hereby
reappropriated to be expended in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and such appropriations shall be
carried forward in a reserve into the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. The reappropriation and
carry-forward of these funds is subject to approval by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration. Unless otherwise noted, the unexpended balances reappropriated are
authorized under Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, and they are the appropriations made:
Item 1. For data processing services, systems development, data processing
equipment purchases and leases and telecommunication systems purchases and
leases. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer from
the amounts carried forward sums sufficient for the Computer Equipment Replacement
Fund and to the Systems Development Fund.
Item 2. Settlement and Judgment Awards and Similar Awards. From the
appropriations in this act and previous appropriations acts, from funds received by the
Attorney General and Reporter or other state officials and agencies in settlements and
judgments and similar awards, the unexpended balance of such funds shall be reserved
and carried forward until expended for the intended purposes; and such funds as are
carried forward hereby are appropriated for the intended purposes. The provisions of
this item shall not require the reserving of such funds in cases in which the settlement or
judgment does not require the set-aside or expenditure of funds for a specific purpose or
in amounts that are intended to benefit the general fund, provided, however, that funds
designated for the Attorney General and Reporter shall be reserved in the Attorney
General Litigation Settlement Reserve.
Item 3. All funds appropriated to the Legislative Branch which remain
unobligated and unexpended at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general
fund but shall be carried forward in a reserve to be expended in accordance with the
approval of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Speaker of the
- 101 - 003682

Senate. This item shall not be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration.
Item 4. To the Judicial Branch in Section 1, Title II, but excluding the
appropriations for Guardian Ad Litem, Indigent Defendants' Counsel, Civil Legal
Representation, Court Interpreter Services, Verbatim Transcripts, Council of Juvenile
and Family Court Judges, Board of Law Examiners, Board of Professional
Responsibility, Tennessee Lawyers Assistance Program, Continuing Legal Education,
and Client Protection Fund. The reappropriated funds shall be expended for the
integrated computer system for the Tennessee Court System under the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-3-807. This item shall not be subject to the
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 5. To the Judicial Branch, Administrative Office of the Courts, in Section 1,
Title II, Item 14, to defray expenses of serving the General Sessions Courts and the
General Sessions Judges' Conference pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
16-15-5007 and Section 67-4-606(a)(9).
Item 6. To the Administrative Office of the Courts from the unexpended balance
of revenue from the gift received to benefit the Hillman Taylor Library in Memphis.
Item 7. To the Judicial Branch, Board of Law Examiners in Section 1, Title II,
Item 16. The carry-forward amount shall be the difference between expenditures and
revenues, including any reserve balance.
Item 8. To the Judicial Branch, Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges in
Section 36, Item 8, and in Section 65, Item 6, of Chapter 554, Public Acts of 2009, the
non-recurring appropriation to provide for juvenile mental health evaluations.
Item 9. To the Judicial Branch, Appellate and Trial Courts, in Section 36, Item 9,
the unexpended balance of the $4,000,000 appropriation for courtroom security.
Item 10. To the Judicial Branch, Administrative Office of the Courts, in Section
36, Item 10, the unexpended balance of the $1,000,000 non-recurring appropriation to
provide continuing legal education for attorneys providing representation to individuals
before safe baby courts.
Item 11. To the Judicial Branch, Indigent Defendants' Counsel in Section 1, Title
II, Item 5.
Item 12. To the Judicial Branch, Guardian ad Litem in Section 1, Title II, Item 4.
Item 13. To the Attorney General and Reporter, in Section 1, Title III-1, Item 1.3,
for Special Litigation and ongoing litigation and settlements.
Item 14. To the District Attorneys General from revenues earned from the
Department of Human Services for food stamp fraud prosecution activities, the
unexpended balance of such funds, not to exceed $100,000.
- 102 - 003682

Item 15. To the Secretary of State for publication of the Blue Book pursuant to
Section 1, Title III-1, Item 3.3 and Section 36, Item 15.
Item 16. To the Secretary of State in Section 36, Item 16, and in Section 4, Title
III-1, Item 3.1. The unexpended balances of departmental revenue are hereby
reappropriated to fund a charitable solicitations systems development project.
Item 17. To the Secretary of State, State Library and Archives, the unexpended
balances of multi-year library construction grants.
Item 18. To the Comptroller of the Treasury, Division of Property Assessments,
in Section 4, Title III-1, Item 5.4, and Section 36, Item 18, the unexpended revenue
derived from the annual assessor's training session.
Item 19. To the Comptroller of the Treasury, Property Tax Relief, in Section 36,
Item 19, and Section 1, Title III-1, Item 5.8, for property tax relief.
Item 20. To the Comptroller of the Treasury, the unexpended balance of the
non-recurring appropriation in Section 36, Item 20 for the Certified County and Municipal
Financial Officers training programs.
Item 21. To the Treasury Department, in Section 61, Item 24, the unexpended
balance of the $2,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for the Electronic Monitoring
Indigency Fund, including program administrative costs.
Item 22. To the Office of the Post-Conviction Defender for revenue received
from a terminated office space lease settlement.
Item 23. To the Office of the Post-Conviction Defender, the unexpended balance
of the appropriation made in Section 36, Item 207, for the sole purpose of providing
expert witness funding.
Item 24. To the Treasury Department for college savings incentive initiatives and
a college savings plan in Section 36, Item 23, and Section 1, Title III-1, Item 7.3.
Item 25. To the Treasury Department for the TN Achieving a Better Life
Experience (ABLE TN) savings plan for disabled individuals, in Section 36, Item 24.
Item 26. To the Alcoholic Beverage Commission from the unexpended balance
of departmental revenues of the Alcohol Server Responsibility and Training Program
authorized by Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 57, Chapter 3, Part 7.
Item 27. To the Alcoholic Beverage Commission from the unexpended balance
of departmental revenues of the Responsible Vendor Certification fund authorized by
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-5-609.
Item 28. To the Human Rights Commission, an amount not to exceed $200,000.
Item 29. To the State Museum in Section 36, Item 29, the unexpended balance
of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for the sole purpose of providing grants to
- 103 - 003682

museums with a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization or affiliated with a governmental entity
for capital maintenance and improvements.
Item 30. To the State Museum in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 2.10, the
unexpended balance of the $2,145,000 non-recurring appropriation for the
semiquincentennial celebration.
Item 31. To the State Museum in Section 61, Item 17, the unexpended balance
of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for grants to museums with a 501(c)(3)
nonprofit organization or affiliated with a governmental entity for capital maintenance and
improvements.
Item 32. To the Department of Finance and Administration in Section 36, Item
30, and in Section 1, Title III-22, Miscellaneous Appropriations, Item 33.4, of Chapter
603, Public Acts of 2007, for the use of Nashville MTA bus services for state employees,
in an amount not to exceed $200,000.
Item 33. To the Department of Finance and Administration in Section 36, Item
31, for the Pre-Trial Symposium.
Item 34. To the Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 36, Item
32, for transportation of mental health patients.
Item 35. To the Department of Finance and Administration, Office of Criminal
Justice Programs, in Section 36, Item 33, the unexpended balance of the $25,000,000
non-recurring appropriation for Evidence-Based Programming Seed Grants.
Item 36. To the Department of Finance and Administration, Office of Criminal
Justice Programs, in Section 36, Item 34, the unexpended balance of the $100,000,000
non-recurring appropriation for Violent Crime Intervention Grants.
Item 37. To the Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 36, Item
35, the unexpended balance of the non-recurring appropriation for crisis pregnancy
center grants.
Item 38. To the Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 36, Item
36, the unexpended balance of the $10,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for
evidence-based grants for jails – mental health focus.
Item 39. To the Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 36, Item
37, the unexpended balance of the $13,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for victims
of crime act funds.
Item 40. To the Department of Finance and Administration, in Section 61, Item
20, the unexpended balance of the $425,000 non-recurring appropriation for a grant to
Big Brothers Big Sisters of Middle Tennessee, to be used for pro rata distributions,
based on the number of children served, to each Big Brothers Big Sisters agency that is
part of the Tennessee Big Brothers Big Sisters Alliance, for mentoring, health, and
mental health programs and services for young people.
- 104 - 003682

Item 41. To the Department of General Services any unexpended real estate
fees collected by the Real Estate Asset Management Division and the unexpended
balance of appropriation in Chapter 453, Public Acts of 2013, Section 38, Item 5.1, and
carried forward pursuant to Chapter 919, Public Acts of 2014, Section 36, Item 22.
Item 42. To the Department of General Services, Real Estate Asset
Management Division, the proceeds from the sale of surplus personal property assigned
to the division.
Item 43. To the Department of General Services, in Section 4, any unexpended
revenues received for conducting conferences for the Governor's Office of Diversity and
Business Enterprise shall not revert to the general fund.
Item 44. To the Department of General Services, in Section 36, Item 41, for
statewide capital facilities pre-planning.
Item 45. To the Department of General Services, the unexpended balance of all
non-recurring appropriations in Section 1, Title III-2, Item 4, and Section 36, Item 42, for
TN Serves.
Item 46. To the Department of General Services, Megasite Authority of West
Tennessee, in Section 36, Item 43.
Item 47. To the Department of General Services, Megasite Water and
Wastewater Authority, the unexpended balance of non-recurring appropriations of the
authority.
Item 48. To the Department of Veterans Services in Section 36, Item 44, and
Section 1, Title III-2, Item 5.2, and Section 4, Title III-2, Item 5.1 for operational
expenses, excluding payroll, related to cemetery construction and maintenance.
Item 49. To the Department of Veterans Services, Tennessee State Veterans
Cemeteries, the unexpended balance of donations made to the program.
Item 50. To the Department of Veterans Services, in Section 36, Item 46, the
unexpended balance of the $800,000 non-recurring appropriation for a customer claims
management system.
Item 51. To the Department of Veterans Services, in Section 36, Item 47, the
unexpended balance of the $75,000 non-recurring appropriation for the honor guard
grant program.
Item 52. To the Department of Veterans Services, in Section 61, Item 19, the
unexpended balance of the $15,000 non-recurring appropriation for the honor guard
grant program for the sole purpose of making grants in accordance with Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2505.
Item 53. To the Department of Agriculture, the unexpended balance of revenues
from timber, communications access, and carbon credit sales at state and federal forests
and state parks.
- 105 - 003682

Item 54. To the Department of Agriculture, the unexpended balance of revenues
from timber sales at federal forests.
Item 55. To the Department of Agriculture for the agricultural enhancement
program in Section 36, Item 50, and in Section 1, Title III-3, Items 1, 2, 3, and 5.
Item 56. To the Department of Agriculture, the unexpended balance of funds
from the Agriculture Enterprise Fund for agribusiness grants.
Item 57. To the Department of Agriculture, the unexpended balance of the non-
recurring appropriation in Section 36, Item 52, for agriculture innovation projects.
Item 58. To the Department of Agriculture in Section 36, Item 53, for chronic
wasting disease.
Item 59. To the Department of Agriculture, in Section 36, Item 54, the
unexpended balance of non-recurring appropriations for the Wine and Grape Board.
Item 60. To the Department of Agriculture, in Section 36, Item 55, the
unexpended balance of the $448,600 non-recurring appropriation for metrology lab
equipment.
Item 61. To the Department of Agriculture, in Section 36, Item 56, the
unexpended balance of the $2,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for forestry supplies
and equipment.
Item 62. To the Department of Tourist Development, the unexpended balance of
funds from the Tourism Marketing Task Force.
Item 63. To the Department of Tourist Development, the unexpended balance of
funds from the Rural Development Fund for tourism enhancement grants.
Item 64. To the Department of Tourist Development in Section 36, Item 59, the
unexpended balance of the non-recurring $25,000,000 appropriation for the special
event grant program.
Item 65. To the Department of Tourist Development, in Section 36, Item 188, the
unexpended balance of the $17,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for raceway grants.
Item 66. To the Department of Tourist Development in Section 1, Title III-4, Item
1, the unexpended balance of the $500,000 non-recurring appropriation for the
Tennessee sports hall of fame operational funding.
Item 67. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Water
Resources, for land reclamation, in Section 1, Title III-5, Item 17, and Section 36, Item
60.
- 106 - 003682

Item 68. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, State Parks, in
Section 1, Title III-5, Item 5, for operational expenses, and in Section 36, Item 61, for
parks modernization.
Item 69. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 36,
Item 62, for water resources file conversion.
Item 70. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, the unexpended
balance of revenues generated from the disposal of invasive and/or non-invasive
species from lands under department jurisdiction undergoing ecological restoration and
donations received for such purpose.
Item 71. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, Natural Areas,
the unexpended balance of donations made to the program.
Item 72. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 36,
Item 65, the unexpended balance of the $9,348,700 non-recurring appropriation for
megasite and area development.
Item 73. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 36,
Item 66, the unexpended balance of the $3,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for solid
waste assistance grants.
Item 74. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 36,
Item 67, the unexpended balance of the $9,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for solid
waste management site cleanup.
Item 75. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 36,
Item 69, the unexpended balance of the $1,185,000 non-recurring appropriation for
water conservation planning and high hazard dam remediation planning.
Item 76. To the Department of Environment and Conservation, in Section 36,
Item 189, the unexpended balance of the $1,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for
comprehensive planning for solid waste disposal.
Item 77. To the Department of Environment and Conservation in Section 1, Title
III-5, Item 17, the unexpended balance of the $10,000,000 non-recurring appropriation
for water regionalization.
Item 78. To the Tennessee Historical Commission in Section 1, Title III-5, Items
8 and 9, and Section 36, Item 71, for the Tennessee Wars Commission.
Item 79. To the Tennessee Historical Commission, the unexpended funds from
any prior appropriations for publications, historical markers and other historical activities.
Item 80. To the Wildlife Resources Agency in Section 55, Item 1-99, the
unexpended balance of the $10,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Bill Dance
Lakes initiative.
- 107 - 003682

Item 81. To the Department of Correction, Community Corrections, in Section 1,
Title III-7, Item 5, and Section 36, Item 73, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 40-36-304(c)(1).
Item 82. To the Department of Correction, in Section 36, Item 190, the
unexpended balance of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Violent Crime
Intensive Intervention Unit Pilot program.
Item 83. To the Department of Economic and Community Development in
Section 36, Item 74, and from the appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-8, to support
the Three-Star community program, the Main Street program, and other community
development programs.
Item 84. To the Department of Economic and Community Development for non-
FastTrack economic development project grants made in the Business Development
program.
Item 85. To the Department of Economic and Community Development,
Tennessee Film and Television Incentive Fund, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 4-3-4903(e), the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
carry forward unexpended balances of any appropriations made for the incentive fund,
and the unexpended grant balances of the Tennessee Entertainment Commission.
Item 86. To the Department of Economic and Community Development for rural
development project grants made from the Rural Development Fund.
Item 87. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, the
unexpended balance of all non-recurring appropriations for HUD flood assistance grants,
not to exceed $6,000,000.
Item 88. To the Department of Economic and Community Development for the
unexpended balance of funds for LiftTN Urban Competitive Grants.
Item 89. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, the
unexpended balance of all non-recurring appropriations for historic property
development grants, not to exceed $25,000,000.
Item 90. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, Section
36, Item 82, and Section 55, Item 1-19, the unexpended balance not to exceed
$60,000,000 for nuclear energy supply chain investment fund.
Item 91. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
Section 36, Item 83, the unexpended balance of the $1,500,000 non-recurring
appropriation for workforce development initiative.
Item 92. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
Section 36, Item 84, the unexpended balance of the $1,000,000 non-recurring
appropriation for marketing funds.
- 108 - 003682

Item 93. To the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
Section 36, Item 85, and Section 55, Item 1-23, the unexpended balance not to exceed
$7,500,000 for TNGO Tennessee Mobility Innovation Initiative.
Item 94. To the Department of Economic and Community Development in
Section 61, Item 21, the unexpended balance of the $10,000,000 non-recurring
appropriation for SBIR/STTR matching fund program grants.
Item 95. All funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the purposes
of the state testing programs which remain unobligated and unexpended at the end of
any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward in a
reserve to be expended for the purposes of such programs.
Item 96. To the Department of Education in Section 36, Item 87, and in Section
1, Title III-9, Item 2.1e, of Chapter 603, Public Acts of 2007, in a non-recurring amount of
$2,000,000 for the Teach Tennessee Program.
Item 97. To the Department of Education, the unexpended balance of
appropriations for the Safe Schools Act of 1998, in Section 36, Item 88; Section 1, Title
III-9, Item 2.2(a); and Section 8, Item 46(a).
Item 98. To the Department of Education, Achievement School District, the
unexpended balance of allocations made to the district from the Tennessee Investment
in Student Achievement (TISA) program formula.
Item 99. To the Department of Education, Achievement School District program,
from (a) grants to the district from non-profit entities, (b) donations made to the program,
and (c) student fees collected by the district.
Item 100. To the Department of Education, Achievement School District
program, any prior year appropriations recovered from grantees.
Item 101. To the Department of Education, the unexpended balance of grants
received from non-state entities for the provision of program services.
Item 102. To the Department of Education, State Board of Education, Section
36, Item 94, for K-12 Academic Standards Review Process.
Item 103. To the Department of Education, Special Education Services, in
Section 36, Item 95, for the Individualized Education Act.
Item 104. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 97, and in
Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.1e, for standards-based professional learning.
Item 105. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 98, the
unexpended balance of the $200,000 appropriation for educator preparation program
innovation grants.
- 109 - 003682

Item 106. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 99, and in
Section 1, Title III-9, Item 2.2d, for priority school grants, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 49-6-2605(b)(2).
Item 107. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 100, the
unexpended balance of the $3,000,000 appropriation for seat belt grants.
Item 108. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 101; and in
Section 55, Item 1-97, for the Charter Schools Facility Fund.
Item 109. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 102, the
unexpended balance of the $500,000 appropriation for the Principal Leadership
Initiative.
Item 110. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 103, College,
Career, and Technical Education, the unexpended balances of the non-recurring
appropriations for (a) Early Post-Secondary Opportunities, (b) Occupational License
Teacher Loan Forgiveness, (c) Middle School CTE start-up grants, (d) Work-Based
Learning Coordinators, (e) STEM Expansion Program, and (f) National Career
Readiness Certificate Pilot Program.
Item 111. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 104, Academic
Offices, the unexpended balances of the non-recurring appropriations for (a) Rural
Principal Development, and (b) Governor's Civics Initiative.
Item 112. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 105, for (a)
Literacy Coaching Pilot, and (b) Online Literacy Tool.
Item 113. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 106, and in
Section 1, Title III-9, the unexpended balance of non-recurring appropriation relative to
learning loss initiatives.
Item 114. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 107, the
unexpended balance of the $18,500,000 appropriation for summer transportation grants.
Item 115. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 108, the
unexpended balance of the $500,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Innovative
Middle and High School Career and Technical Education grants.
Item 116. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 109, from the
unexpended balances of non-recurring appropriations for school safety grants.
Item 117. To the Department of Education, the unexpended balances of
Education Savings Accounts for participating students, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 49-6-2603(d).
Item 118. To the Department of Education, the unexpended balance of the
$50,000 non-recurring appropriation for 2024 Public Chapter 954 relative to therapy
dogs.
- 110 - 003682

Item 119. To the Department of Education, in Section 36, Item 191, for pre-
kindergarten special education, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.
Item 120. To the Department of Education, for local education agency
reimbursement of paid leave.
Item 121. To the Department of Education, the unexpended balances of
Education Freedom Scholarship Accounts for eligible students, pursuant to Section 2 of
Chapter 7 of the Public Acts of 2025 (Senate Bill 1 / House Bill 4) (1st Extraordinary
Session).
Item 122. To Higher Education, Tennessee Higher Education Commission, in
Section 1, Title III-10, the unexpended balance of revenues, including any associated
reserve balances, received from federal college access initiative grants, for the same
purpose.
Item 123. To Higher Education, Tennessee Higher Education Commission, in
Section 36, Item 113, the unexpended balance of the $1,800,000 appropriation for
Online Innovation Initiatives.
Item 124. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 1, Title III-10, Item 1.6
and in Section 36, Item 114, for the Veteran Reconnect program.
Item 125. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 36, Item 115 and in
Section 1, Title III-10, Item 1.6, for Tennessee Promise Forward grants.
Item 126. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 36, Item 116, for the
unexpended balance of the $25,000,000 appropriation for Governor's Investment in
Vocational Education – Community Grants.
Item 127. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 36, Item 117, the
unexpended balance of the $800,000 appropriation for Institutional Outcome
Improvement Fund.
Item 128. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 36, Item 118, the
unexpended balance of the $150,000 appropriation for the Drive to 55 Operating Fund.
Item 129. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, in Section 36, Item 119, the
unexpended balance of the $2,210,600 appropriation for the College Advisor Corps non-
personnel expenditures.
Item 130. To Higher Education, Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation, for
the Tennessee student assistance program.
Item 131. To Higher Education, Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation, for
the Tennessee student loan program.
Item 132. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, for Supporting Postsecondary
Access in Rural Communities micro grants.
- 111 - 003682

Item 133. To Higher Education, THEC Grants, the unexpended balance of the
non-recurring $1,000,000 appropriation for the higher education completion grants
program referenced in Tennessee Code Annotated, 49-7-178.
Item 134. To Higher Education, in Section 36, Item 124, the unexpended
balance of the $14,500,000 non-recurring appropriation for the tnAchieves Knox Promise
program.
Item 135. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance for the volunteer
firefighter equipment and training grant program, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 68-102-154.
Item 136. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 1, Title III-
11, Item 6, and Section 36, Item 126, the unexpended balance of the non-recurring
appropriations for law enforcement hiring, training, and recruitment program recruiting
bonuses.
Item 137. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 36, Item
127, the unexpended balance of the $24,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for law
enforcement hiring, training, and recruitment program recruiting cost sharing.
Item 138. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 36, Item
128, the unexpended balance of the $1,505,000 non-recurring appropriation for law
enforcement hiring, training, and recruitment program recruiting hiring portal.
Item 139. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 36, Item
129, the unexpended balance of the $1,600,000 non-recurring appropriation for the
purchase of a fire truck for the Tennessee Fire Services and Codes Enforcement
Academy.
Item 140. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance in Section 36, Item
130, the unexpended balance of all non-recurring appropriations for competitive grants
to rescue squads across the state in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.
Item 141. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, in Section 36, Item
132, the unexpended balance of the $2,250,000 non-recurring appropriation for a codes
enforcement system modernization.
Item 142. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, in Section 36, Item
133, the unexpended balance of the $1,500,000 non-recurring appropriation for a
manufactured housing system modernization.
Item 143. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, in Section 61, Item
14, the unexpended balance of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for
competitive grants to volunteer fire departments across the state. The Commissioner of
Commerce and Insurance shall endeavor to distribute this funding proportionally based
on the number of recognized volunteer fire departments serving each of the three (3)
grand divisions of the state.
- 112 - 003682

Item 144. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance, in Section 61, Item
15, the unexpended balance of the $3,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for
competitive grants to rescue squads across the state, to be used for equipment.
Item 145. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in Section
36, Item 134, and in Section 1, Title III-13, Item 8, for the Subsequent Injury and
Vocational Recovery Fund.
Item 146. To the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in Section
36, Item 135, the unexpended balance of the $15,000,000 non-recurring appropriation
for a summer youth employment program.
Item 147. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in
Section 1, Title III-14, Item 2.5, and Section 36, Item 136, for housing initiatives for
persons with mental illness or substance use disorder.
Item 148. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
the unexpended balance of the appropriation made in Section 61, Item 70, of Chapter
1130, Public Acts of 2022, for the use of long-acting, injectable naltrexone and any
wraparound treatment services necessary to provide opioid relapse treatment or alcohol
use disorder treatment to adult clients of mental health providers contracted with the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services. This funding may also be
granted by the department for the same purposes to serve clients in recovery or
treatment court programs or adults in local or state custody in a county jail. Funding
awarded by the department must be used to follow best practices in providing a
continuum of care and to purchase long-acting, injectable naltrexone. The
Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall report all
measures taken to implement this item to the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means
Committees by July 15, 2025, and December 15, 2025.
Item 149. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in
Section 36, Item 138, the unexpended balances of the non-recurring appropriations from
Chapter 4, Public Acts of the first extraordinary session of the 113th General Assembly,
including:
(a) Retention and sign-on bonuses for public health workers in the
amount of $12,131,000; and
(b) Community mental health grants in the amount of $50,000,000.
Item 150. To the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
in Section 36, Item 193 and Section 1, Title III-14, the unexpended balance of the
$5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for crisis stabilization units.
Item 151. To the Department of Military in Section 36, Item 139, for tuition
assistance.
Item 152. To the Department of Military, in Section 36, Item 140, Tennessee
Emergency Management Agency, the unexpended balance of appropriations for state
match on federal emergency preparedness management grants.
- 113 - 003682

Item 153. To the Department of Military in Section 36, Item 141, the unexpended
balance of the $5,565,100 non-recurring appropriation for the lease of a warehouse for
the Tennessee Emergency Management Agency.
Item. 154. To the Department of Military in Section 36, Item 142, the
unexpended balance of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for the STORM Act.
Item 155. To the Department of Military, in Section 36, Item 194, the
unexpended balance of the $2,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for a TEMA incident
management vehicle.
Item 156. To the Department of Military, in Section 36, Item 195, the
unexpended balance of the $1,400,000 non-recurring appropriation for border
deployment.
Item 157. To the Department of Health, in Section 36, Item 143, and in Section
1, Title III-16, Item 4, for the Health Access Incentive Fund program.
Item 158. To the Department of Health, the unexpended balance of the
$5,000,000 appropriation in Section 36, Item 144, for tobacco cessation.
Item 159. To the Department of Health in Section 1, Title III-16, and Section 36,
Item 145, the unexpended balance of all non-recurring appropriations for the Dental
Services Pilot Program.
Item 160. To the Department of Health, in Section 36, Item 196, the unexpended
balance of the $1,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Tennessee Strong Families
doula program grants.
Item 161. To the Department of Health, in Section 36, Item 197, the unexpended
balance of Smile TN dental safety net funds.
Item 162. To the Department of Health, in Section 61, Item 16, the unexpended
balance of the $2,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for competitive grants to
emergency medical services organizations across the state, to be used for equipment.
Item 163. To the Department of Disability and Aging in Section 36, Item 146,
Community Intellectual Disabilities Services, for the unspent balance of appropriations in
the enabling technology program.
Item 164. To the Department of Disability and Aging, any unexpended state
appropriations, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total appropriated funds for the
Tennessee Early Intervention System program in both the Department of Disability and
Aging and the Department of Children's Services and transferred from the Department of
Education to the Department of Disability and Aging. Said reserve is subject to the
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 165. To the Department of Disability and Aging in Section 36, Item 148, the
unexpended balance of the $1,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for adult changing
- 114 - 003682

tables. The department shall award grants up to $10,000 each for the installation of the
adult changing tables.
Item 166. To the Department of Disability and Aging in Section 36, Item 149 and
Section 1, Title III-25, the unexpended balance of the appropriations made for the
implementation of the pilot project requiring the Commission on Aging and Disability to
provide grants in equal amounts to each of the nine (9) Area Agencies on Aging and
Disability (AAAD) for the Alzheimer's and dementia care respite pilot program.
Item 167. To the Department of Disability and Aging, in Section 36, Item 199, the
unexpended balance of the $2,500,000 non-recurring appropriation for inclusive parks
and playgrounds grants.
Item 168. To the Department of Disability and Aging, in Section 36, Item 200, the
unexpended balance of the $5,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Tennessee
Strong Families Network Development.
Item 169. To the Department of Disability and Aging, in Section 61, Item 18, the
unexpended balance of the $3,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for competitive
grants to senior centers across the state.
Item 170. To the Department of Human Services for the purpose of Child
Support Enforcement which remain unobligated and unexpended may be carried
forward in reserve.
Item 171. To the Department of Human Services for the purpose of Vocational
Rehabilitation services to clients which remain unobligated and unexpended may be
carried forward in reserve.
Item 172. To the Department of Human Services, in Section 36, Item 152 and
Section 1, Title III-17, the unexpended balance of the $30,000,000 non-recurring
appropriation for the Child Care Improvement Fund.
Item 173. To the Department of Revenue for the production of license plates.
Item 174. To the Department of Revenue, Administration Division, from
proceeds resulting from investigation and enforcement of state tobacco laws.
Item 175. To the Department of Revenue in Section 36, Item 155, and Section 1,
Title III-18, Item 8, for sales tax disaster relief pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 67-6-396.
Item 176. To the Department of Revenue, Insurance Verification, for the
uninsured motorist identification restricted fund pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 55-12-213.
Item 177. To the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation, in Section 36, Item 158, an
amount up to $1,500,000 for digitization of existing case files.
- 115 - 003682

Item 178. To the Department of Safety and the Tennessee Bureau of
Investigation from the handgun carry permit fees paid pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 39-17-1351.
Item 179. To the Department of Safety, the unexpended balance of donations
from any non-profit organization created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 4-3-2017.
Item 180. To the Department of Safety, the unexpended balance of non-
recurring appropriations for TACN radio system infrastructure.
Item 181. To the Department of Safety, in Section 36, Item 202, the unexpended
balance of the $8,282,500 non-recurring appropriation for communications infrastructure
replacement.
Item 182. To the Department of Safety, in Section 36, Item 203, the unexpended
balance of the $25,932,300 non-recurring appropriation for highway patrol equipment
modernization.
Item 183. To the Department of Safety, in Section 36, Item 204, the unexpended
balance of the $1,100,000 non-recurring appropriation for a public safety campaign.
Item 184. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 163, for wildfire
suppression costs.
Item 185. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
carry forward the unexpended balance of the appropriation made to Miscellaneous
Appropriations in Section 36, Item 164, for the completion of a weighted caseload study
to analyze the distribution of judicial, district attorney general and public defender
positions throughout the state.
Item 186. To Miscellaneous Appropriations, in Section 36, Item 165, for
consulting/study – governor's efficiency initiatives.
Item 187. To Miscellaneous Appropriations, in Section 36, Item 167, the
unexpended balance of local government cybersecurity grants.
Item 188. To Miscellaneous Appropriations, in Section 36, Item 168, the
unexpended balance of the $5,000,000 appropriation for governor's initiatives.
Item 189. To Miscellaneous Appropriations, in Section 36, Item 169, the
unexpended balance of the $1,225,000 appropriation for agriculture radio
replacement/conversion.
Item 190. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 171, the
unexpended balance of the $170,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Higher
Education – ERP Replacement.
- 116 - 003682

Item 191. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 172, the
unexpended balance of the $1,673,200 non-recurring appropriation for STS –
Cybersecurity Grant Program.
Item 192. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 173, the
unexpended balance of the $4,633,000 non-recurring appropriation for STS Enterprise
Switch Refresh.
Item 193. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 174, the
unexpended balance of the $6,650,000 non-recurring appropriation for STS Data Center
Operations Refresh.
Item 194. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 175, the
unexpended balance of the $75,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for Statewide E-
Filing System - Courts.
Item 195. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 176, the
unexpended balance of the $10,250,000 non-recurring appropriation for Tennessee
Strong Families – TN Fosters Hope.
Item 196. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 178, the
unexpended balance of the $8,100,000 non-recurring appropriation for STS efficiency
project.
Item 197. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 179, the
unexpended balance of the $3,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for STS software
defined wide area network project.
Item 198. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 36, Item 180, the
unexpended balance of the $30,000,000 non-recurring appropriation for higher
education safety grants.
Item 199. To Miscellaneous Appropriations in Section 5 of Chapter 4, Public
Acts of 2025 (Senate Bill 5 / House Bill 5) (1st Extraordinary Session), the unexpended
balance of the $20,000,000 non-recurring appropriation to the county government of
Carter County for the reconstruction and relocation of Hampton High School.
Item 200. To the Department of Children's Services in Section 36, Item 181,
Subject to the availability of revenue, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is
authorized to carry forward funds to provide for a statewide needs assessment of child
welfare services.
Item 201. To the Department of Children’s Services in Section 36, Item 183, the
unexpended balance of the $5,034,800 non-recurring appropriation for private case
managers.
Item 202. To the Department of Transportation in Section 1, Title III-30, Item 3,
for equipment purchases.
- 117 - 003682

Item 203. To the Department of Transportation for any appropriations which are
reserved at June 30, 2025.
Item 204. National Mortgage Servicers Consent Judgment. To the affected
agencies, in Section 36, Item 186, the unexpended balances of the following
appropriations made in Chapter 1029, Public Acts of 2012, Section 65, pursuant to the
National Mortgage Servicers Consent Judgment, including:
(a) To the Tennessee Housing Development Agency, $34,500,000 to be
used for its Keep My Tennessee Home financial assistance program and for
foreclosure counseling.
(b) To the Attorney General and Reporter, Consumer Affairs, for the
Consumer Education Fund, and previously in the Department of Commerce and
Insurance, $250,000.
(c) To the Department of Financial Institutions, $1,000,000 from the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors to be allocated as follows and used for: (i)
$350,000 for examiner training; (ii) $350,000 for information technology support
and equipment; (iii) $125,000 for a financial literacy grant to the Tennessee
Financial Literacy Commission; and (iv) $175,000 for consumer education efforts
by the consumer resources section of the Department of Financial Institutions.
The Commissioner of Financial Institutions is authorized to reallocate amounts
among these purposes.
Item 205. For motor vehicle additions and fleet replacements funded with non-
recurring appropriations in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, wherein such funds
were appropriated but not expended due to motor vehicle supply chain issues. The
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer from the amounts
carried forward sums sufficient to the Department of General Services, Division of Motor
Vehicle Management Internal Service Fund for the acquisitions of motor vehicles.
SECTION 37. Carry-forward of Unexpended Balances for Local Government Agencies
and Third-Party Nonprofit Agencies. The provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. Subject to the availability of revenue at June 30, 2025, any
unexpended balances of appropriations made under Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, other
acts of this General Assembly or acts by previous General Assemblies for benefit of an agency
of local government or a third-party nonprofit organization for which there is a grant
agreement/contract approved by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration are hereby
reappropriated to be expended in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and such appropriations shall be
carried forward in a reserve into the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration shall provide a list of any unexpended balances carried forward to
the Director of Accounts, the Division of State Audit, and the Office of Legislative Budget
Analysis. The reappropriation and carry-forward of these funds is subject to approval by the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, and expenditure and reporting requirements are
adjusted accordingly to the fiscal year in which the funds are received by the grant recipient,
notwithstanding any provision in the grant agreement to the contrary.
- 118 - 003682

SECTION 38. Supplemental Appropriations 2024-2025. The provisions of this section
take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. There is hereby appropriated
the following amounts which shall be in addition to the appropriations provided under Chapter
966, Public Acts of 2024:
1. Inmate Disciplinary Oversight Board
1.1 Onboarding Expenses ..................................................................... $ 208,300.00
2. Finance and Administration
2.1 Criminal Justice Programs Grants
Management System ...................................................................... 1,350,000.00
3. Veterans Services
3.1 Restore Carryforward ...................................................................... 1,196,000.00
4. Education
4.1 Paid Parental Leave ........................................................................ $10,000,000.00
4.2 Textbook Commission ..................................................................... 341,800.00
Total Education ............................................................................ $ 10,341,800.00
5. Commerce and Insurance
5.1 Law Enforcement Death Benefits .................................................... 1,000,000.00
6. Tennessee Bureau of Investigation
6.1 Crime Scene Vehicles – Restore Funds .......................................... 1,133,600.00
7. Children’s Services
7.1 Residential Custodial Cost Budget .................................................. 41,476,500.00
8. TennCare for DCS
8.1 Residential Custodial Cost Budget ........................................... 5,277,000.00
TOTAL ………………………………… ...................... $ 61,983,200.00
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to allot and transfer
these appropriations to the appropriate expenditure account within each department, agency or
branch of government and to adjust authorized positions accordingly. The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is further authorized to adjust federal aid and departmental
revenues accordingly.
SECTION 39. Program Expansions from Federal and Other Departmental Revenue. The
provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. At
June 30, 2025, any unexpended balances of departmental revenues and federal aid funds
appropriated in this section are hereby reappropriated in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025.
There is hereby appropriated from departmental revenues and federal aid funds the
amounts hereinafter set out:
SECTION 40. Accrued Liabilities and Obligations Between State Agencies. There is
- 119 - 003682

hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to recognize any accrued liability of the state and any
obligations between state agencies at June 30, 2026, and federal aid and departmental
revenues may be adjusted accordingly. This appropriation is subject to certification of the
accrued liability and obligations between state agencies by the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration to the State Comptroller. The commissioner shall provide a copy of the
certification to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis.
SECTION 41. The provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it.
Item 1.
(1) From the appropriations made in Sections 1 and 4 of this act, there
are appropriated sums sufficient to fund the following programs:
(a) An amount sufficient to implement and pay the cost of
administering the Section 125 cafeteria plan established for state
employees is hereby appropriated for that purpose. From the
appropriation made in this item and any annual forfeited contributions, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to establish
positions and funding for such positions to fund recurring and non-
recurring costs of administering the cafeteria plan established for such
employees. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to pay
additional costs of administering the State Employee Cafeteria Plan as a
result of increased participation in the plan by state employees; and
(b) An amount up to but not exceeding $1,000,000 for the
wellness program or other state employee insurance programs
administered by the Department of Finance and Administration; and
(c) An amount up to but not exceeding $10,000 for the daycare
program for children of state employees as administered by the
Department of Human Services, provided, that allotment of funds under
this sub-item is subject to approval of the Commissioner of Finance and
Administration; and
(d) An amount up to but not exceeding $154,500 to fund the
administrative costs of the state employee sick leave bank administered
by the Department of Human Resources; and
(e) An amount to provide for the employer match to the state's
401(k) plan for state employees compensated on the centralized state
payroll system pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter
25.
(2) The State Treasurer shall have the authority to contract with the
optional retirement plan vendors to provide investment products to optional
retirement plan participants under the state's 401(k) program.
- 120 - 003682

Item 2. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to
establish a reserve account for Community Services Agency (CSA). If any CSA ceases
to operate, any fund balances may be deposited to this account. There is hereby
appropriated a sum sufficient from the reserve account to provide for outstanding
obligations of any CSA or the ongoing operational cost of any CSA. Disbursement from
this fund is subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 3. In addition to the funds appropriated in Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024,
there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the Department of Environment and
Conservation from the reserve for state IIJA matching funds.
Item 4. In addition to the funds appropriated in Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024,
there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the Department of Environment and
Conservation from the Oak Ridge Monitoring fund reserve.
Item 5. In addition to the funds appropriated in Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024,
there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the Department of Education, from the
revenues, including local revenues, and reserves of the following programs in the
Department of Education: (a) Tennessee Investment in Student Achievement program.
SECTION 42. Legislation Requiring Local Government Expenditures – Appropriations
and Provisions.
Item 1. No law of general application which imposes increased expenditure
requirements on cities and counties in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall
take effect unless the state share of the cost of such law is specifically appropriated by
the provisions of this act.
Item 2. From the growth in state-shared taxes apportioned to cities and counties
and from the increase in local revenue generated from passage of any general law
during the 2025 annual session of the 114th General Assembly not otherwise
appropriated pursuant to this act, a sum sufficient hereby is appropriated to fund the
state share of the cost of any law of general application which requires, without local
discretion, that incorporated municipalities or county governments increase expenditures
as a direct consequence of passage of any general law.
SECTION 43. Over-Appropriation, Reserve Designations, Fund Transfers, and
Revenue Allocations. The provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it.
Item 1. It is the legislative intent to recognize over-appropriation reversion
savings in the general fund in the following amounts:
(a) In fiscal year 2024-2025 to recognize an over-appropriation of
$189,808,500, including a base recurring over-appropriation of $76,808,500 and
a non-recurring over-appropriation of $113,000,000.
(b) In fiscal year 2025-2026 to recognize an over-appropriation of
$76,808,500, including a base recurring over-appropriation of $76,808,500 and a
non-recurring over-appropriation of $0.
- 121 - 003682

(c) It is the legislative intent that any reversion from higher education
appropriations to the general fund balance at June 30, 2026, be drawn from the
unexpended balance in the Tennessee Higher Education Commission and the
Tennessee Student Assistance Corporation, but not from the Tennessee Student
Assistance Awards.
(d) It is the legislative intent that any departmental revenue received by
the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from certified
public expenditures shall revert to the general fund at June 30, 2025.
Item 2. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there shall be reserved or
designated a sum in the general fund balance to provide for non-recurring appropriations
and other appropriations intended to be funded in the 2025-2026 fiscal year from the
general fund balance at June 30, 2025. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration shall determine the amount to be reserved or designated.
Item 3. Under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-6-
107(a), the sum of $10,800,000 shall be allocated to the general fund for the cost of
issuing motor vehicle registration plates in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
Item 4. Unexpended appropriations or unreserved fund balances in an amount
to be determined by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall be
transferred from the debt service fund to the general fund in the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025.
Item 5. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, tax revenues allocated to the
debt service fund, including motor vehicle title fees, in excess of $342,000,000 shall be
transferred to the general fund. If said allocation to the debt service fund is less than
$342,000,000, then the allocation of excise tax revenues to the debt service fund shall
be increased in an amount to provide the allocation of $342,000,000 to the debt service
fund.
Item 6. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the allocation of motor vehicle
title fees to the debt service fund shall be the sum generated by the $1.50 fee under the
provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-6-101(a)(1).
Item 7. Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103, there is
apportioned from the general fund share of the sales and use tax into cities and counties
state shared taxes for the County Revenue Partnership Fund the sum of $1,900,000 in
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and the sum of $1,900,000 in the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026. These apportionments recognize the state share of certain laws
imposing costs on local governments, to include: (a) Chapter 531, Public Acts of 2009,
Section 30, relative to commitment of children to state custody at a rate above 300
percent of the average commitment rate from counties, in the amount of $400,000; (b)
Chapter 987, Public Acts of 2012, relative to domestic assault, in the amount of
$600,000; (c) Chapter 1057, Public Acts of 2022, relative to retirement benefits for
certain military veterans, in the amount of $500,000; (d) Chapter 1070, Public Acts of
2022, relative to pharmacy benefit managers, in the amount of $200,000, and (e)
- 122 - 003682

Chapter 399, Public Acts of 2023, relative to requiring LEAs to grant six work weeks of
paid leave to certified personnel, in the amount of $200,000.
SECTION 44. State Office Buildings and Support Facilities Revolving Fund.
Item 1. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient from the State Office
Buildings and Support Facilities Revolving Fund to provide for expenditures authorized
under Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 9. There is appropriated a
sum sufficient to the revolving fund in recognition of the lease cost of space for which
recovery is not in the state's best interest. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is authorized to allot, from the amount carried forward under Tennessee
Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 9, to provide funding for state office buildings
and support facilities, and is further authorized to make appropriation transfers between
the revolving fund and state departments and agencies.
Item 2. Funds herein appropriated for capital outlay of the state office building
and support facilities revolving fund shall be used solely for improvements, betterments,
and additions to state structures and for the acquisition of additional land and space,
including the purchase of existing structures, as approved by the State Building
Commission; provided, further, that such funds as are appropriated herein shall be
utilized to finance only those projects, improvements, betterments, or additions which
are presented in the State of Tennessee's 2025-2026 Budget Document, as amended by
any changes or additional projects contained in the Appropriations Act as passed on
third and final consideration; provided, further, that all funds appropriated in this act or
other general acts of this session for capital outlay of the state office buildings and
support facilities revolving fund shall be subject to the provisions of Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 15, Part 1.
Item 3. The appropriation made to the state office building and support facilities
revolving fund pursuant to Chapter 554, Public Acts of 2009, Section 68, Item 8(b), for
purposes authorized by Chapter 529, Public Acts of 2009, "The Tennessee Clean
Energy Act of 2009," and reappropriated in Chapter 1029, Public Acts of 2012, Section
41, Item 28, is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose.
Item 4. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
reallocate appropriations and revenues to transfer the maintenance of state facilities not
previously in the state office building and support facilities revolving fund to the state
office building and support facilities revolving fund, subject to a signed agreement for the
transfer of facilities between the department head of the transferring agency and the
commissioner of the Department of General Services. Provided, further, the state office
building and support facilities revolving fund shall bill the transferring agency for
maintenance of said facilities transferred. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is further authorized to transfer property maintenance positions from the
organizational units of the agencies to the Department of General Services, adjust
departmental revenue estimates, and adjust rates accordingly.
SECTION 45. Strategic Technology Solutions; Information Systems Development. The
provisions of this section take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 123 - 003682

Item 1. There is hereby created a Capital Projects Account in the Strategic
Technology Solutions program for the administration of the Information Systems Capital
Projects Budget. This account is established to provide for: (a) implementation of the
statewide Management Information Systems (MIS) Plan; (b) ability to separate the
operational budget of the Strategic Technology Solutions program and the system
development projects contained in the MIS Plan; and (c) financial control of the system
development projects, including equipment replacement for the various agencies of state
government.
Item 2. There is hereby authorized the transfer of those sums appropriated for
Information Systems Capital Projects in Sections 1 and 4 and in Section 36, Item 1, of
this act. Federal aid funds and other departmental revenues shall be adjusted
accordingly to reflect the transfer of state appropriations.
Item 3. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer to the Capital Projects Account any appropriations made in Sections 1 and 4 of
this act resulting from operating savings derived from implementation of information
systems funded through this section.
Item 4. From the appropriations made for systems development and other data
processing activities in this act and other acts of the legislature, the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to establish and charge the costs of
information systems analyst positions, workstation support positions, and other data
processing positions to said appropriations. The Commissioner of Finance and
Administration is further authorized to transfer between departments and agencies
existing information systems analyst positions, workstation support positions, and other
data processing positions and the funding provided in this act for transferred positions.
Item 5. Expenditure of any funds, subject to the jurisdiction of the Information
Systems Council, appropriated for systems development, the purchase of computer
software or the purchase of computer hardware shall be subject to the policies of such
Council.
Item 6. From the appropriations made for information systems activities in this
act and other acts of the legislature, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is
authorized to transfer from professional services to payroll amounts budgeted for
contractors. Additionally, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized
to increase authorized positions in order to replace contractors with state employees.
Item 7. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
approve an adjustment in rates charged by the Strategic Technology Solutions program
and to reserve any funds needed to rebate savings to the federal government and to
reallocate state appropriations between departments and to adjust federal aid and other
departmental revenue accordingly. Any adjustment of rates or reserve of funds pursuant
to the provisions of this act shall be reported to the Information Systems Council.
Item 8. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall have the
authority to allocate savings generated from rate reductions from the Strategic
Technology Solutions program to support modifications needed to be made to existing
- 124 - 003682

applications resulting from technology obsolescence or product nonperformance to
extend the life of a system.
SECTION 46. Appropriations from Dedicated Special License Plate and Motor Vehicle
Registration Fees.
Item 1. The revenues allocated under the provisions of Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 4, Parts 2 and 3, Special License Plates, are hereby
appropriated in a sum sufficient amount as provided in Parts 2 and 3.
Item 2. From the motor vehicle registration fees imposed pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 55-4-132, there is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient in the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to be used solely for the development, acquisition, and
updating of a computerized titling and registration system, and for the operation of the
titling and registration system. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is
authorized to allocate the funds to implement the intent of the act.
SECTION 47. Revenue Fluctuation Reserve, Reserve for Future Requirements
(General Fund Surplus), and Other General Fund Reserves. The provisions of this section take
effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
Item 1. From state revenues and other funds available to the general fund in
excess of requirements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration shall establish the Revenue Fluctuation Reserve in such
amount as may be available under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-4-211. Provided, it is the legislative intent that the Revenue Fluctuation
Reserve be set at a level of not less than $2,150,000,000 on June 30, 2025.
Item 2. From state revenues and other funds available to the general fund in
excess of requirements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration shall establish the Revenue Fluctuation Reserve in such
amount as may be available under the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 9-4-211. Provided, it is the legislative intent that the Revenue Fluctuation
Reserve be set at a level of not less than $2,185,600,000 on June 30, 2026.
Item 3. It is the legislative intent that at June 30, 2025, any surplus general fund
revenue, after fulfilling the requirements of Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, and of this
act, including all requirements of the closing of accounts at June 30, 2025, be deposited
in a reserve for future requirements.
SECTION 48. TennCare Program. The provisions of this section take effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
Item 1. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
transfer all federal and state health care funds, except those funds appropriated to
support the State Group Insurance Program, the Local Education Insurance Program
and the Local Government Health Insurance Program, to the TennCare Program for the
purpose of implementing any program approved by waiver, state plan amendment
and/or state and federal legislation pursuant to the provisions of health care services to
Tennesseans designated as eligible by TennCare. In addition, any premiums collected
- 125 - 003682

by the TennCare Program are explicitly authorized to be appropriated to the program for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of TennCare.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is further authorized to transfer
state funds and positions, as required, between TennCare and the following agencies
and programs: Community Mental Health Services and mental health institutes in the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services; Disability and Aging;
Children's Services; Human Services; Strategic Health-Care Programs; Commerce and
Insurance, Division of TennCare Oversight; and other health services.
Item 2. From the appropriations made to the TennCare Program in this act in
Section 1, Title III-26 and Section 4, Title III-25, for the Program Integrity Unit, the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer positions from
TennCare to the Attorney General and Reporter and to adjust departmental revenue
estimates accordingly.
Item 3. Subject to the availability of funding at June 30, 2025, the Commissioner
of Finance and Administration is authorized to carry forward into the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, any unexpended balances of appropriations made under
Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024, for the TennCare program, and such funds as are
carried forward hereby are reappropriated to be expended in the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal aid and
other departmental revenues accordingly.
Item 4. For fiscal year 2025-2026, in addition to all other appropriations to the
TennCare Program, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
use certified public expenditures and/or intergovernmental transfers from all
government-related TennCare service providers and local governments for the purpose
of matching funds under federal law for the TennCare Program. The use of the certified
public expenditures and/or intergovernmental transfers shall be in accordance with
federal law and regulations.
Item 5. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to
adjust revenue estimates and related expenditures in Section 4, Title III-25, related to
premiums and drug rebates for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of TennCare.
Item 6. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to
expend or lend from the funds appropriated such sums as the Commissioner deems
appropriate to assist TennCare managed care organizations (MCO) in their operations
and obtain services from contractors, consultants, and other third parties to give such
assistance, such being determined by the General Assembly to be for a public purpose.
The Commissioner shall provide prompt notification to the Speakers of the Senate and
House of Representatives and to the Chairs of the Finance, Ways and Means
Committees regarding any such expenditure or loan with complete details of the
amounts and recipients involved in such transactions.
Item 7. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration shall have the authority to promulgate, as emergency rules
pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-5-208, those rules and regulations
which concern the Medicaid/TennCare program, including Medicare Crossover
- 126 - 003682

payments, and which require promulgation in order for the state to fiscally function within
the appropriations provided for the Medicaid/TennCare program or within the availability
of revenues received for the Medicaid/TennCare program.
Item 8. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to
impose service limitations, to reduce optional eligibility categories, mandate
standardized reimbursement levels, and/or reduce, or limit, optional benefits in the
TennCare Program as necessary to control program expenditures in the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.
Item 9. On or before July 15, 2025, and December 1, 2025, the Division of
TennCare shall submit to the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis a report detailing
shared savings spending for each program, including those identified on page A-35 of
the 2025-2026 Budget Document.
SECTION 49. Salary Policy for State and Higher Education Employees.
Item 1. Executive Branch Employees – Salary Pool.
(a) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 4.1, TEAM
Act – Performance Bonus Pool, it is the legislative intent to provide a pool of
funds for salary bonuses for executive branch employees as defined in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-102(a), effective July 1, 2025. The
salary bonuses are not applicable to employees in positions which come under
the provisions of a statutorily mandated pay plan; provided, however, that
employees who come under the provision of a statutorily mandated plan shall be
paid in accordance with the provisions of such plan. The salary increases shall
be according to the following provisions:
(1) The pool of funds shall be used to provide bonus pay based
on increased performance as measured by employee reviews.
(b) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 4.2, TEAM
Act – Performance Pay Pool, it is the legislative intent to provide a pool of funds
for salary increases for executive branch employees as defined in Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 8-30-102(a), effective July 1, 2025. The salary
increase is not applicable to employees in positions which come under the
provisions of a statutorily mandated pay plan; provided, however, that employees
who come under the provision of a statutorily mandated plan shall be paid in
accordance with the provisions of such plan. The salary increases shall be
according to the following provisions:
(1) A portion of the pool of funds shall be used to provide
increased pay based on performance as measured by employee reviews.
(2) A portion of the pool of funds may be used to adjust salary
ranges.
Item 2. Non-Executive Branch Employees, Other Employee Classes – Salary
Increase.
- 127 - 003682

(a)(1) Except as provided in sub-item (a)(2), from the appropriation made
in Section 1, Title III-22, Item 4.3, Non-TEAM Act – Salary Pool, it is the
legislative intent to provide funds for an across-the-board salary increase
effective July 1, 2025, for employees as defined in Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 8-30-102(b). The salary increase is not applicable to
employees in positions which come under the provisions of a statutorily
mandated pay plan; provided, however, that employees who come under
the provision of a statutorily mandated plan shall be paid in accordance
with the provisions of such plan.
(2) From the appropriation made in Section 1, Title III-22, Item
4.3, Non-TEAM Act – Salary Pool, it is the legislative intent to provide
funds for a salary increase effective July 1, 2025, for employees as
defined in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-102(b)(3) – (5). The
amount of each employee's salary increase, if any, shall be determined
by the respective appointing authority of each employee's agency. The
salary increase is not applicable to employees in positions which come
under the provisions of a statutorily mandated pay plan; provided,
however, that employees who come under the provision of a statutorily
mandated pay plan shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of
such plan.
Item 3. Higher Education Employees – Salary Pool.
(a) From the appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-10, Items 2.2, 2.3,
3, and 4, it is the legislative intent to provide a pool of funds for higher education
employee salary increases effective July 1, 2025, at a level determined by each
governing board.
Item 4. Survey Portion of Commissioned Officer Pay Plan and Wildlife
Resources Agency Pay Plan.
(a) From the appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-11, and Title III-
20, it is the legislative intent to provide funding for a salary increase for the
survey portion of the commissioned officer pay plan in the Department of Safety,
Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy, and POST Commission, as
referenced in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-7-205, effective July 1,
2025.
(b) From the appropriations made in Section 1, Title III-6, it is the
legislative intent to provide funding for a salary increase for the survey portion of
the Tennessee Wildlife Resources Agency pay plan effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 50. Education Lottery-Funded Programs.
Item 1. From the Lottery for Education Account, the After-School Programs
Special Account, and other accounts and sub-accounts established pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 51, the Tennessee Education Lottery
Implementation Law, sums sufficient hereby are appropriated for the higher education
scholarship programs and other education programs authorized by that law and by Title
- 128 - 003682

49, Chapter 4, Part 9, relative to higher education scholarships; Title 49, Chapter 6, Part
7, relative to after-school educational programs. The appropriation from these sources
for after-school programs pursuant to Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 7, shall not exceed the
balance available in the After-School Programs Special Account at June 30, 2025, and
such balance hereby is appropriated for expenditure in the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2025; provided, that the appropriation is contingent upon the availability of funds in the
proper account and upon the availability of excess funds from net lottery proceeds, after
the funding of higher education scholarships. The availability of excess funds shall be
determined by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration prior to the distribution
of any excess funds. A copy of such determination shall be filed with the Chairs of the
Education Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Office of
Legislative Budget Analysis.
Item 2. It is hereby the legislative intent that the scholarship and grant levels
enumerated below be reconciled to conform with this act and other Public Acts of this
session and any other actions which affect the scholarship and grant levels for the
various scholarship and grant programs.
(a) The amounts for the Tennessee promise scholarships in the 2025-
2026 academic year shall be determined pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 49-4-708;
(b) The maximum award amounts under Tennessee Code Annotated,
Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 9, in the 2025-2026 academic year shall be:
(1) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-914 the HOPE Scholarship and HOPE nontraditional scholarship;
(2) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-943, for the STEP UP scholarship;
(3) For the ASPIRE need-based supplemental award pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-915:
(A) $750 per semester at four-year institutions;
(B) $250 per semester at two-year institutions;
(4) $500 per semester for the General Assembly Merit Scholar
supplemental award pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-
4-916;
(5) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-923 for the Tennessee Wilder-Naifeh reconnect grant;
(6) $2,000 per trimester for the Wilder-Naifeh Technical Skills
Grant pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-921;
(7) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-933 for the Tennessee HOPE foster child tuition grant;
- 129 - 003682

(8) $1,000 per semester for the Helping Heroes Grant pursuant to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-938;
(9) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-930, for the dual enrollment grant program;
(10) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-944, for the Tennessee Reconnect grant; and
(11) Determined pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section
49-4-909, for the Tennessee Middle College scholarship.
Item 3. A sum sufficient, not to exceed the available balance in the Lottery for
Education After-School Programs Grant Fund (LEAP Grant Fund), is appropriated from
the fund for the purpose of awarding 3-year grants in accordance with the provisions of
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 7.
Item 4. A sum sufficient, not to exceed the available balance in the Energy
Efficient Schools Council Fund, is appropriated from the fund for the purpose of the
Energy Efficient Schools Initiative in accordance with the provisions of Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 17.
SECTION 51. Health-Care Safety Net – Provisions and Appropriations from Revenues
and Reserves.
Item 1. The provisions of this item take effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it.
(a) In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the unexpended balances of
health-care safety net appropriations, including Project Diabetes, in Chapter 966,
Public Acts of 2024, Section 51, Item 1(a) and Section 1, Titles III-14, III-16, and
III-21, may be carried forward and hereby are reappropriated for expenditure in
the year beginning July 1, 2025, subject to approval of the Commissioner of
Finance and Administration.
(b) From the health-care safety net reserves carried forward at June 30,
2025, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer
funds between health-care safety net programs and to Strategic Tennessee
Health-Care Programs.
Item 2. In addition to the appropriations elsewhere in this act, sums sufficient
hereby are appropriated to the appropriate programs from the revenues and reserves of
CoverRx, CoverKids, Project Diabetes, and health care safety net programs.
SECTION 52. Federal Homeland Security Grant Programs – Provisions.
Item 1. The departmental revenues appropriated in this act from federal
Homeland Security grant programs are subject to the following provisions:
- 130 - 003682

(a) The allotment of these funds is subject to approval of the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration, and the distribution among state
and local agencies shall be subject to approval of or under procedures of the
state Homeland Security Council.
(b) The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby
authorized to reallocate appropriations within the affected state agencies and to
reallocate homeland security appropriations among the affected agencies for the
purpose of providing the required state match to these and other federal
homeland security and bioterrorism grants; to adjust position authorizations
among affected departments, offices, and programs for that purpose; and to
adjust federal and other departmental revenue estimates accordingly. The
commissioner shall file any such reallocations or adjustments with the Fiscal
Review Committee and the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis.
Item 2. There are appropriated sums sufficient to the Department of Safety,
Office of Homeland Security, from federal grant funds and to other agencies of state
government receiving homeland security federal grant funds.
Item 3. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the unexpended balance of the
state appropriation to the Department of Safety in Chapter 966, Public Acts of 2024,
Section 52, Item 3 and in Section 1, Title III-20, Item 4, may be reserved to be carried
forward into the next fiscal year, and such amounts as may be carried forward hereby
are appropriated. Said reserve is subject to the availability of revenue and to the
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration. The provisions of this item
take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
Item 4. In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the unexpended balance of the
state appropriation to the Miscellaneous Appropriations in Chapter 966, Public Acts of
2024, Section 52, Item 4, may be reserved to be carried forward into the next fiscal year,
and such amounts as may be carried forward hereby are appropriated. Said reserve is
subject to the availability of revenue and to the approval of the Commissioner of Finance
and Administration. The provisions of this item take effect upon becoming a law, the
public welfare requiring it.
SECTION 53. Federal Program Reductions. The General Assembly recognizes that
reductions in federal grants-in-aid of federal programs by the United States government will
require extraordinary actions by the Commissioner of Finance and Administration to manage the
state budget within available resources and without detrimental effect on state finances. It is the
legislative intent that the reduced programs not be maintained at their former level by
substituting state funds for the reduced federal aid.
Item 1. Accordingly, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall
reduce the federal and other departmental revenue estimates and reduce the allotment
of funds in an amount equal to the revenue reductions, in accordance with Section 23,
Item 1, it being the legislative intent that such withdrawal of federal aid necessitates a
reduction of spending authorization in order to protect the state finances.
- 131 - 003682

Item 2. The commissioner also shall reduce the number of authorized positions
of each program affected by the federal aid reductions, to the extent positions were
funded by the federal aid being reduced.
Item 3. State funds appropriated to match federal aid that has been reduced
shall be set aside in an allotment reserve of the affected program and shall not be
expended except to the extent necessary to provide for severance benefits and other
actions necessary to reduce programs; provided, however, that the allotment of state
funds shall be authorized to the extent necessary to fulfill state maintenance-of-effort
(MOE) requirements under federal law. To the extent that state MOE requirements are
reduced by the federal programs, state funds in the amount of the allowable MOE
reduction also shall be reserved and not expended, except as provided above in this
item. The provisions of this item shall not operate to require the reserving of state funds
that have been appropriated in excess of the previous level of required state match or
MOE in order to enhance the affected joint federal-state program.
Item 4. It is the legislative intent that the state matching funds held in allotment
reserve as a result of these actions revert to the appropriate fund balance at June 30,
2026, in addition to the amounts estimated in the over-appropriation in Section 43 of this
act, and that such funds as may be estimated at mid-year, when the 2026-2027 Budget
is transmitted, be available for the Governor's budget recommendations for the
maintenance of any priority program services, if approved in the 2026 appropriations bill
enacted by the General Assembly.
Item 5. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration, by December 31,
2025, shall report to the Senate and House Finance, Ways and Means committees and
the directors of the Office of Legislative Budget Analysis on the reductions made by
department and by state program, including the amounts of federal and other
departmental revenue and allotments reduced, the matching state appropriations held in
reserve and not allotted, the number of positions reduced, and a general summary of the
impact on program services. After the report date, the commissioner shall provide any
updated information in a fiscal year-end report encompassing the same categories of
information, if the program reductions have changed from the earlier report.
SECTION 54. From the appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and Section __ of this
act, the following non-recurring amounts are appropriated to the TennCare Program.
Item 1.
(a) If Senate Bill No. 576 / House Bill No. 829, the annual coverage
assessment act, becomes a law, there hereby is appropriated from the
appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and Section __ of this act, the sum of
$1,628,078,900 (non-recurring) to the TennCare Program, and the
Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal and
other departmental revenue accordingly; provided, however, that if the federal
government disallows the coverage assessment as a valid source to match
federal Medicaid funds, the appropriations in this Item 1(a) shall be null and void,
and the appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and Section __ shall be reduced
accordingly. If the cited bill does not become a law, the appropriations in Section
- 132 - 003682

1, Title III-26 and Section __ of this act are hereby reduced in the amount of
$1,628,078,900.
(b) There is further appropriated to the TennCare Program, in addition to
the appropriation for directed hospital payments, a sum sufficient from any
amount in excess of $1,628,078,900 collected from the coverage assessment for
the purpose of hospital payments for unreimbursed costs.
(c) To the extent that revenue collected from the coverage assessment is
less than $1,628,078,900, the appropriation for directed hospital payments,
hereby is reduced in the amount of the under-collection.
(d) From the funds available in TennCare maintenance of coverage trust
fund at June 30, 2025, there hereby is appropriated to the TennCare program a
sum sufficient for the purposes authorized in law. The Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to adjust federal and other departmental
revenue accordingly. The allotment of funds under this item is subject to
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 2.
(a) If Senate Bill No. 557 / House Bill No. 728, the annual nursing home
assessment fee, becomes a law, there is hereby appropriated from the
appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and Section __ of this act, the sum of
$168,641,500 (non-recurring) to the TennCare Program for nursing home
reimbursement. Further, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is
authorized to adjust federal and other departmental revenue accordingly. If the
cited bill does not become law, the appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and
Section __ of this act, are hereby reduced in the amount of $168,641,500.
(b) There is further appropriated to the TennCare Program, in addition to
the appropriation for nursing home reimbursement, a sum sufficient from any
amount in excess of $168,641,500 collected from the coverage assessment for
the purpose of nursing home reimbursement.
(c) From the funds available in TennCare nursing home assessment trust
fund at June 30, 2025, there hereby is appropriated to the TennCare program a
sum sufficient for the purposes authorized in law. The Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to adjust federal and other departmental
revenue accordingly. The allotment of funds under this item is subject to
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
Item 3.
(a) If Senate Bill No. 747 / House Bill No. 171, the annual ambulance
assessment fee, becomes a law, there is hereby appropriated from the
appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and Section __ of this act, the sum of
$11,800,000 (non-recurring) to the TennCare Program for ambulance provider
reimbursement. Further, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration is
authorized to adjust federal and other departmental revenue accordingly. If the
- 133 - 003682

cited bill does not become law, the appropriations in Section 1, Title III-26 and
Section __ of this act, are hereby reduced in the amount of $11,800,000.
(b) There is further appropriated to the TennCare Program, in addition to
the appropriation for ambulance provider reimbursement, a sum sufficient from
any amount in excess of $11,800,000 collected from the coverage assessment
for the purpose of ambulance provider reimbursement.
(c) From the funds available in TennCare ambulance assessment trust
fund at June 30, 2025, there hereby is appropriated to the TennCare program a
sum sufficient for the purposes authorized in law. The Commissioner of Finance
and Administration is authorized to adjust federal and other departmental
revenue accordingly. The allotment of funds under this item is subject to
approval of the Commissioner of Finance and Administration.
SECTION 55. The Tennessee Code Commission is requested to place an appropriate,
permanent note following the codification of any public act which is codified and which has not
received constitutionally required first year's funding through the provisions of this act.
SECTION 56. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 57. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it; provided,
however, that any provision of this act which authorizes prior or immediate expenditures and
any section or item which specifies an immediate effective date takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 134 - 003682